Hudson Technologies, Inc. 10-K Mar. 10, 2017  3:23 PM | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Hudson Technologies, Inc. (HDSN)FORM 10-K | Annual ReportMar. 10, 2017  3:23 PM|About: Hudson Technologies, Inc. (HDSN)View as PDF

 HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY (Form: 10-K, Received: 03/10/2017 15:25:57) 









	 






	 




	 



	UNITED STATES




	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE
	COMMISSION




	WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549




	 




	FORM 10-K



	 



	x

	ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934


	 


	For the fiscal year
	ended December 31, 2016


	 


	OR


	 



	¨

	TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934


	 


	For the transition period
	from ____________ to ____________


	 



	Commission file number
	1-13412




	 





	 






	 






	Hudson
	Technologies, Inc.




	 






	 




	(Exact name of registrant
	as specified in its charter)


	 






	New York






	13-3641539







	(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation or Organization)




	(I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)






	P.O. Box 1541



	 






	One Blue Hill Plaza




	 






	Pearl River, New York






	10965







	(Address of Principal Executive Offices)




	(Zip Code)





	 


	 





	Registrant’s telephone number, including area code





	(845) 735-6000







	 




	Securities registered
	pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:


	 





	Title of each class



	 



	Name of each exchange
	on which registered






	 




	 




	 






	Common stock, $.01 par value




	 




	The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC (NASDAQ Capital
	Market)






	 


	Securities registered
	pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None


	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant is
	a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act


	¨



	Yes

	x

	No



	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant is
	not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act


	¨




	 

	Yes

	x

	No



	 



	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
	Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports),
	and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.



	x




	Yes




	¨


	No








	 



	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Website, if any, every Interactive
	Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the
	preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files).





	x


	 


	Yes


	¨


	No








	 



	Indicate
	by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not
	be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference
	in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K.



	¨






	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant
	is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See the definitions
	of “large accelerated filer”, “accelerated filer”, and “smaller reporting company” in Rule12b-2
	of the Exchange Act.


	 


	Large accelerated filer


	¨

	    

	Accelerated filer


	x


	    Non-accelerated filer


	¨

	 

	(Do not check if a smaller reporting company)    Smaller reporting company

	¨



	 



	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).



	¨



	 



	Yes




	x


	No




	 


	The aggregate market value of registrant’s
	common stock held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2016 was approximately $96,210,824. As of March 1, 2017 there were 41,518,820
	shares of the registrant’s common stock outstanding

	.



	 


	DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE:


	 


	Portions of the Registrant's Proxy Statement
	for its Annual Meeting of Stockholders to be held on June 14, 2017, are incorporated by reference in Part III of this Report. 
	Except as expressly incorporated by reference, the Registrant's Proxy Statement shall not be deemed to be part of this Form 10-K.


	 






	 







	 





	 





	 





	 




	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc.




	 




	Index



	 







	Part







	 







	Item





	 



	Page





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Part I.




	Item 1 -





	Business




	 



	 3





	 



	Item 1A -





	Risk Factors




	 



	 8





	 



	Item 1B -





	Unresolved Staff Comments




	 



	11





	 



	Item 2 -





	Properties




	 



	11





	 



	Item 3 -





	Legal Proceedings




	 



	12





	 



	Item 4 -





	Mine Safety Disclosures




	 



	12





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Part II.




	Item 5 -





	Market
	for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities




	 



	13





	 



	Item 6 -





	Selected Financial Data




	 



	14





	 



	Item 7 -





	Management's
	Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations




	 



	14





	 



	Item 7A -





	Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About
	Market Risk




	 



	21





	 



	Item 8 -





	Financial Statements and Supplementary Data




	 



	21





	 



	Item 9 -





	Changes
	in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure




	 



	21





	 



	Item 9A -





	Controls and Procedures




	 



	21





	 



	Item 9B -





	Other Information




	 



	24





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Part III.




	Item 10 -





	Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate
	Governance




	 



	24





	 



	Item 11 -





	Executive Compensation




	 



	24





	 



	Item 12 -





	Security
	Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and  Related Stockholder Matters




	 



	24





	 



	Item 13 -





	Certain Relationships and Related Transactions,
	and Director Independence




	 



	24





	 



	Item 14 -





	Principal Accountant Fees and Services




	 



	24






	Part IV.




	Item 15 -





	Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules




	 



	25





	 



	Item 16-





	Form  10-K Summary




	 


	27




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 




	Signatures




	 


	 



	50





	 






	 



	2



	 







	 




	 





	Part I








	Item 1. Business




	 



	General


	 


	Hudson Technologies, Inc., incorporated under
	the laws of New York on January 11, 1991, is a refrigerant services company providing innovative solutions to recurring problems
	within the refrigeration industry. The Company’s operations consist of one reportable segment. The Company's products and
	services are primarily used in commercial air conditioning, industrial processing and refrigeration systems, and include refrigerant
	and industrial gas sales, refrigerant management services consisting primarily of reclamation of refrigerants and RefrigerantSide®
	Services performed at a customer's site, consisting of system decontamination to remove moisture, oils and other contaminants.
	In addition, the Company’s SmartEnergy OPS

	TM

	service is a web-based real time continuous monitoring service applicable
	to a facility’s refrigeration systems and other energy systems. The Company’s Chiller Chemistry® and Chill Smart®
	services are also predictive and diagnostic service offerings. As a component of the Company’s products and services, the
	Company also participates in the generation of carbon offset projects. The Company operates principally through its wholly-owned
	subsidiary, Hudson Technologies Company. Unless the context requires otherwise, references to the “Company”, “Hudson”,
	“we", “us”, “our”, or similar pronouns refer to Hudson Technologies, Inc. and its subsidiaries.


	 


	The Company's executive offices are located
	at One Blue Hill Plaza, Pearl River, New York and its telephone number is (845) 735-6000. The Company maintains a website at

	www.hudsontech.com

	,
	the contents of which are not incorporated into this filing.


	 


	Industry Background


	 


	The Company participates in an industry that
	is highly regulated, and changes in the regulations affecting our business could affect our operating results. Currently the Company
	purchases virgin, hydro chlorofluorocarbon (“HCFC”) and hydro fluorocarbon (“HFC”) refrigerants and reclaimable,
	primarily HCFC, HFC and chlorofluorocarbon (“CFC”) refrigerants from suppliers and its customers. Effective January
	1, 1996, the Clean Air Act, as amended (the “Act”) prohibited the production of virgin CFC refrigerants and limited
	the production of virgin HCFC refrigerants. Effective January 2004, the Act further limited the production of virgin HCFC refrigerants
	and federal regulations were enacted which established production and consumption allowances for HCFC refrigerants and which imposed
	limitations on the importation of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants. Under the Act, production of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants
	is scheduled to be phased out during the period 2010 through 2020, and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled
	to be phased out by 2030. In October 2014, the EPA published a final rule providing further reductions in the production and consumption
	allowances for virgin HCFC refrigerants for the years 2015 through 2019 (the “Final Rule”). In the Final Rule, the
	EPA has established a linear annual phase down schedule for the production or importation of virgin HCFC-22 that started at approximately
	22 million pounds in 2015 and reduces by approximately 4.5 million pounds each year and ends at zero in 2020.


	 


	HFC refrigerants are used as substitutes for
	CFC and HCFC refrigerants in certain applications. As a result of the increasing restrictions and limitations on the production
	and use of CFC and HCFC refrigerants, various segments of the air conditioning and refrigeration industry have been replacing
	or modifying equipment that utilize CFC and HCFC refrigerants and have been transitioning to equipment that utilize HFC refrigerants
	and hydrofluoro-olefins (“HFO”). HFC refrigerants are not ozone depleting chemicals and are not currently regulated
	under the Act. However, certain HFC refrigerants are highly weighted greenhouse gases that are believed to contribute to global
	warming and climate change and, as a result, are now subject to various state and federal regulations relating to the sale, use
	and emissions of HFC refrigerants. The Company expects that HFC refrigerants eventually will
	be replaced by HFOs or other types of products with lower global warming potentials.


	 


	In October 2016, more than 200 countries, including the United States, agreed to amend the Montreal Protocol
	to phase down production of HFCs by 85% between now and 2047. The amendment establishes timetables for all developed and developing
	countries to freeze and then reduce production and use of HFCs, with the first reductions by developed countries starting in 2019.
	The amendment becomes effective January 1, 2019 if twenty countries ratify the amendment. To date, the amendment has not been ratified
	by the United States.


	 


	The Act, and the federal regulations enacted
	under authority of the Act, have mandated and/or promoted responsible use practices in the air conditioning and refrigeration
	industry, which are intended to minimize the release of refrigerants into the atmosphere and encourage the recovery and re-use
	of refrigerants. The Act prohibits the venting of CFC, HFC and HCFC refrigerants, and prohibits and/or phases down the production
	of CFC and HCFC refrigerants.


	 


	The Act also mandates the recovery of
	CFC and HCFC refrigerants and also promotes and encourages re-use and reclamation of CFC and HCFC refrigerants. Under the
	Act, owners, operators and companies servicing cooling equipment utilizing CFC and HCFC refrigerants are responsible for the
	integrity of the systems regardless of the refrigerant being used. In November 2016, the EPA issued a final rule extending
	these requirements to HFCs and to certain other refrigerants that are approved by the EPA as alternatives for CFC and
	HCFC refrigerants.


	 






	 



	3



	 







	 




	  


	Products and Services


	 


	From its inception, the Company has sold refrigerants,
	and has provided refrigerant reclamation and refrigerant management services that are designed to recover and reuse refrigerants,
	thereby protecting the environment from release to the atmosphere and the corresponding ozone depletion and global warming impact.
	The reclamation process allows the refrigerant to be re-used thereby eliminating the need to destroy or manufacture additional
	refrigerant and eliminating the corresponding impact to the environment associated with the destruction and manufacturing. 
	The Company believes it is the largest refrigerant reclaimer in the United States.  Additionally, the Company has created
	alternative solutions to reactive and preventative maintenance procedures that are performed on commercial and industrial refrigeration
	systems.  These services, known as RefrigerantSide® Services, complement the Company’s refrigerant sales and refrigerant
	reclamation and management services.  The Company has also developed SmartEnergy OPS

	TM

	that identify inefficiencies
	in the operation of air conditioning and refrigeration systems and assists companies to improve the energy efficiency of their
	systems and save operating costs and improve system reliability.  In addition, the Company is pursuing potential opportunities
	for the creation and monetization of verified emission reductions.


	 


	Refrigerant and Industrial Gas Sales


	 


	The Company sells reclaimed and virgin (new)
	refrigerants to a variety of customers in various segments of the air conditioning and refrigeration industry, and sells industrial
	gases to a variety of industry segments. The Company continues to sell reclaimed CFC based refrigerants, which are no longer manufactured.
	Virgin, non-CFC refrigerants, including HCFC and HFC refrigerants, are purchased by the Company from several suppliers and resold
	by the Company, typically at wholesale. Additionally, the Company regularly purchases used or contaminated refrigerants, some
	of which are CFC based, from many different sources, which refrigerants are then reclaimed using the Company's high speed proprietary
	reclamation equipment, its proprietary Zugibeast® system, and then are resold by the Company.


	 


	Refrigerant Management Services


	 


	The Company provides a complete offering of
	refrigerant management services, which primarily include reclamation of refrigerants, laboratory testing through the Company’s
	laboratory, which has been certified by the Air Conditioning, Heating and Refrigeration Institute (“AHRI”), and banking
	(storage) services tailored to individual customer requirements. Hudson also separates “crossed” (i.e. commingled)
	refrigerants and provides re-usable cylinder refurbishment and hydrostatic testing services.


	 


	RefrigerantSide® Services


	 


	The Company provides decontamination and recovery
	services that are performed at a customer's site through the use of portable, high volume, high-speed proprietary equipment, including
	the patented Zugibeast® system.  Certain of these RefrigerantSide® Services, which encompass system decontamination,
	and refrigerant recovery and reclamation, are also proprietary and are covered by process patents.


	 


	In addition to the decontamination and recovery
	services previously described, the Company also provides predictive and diagnostic services for its customers.  The Company
	offers diagnostic services that are intended to predict potential problems in air conditioning and refrigeration systems before
	they occur.  The Company’s Chiller Chemistry® offering integrates several fluid tests of an operating system and
	the corresponding laboratory results into an engineering report providing its customers with an understanding of the current condition
	of the fluids, the cause for any abnormal findings and the potential consequences if the abnormal findings are not remediated. 
	Fluid Chemistry®, an abbreviated version of the Company’s Chiller Chemistry® offering, is designed to quickly identify
	systems that require further examination.



	 



	The Company has also been awarded several
	US patents for its SmartEnergy OPS

	TM

	, which is a system for measuring, modifying and improving the efficiency of energy
	systems, including air conditioning and refrigeration systems, in industrial and commercial applications. This service is a web-based
	real time continuous monitoring


	service applicable to a facility’s chiller plant systems. The SmartEnergy OPS

	TM

	offering enables customers to monitor and improve their chiller plant performance and proactively identify and correct system
	inefficiencies. SmartEnergy OPS

	TM

	is able to identify specific inefficiencies in the operation of chiller plant systems
	and, when used with Hudson’s RefrigerantSide

	®

	Services, can increase the efficiency of the operating systems
	thereby reducing energy usage and costs. Improving the system efficiency reduces power consumption thereby directly reducing CO

	2

	emissions at the power plants or onsite.   Lastly, the Company’s ChillSmart

	®

	offering, which
	combines the system optimization with the Company’s Chiller Chemistry

	®

	offering, provides a snapshot of a
	packaged chiller’s operating efficiency and health. ChillSmart® provides a very effective predictive maintenance tool
	and helps our customers to identify the operating chillers that cause higher operating costs.


	 


	The Company’s engineers who developed
	and support Smart Energy OPS

	TM

	are recognized as Energy Experts and Qualified Best Practices Specialists by the United
	States Department of Energy (“DOE”) in the areas of Steam and Process Heating under the DOE “Best Practices”
	program, and are the Lead International Energy Experts for steam, chillers and refrigeration systems for the United Nations Industrial
	Development Organization (“UNIDO”).  The Company’s staff have trained more than 4,000 industrial plant
	personnel in the US and internationally, and have developed and are currently delivering training curriculums in 12 different
	countries.  The Company’s staff have completed more than 200 industrial ESAs in the US and internationally.


	 






	 



	4



	 







	 




	  



	Carbon Offset Projects




	 



	CFC refrigerants are ozone depleting substances
	and are also highly weighted greenhouse gases that contribute to global warming and climate change. The destruction of CFC refrigerants
	may be eligible for verified emission reductions that can be converted and monetized into carbon offset credits that may be traded
	in the emerging carbon offset markets. The Company is pursuing opportunities to acquire CFC refrigerants and is developing relationships
	within the emerging environmental markets in order to develop opportunities for the creation and monetization of verified emission
	reductions from the destruction of CFC refrigerants.


	 


	In October 2015, the American Carbon Registry
	(“ACR”) established a methodology to provide, among other things, a quantification framework for the creation of carbon
	offset credits for the use of certified reclaimed HFC refrigerants. The Company is pursuing opportunities to acquire HFC refrigerants
	and is developing relationships within the emerging environmental markets in order to develop opportunities for the creation and
	monetization of verified emission reductions from the reclamation of HFC refrigerants.


	 


	The following is a summary of revenues over
	the last three years:


	 






	Years Ended December 31,


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Product and related sales


	 


	$


	101,344


	 


	 


	$


	75,154


	 


	 


	$


	50,460


	 




	RefrigerantSide

	®

	Services


	 


	 


	4,137


	 


	 


	 


	4,568


	 


	 


	 


	5,350


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	105,481


	 


	 


	$


	79,722


	 


	 


	$


	55,810


	 





	  




	Hudson's Network


	 


	Hudson operates from a network of facilities
	located in:


	 





	Pearl River, New York




	—Company headquarters and administrative offices






	Champaign, Illinois



	—Reclamation and separation of refrigerants and cylinder refurbishment center;




	 



	RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Nashville, Tennessee




	—Reclamation and separation of refrigerants and cylinder
	refurbishment center






	Ontario, California




	—Reclamation and cylinder refurbishment center






	Catano, Puerto Rico




	—Reclamation center and RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Auburn, Washington




	—RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Baton Rouge, Louisiana




	—RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Charlotte, North Carolina




	—RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Escondido, California




	—RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Stony Point, New York




	—RefrigerantSide® Service depot






	Tulsa, Oklahoma




	—Energy and Carbon Services






	Hampstead, New Hampshire




	—Telemarketing office






	Pottsboro, Texas




	—Telemarketing office






	 


	Strategic Alliances


	 


	The Company believes that the international
	market for refrigerant reclamation, sales and services is equal in size to the United States market for those sales and services.
	The Company has Alliances in Europe and South Africa, and over time, the Company expects to introduce its technology and offerings
	to several other markets around the world.


	 


	Suppliers


	 


	The Company's financial performance and its
	ability to sell refrigerants is in part dependent on its ability to obtain sufficient quantities of virgin, non-CFC based refrigerants,
	and of reclaimable CFC and non-CFC based, refrigerants from manufacturers, wholesalers, distributors, bulk gas brokers and from
	other sources within the air conditioning, refrigeration and automotive aftermarket industries, and on corresponding demand for
	refrigerants. The Company's refrigerant sales include CFC based refrigerants, which are no longer manufactured. Additionally,
	the Company's refrigerant sales include non-CFC based refrigerants, including HCFC and HFC refrigerants, which are the most-widely
	used refrigerants. Effective January 1, 1996, the Act limited the production of virgin HCFC refrigerants, which production was
	further limited in January 2004. Federal regulations enacted in January 2004 established production and consumption allowances
	for HCFCs and imposed limitations on the importation of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants. Under the Act, production of certain
	virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out during the period 2010 through 2020 and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants
	is scheduled to be phased out by 2030. In October 2014, the EPA published the Final Rule providing further reductions in the production
	and consumption allowances for virgin HCFC refrigerants for the years 2015 through 2019. In the Final Rule, the EPA has established
	a linear annual phase down schedule for the production or importation of virgin HCFC-22 that will start at approximately 22 million
	pounds in 2015 and reduce by approximately 4.5 million pounds each year and end at zero in 2020.


	 


	In October 2016, more than 200 countries, including the United States, agreed to amend the Montreal Protocol
	to phase down production of HFCs by 85% between now and 2047. The amendment establishes timetables for all developed and developing
	countries to freeze and then reduce production and use of HFCs, with the first reductions by developed countries starting in 2019.
	The amendment becomes effective January 1, 2019 if twenty countries ratify the amendment. To date, the amendment has not been ratified
	by the United States.


	 






	 



	5



	 







	 




	  


	Customers


	 


	The Company provides its services
	to commercial, industrial and governmental customers, as well as to refrigerant wholesalers, distributors, contractors and
	to refrigeration equipment manufacturers. Agreements with larger customers generally provide for standardized pricing
	for specified services. The Company generates sales by purchase order on a real-time basis and therefore does not carry a
	backlog of sales.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2016, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	30% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2016, there were no outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2015, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	33% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2015, there were no outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2014, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	25% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2014, there were $0.7 million in outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	Marketing


	 


	Marketing programs are conducted through the
	efforts of the Company's executive officers, Company sales personnel, and third parties. Hudson employs various marketing methods,
	including direct mailings, technical bulletins, in-person solicitation, print advertising, response to quotation requests and
	the internet through the Company’s website (

	www.hudsontech.com

	). Information on the Company's website is not part
	of this report.


	 


	The Company's sales personnel are compensated
	on a combination of a base salary and commission. The Company's executive officers devote significant time and effort to customer
	relationships.


	 


	Competition


	 


	The Company competes primarily on the basis
	of the performance of its proprietary high volume, high-speed equipment used in its operations, the breadth of services offered
	by the Company, including proprietary RefrigerantSide® Services and other on-site services, and price, particularly with respect
	to refrigerant sales.


	 


	The Company competes with numerous regional
	and national companies that market reclaimed and virgin refrigerants and provide refrigerant reclamation services. Certain of
	these competitors possess greater financial, marketing, distribution and other resources for the sale and distribution of refrigerants
	than the Company and, in some instances, serve a more extensive geographic area than the Company.


	 


	Hudson's RefrigerantSide® Services provide
	new and innovative solutions to certain problems within the refrigeration industry and, as such, the demand and market acceptance
	for these services are subject to uncertainty. Competition for these services primarily consists of traditional methods of solving
	the industry's problems. The Company’s marketing strategy is to educate the marketplace that its alternative solutions are
	available and that RefrigerantSide® Services are superior to traditional methods.


	 


	Insurance


	 


	The Company carries insurance coverage that
	it considers sufficient to protect the Company's assets and operations. The Company currently maintains general commercial liability
	insurance and excess liability coverage for claims up to $11,000,000 per occurrence and $12,000,000 in the aggregate. The Company
	attempts to operate in a professional and prudent manner and to reduce potential liability risks through specific risk management
	efforts, including ongoing employee training.


	 


	The refrigerant industry involves potentially
	significant risks of statutory and common law liability for environmental damage and personal injury. The Company, and in certain
	instances, its officers, directors and employees, may be subject to claims arising from the Company's on-site or off-site services,
	including the improper release, spillage, misuse or mishandling of refrigerants classified as hazardous or non-hazardous substances
	or materials. The Company may be held strictly liable for damages, which could be substantial, regardless of whether it exercised
	due care and complied with all relevant laws and regulations.


	 


	Hudson maintains environmental impairment
	insurance of $10,000,000 per occurrence, and $10,000,000 annual aggregate, for events occurring subsequent to November 1996.


	 






	 



	6



	 







	 




	  


	Government Regulation


	 


	The business of refrigerant sales, reclamation
	and management is subject to extensive, stringent and frequently changing federal, state and local laws and substantial regulation
	under these laws by governmental agencies, including the EPA, the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration
	(“OSHA”) and the United States Department of Transportation (“DOT”).


	 


	Among other things, these regulatory authorities
	impose requirements which regulate the handling, packaging, labeling, transportation and disposal of hazardous and non-hazardous
	materials and the health and safety of workers, and require the Company and, in certain instances, its employees, to obtain and
	maintain licenses in connection with its operations. This extensive regulatory framework imposes significant compliance burdens
	and risks on the Company.


	 


	Hudson and its customers are subject to the
	requirements of the Act, and the regulations promulgated thereunder by the EPA, which make it unlawful for any person in the course
	of maintaining, servicing, repairing, and disposing of air conditioning or refrigeration equipment, to knowingly vent or otherwise
	release or dispose of ozone depleting substances, and non-ozone depleting substitutes, used as refrigerants.


	 


	Pursuant to the Act, reclaimed refrigerant
	must satisfy the same purity standards as newly manufactured, virgin refrigerants in accordance with standards established by
	AHRI prior to resale to a person other than the owner of the equipment from which it was recovered. The EPA administers a certification
	program pursuant to which applicants certify to reclaim refrigerants in compliance with AHRI standards. The Company is one of
	only four certified refrigerant testing laboratories in the United States under AHRI’s laboratory certification program,
	which is a voluntary program that certifies the ability of a laboratory to test refrigerant in accordance with the AHRI 700 standard.


	 


	In addition, the EPA has established a mandatory
	certification program for air conditioning and refrigeration technicians. Hudson's technicians have applied for or obtained such
	certification.


	 


	The Company may also be subject to regulations
	adopted by the EPA which impose reporting requirements arising out of the importation of certain HCFCs, and arising out of the
	importation, purchase, production, use and/or emissions of certain greenhouse gases, including HFCs.


	 


	The Company is also subject to regulations
	adopted by the DOT which classify most refrigerants handled by the Company as hazardous materials or substances and imposes requirements
	for handling, packaging, labeling and transporting refrigerants and which regulate the use and operation of the Company’s
	commercial motor vehicles used in the Company’s business.


	 


	The Resource Conservation and Recovery Act
	of 1976, as amended ("RCRA"), requires facilities that treat, store or dispose of hazardous wastes to comply with certain
	operating standards. Before transportation and disposal of hazardous wastes off-site, generators of such waste must package and
	label their shipments consistent with detailed regulations and prepare a manifest identifying the material and stating its destination.
	The transporter must deliver the hazardous waste in accordance with the manifest to a facility with an appropriate RCRA permit.
	Under RCRA, impurities removed from refrigerants consisting of oils mixed with water and other contaminants are not presumed to
	be hazardous waste.


	 


	The Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know
	Act of 1986, as amended, requires the annual reporting by the Company of Emergency and Hazardous Chemical Inventories (Tier II
	reports) to the various states in which the Company operates and requires the Company to file annual Toxic Chemical Release Inventory
	Forms with the EPA.


	 


	The Comprehensive Environmental Response,
	Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 (“CERCLA”), establishes liability for clean-up costs and environmental damages
	to current and former facility owners and operators, as well as persons who transport or arrange for transportation of hazardous
	substances. Almost all states have similar statutes regulating the handling and storage of hazardous substances, hazardous wastes
	and non-hazardous wastes. Many such statutes impose requirements that are more stringent than their federal counterparts. The
	Company could be subject to substantial liability under these statutes to private parties and government entities, in some instances
	without any fault, for fines, remediation costs and environmental damage, as a result of the mishandling, release, or existence
	of any hazardous substances at any of its facilities.


	 


	The Occupational Safety and Health Act of
	1970, as amended mandates requirements for a safe work place for employees and special procedures and measures for the handling
	of certain hazardous and toxic substances. State laws, in certain circumstances, mandate additional measures for facilities handling
	specified materials.


	 


	The Company is also subject to regulations
	adopted by the California Air Resources Board which impose certain reporting requirements arising out of the reclamation and sale
	of refrigerants that takes place within the State of California.


	 






	 



	7



	 







	 




	  


	The Company believes that it is in material
	compliance with all applicable regulations material to its business operations.


	 


	Quality Assurance & Environmental
	Compliance


	 


	The Company utilizes in-house quality and
	regulatory compliance control procedures. Hudson maintains its own analytical testing laboratory, which is AHRI certified, to
	assure that reclaimed refrigerants comply with AHRI purity standards and employs portable testing equipment when performing on-site
	services to verify certain quality specifications. The Company employs ten persons engaged full-time in quality control and to
	monitor the Company's operations for regulatory compliance.


	 


	Employees


	 


	On December 31, 2016, the Company had 137
	full time employees including air conditioning and refrigeration technicians, chemists, engineers, sales and administrative personnel.
	None of the Company's employees are represented by a union. The Company believes it has good relations with its employees.


	 


	Patents and Proprietary Information


	 


	The Company holds several U.S. and foreign
	patents, as well as pending patent applications, related to certain RefrigerantSide® Services and supporting systems developed
	by the Company for systems and processes for measuring and improving the efficiency of refrigeration systems, and for certain
	refrigerant recycling and reclamation technologies. These patents will expire between February 2017 and April 2031.


	 


	The Company believes that patent protection
	is important to its business. There can be no assurance as to the breadth or degree of protection that patents may afford the
	Company, that any patent applications will result in issued patents or that patents will not be circumvented or invalidated. Technological
	development in the refrigerant industry may result in extensive patent filings and a rapid rate of issuance of new patents. Although
	the Company believes that its existing patents and the Company's equipment do not and will not infringe upon existing patents
	or violate proprietary rights of others, it is possible that the Company's existing patent rights may not be valid or that infringement
	of existing or future patents or violations of proprietary rights of others may occur. In the event the Company's equipment or
	processes infringe, or are alleged to infringe, patents or other proprietary rights of others, the Company may be required to
	modify the design of its equipment or processes, obtain a license or defend a possible patent infringement action. There can be
	no assurance that the Company will have the financial or other resources necessary to enforce or defend a patent infringement
	or proprietary rights violation action or that the Company will not become liable for damages.


	 


	The Company also relies on trade secrets and
	proprietary know-how, and employs various methods to protect its technology. However, such methods may not afford complete protection
	and there can be no assurance that others will not independently develop such know-how or obtain access to the Company's know-how,
	concepts, ideas and documentation. Failure to protect its trade secrets could have a material adverse effect on the Company.


	 


	SEC Filings


	 


	The Company makes available on its internet
	website copies of its Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments
	thereto, as soon as reasonably practicable after they are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.



	 








	Item 1A. Risk Factors




	 


	There are many important factors, including
	those discussed below (and above as described under “Patents and Proprietary Information”), that have affected, and
	in the future could affect Hudson’s business including, but not limited to, the factors discussed below, which should be
	reviewed carefully together with the other information contained in this report. Some of the factors are beyond Hudson’s
	control and future trends are difficult to predict.




	 






	Our existing and future debt obligations
	could impair our liquidity and financial condition.




	 


	Our existing credit facility, which currently
	expires in June 2020, is secured by substantially all of our assets and contains formulas that limit the amount of our borrowings
	under the facility. Moreover, the terms of our credit facility also include negative covenants that, among other things, may limit
	our ability to incur additional indebtedness. If we violate any loan covenants and do not obtain a waiver from our lender, our
	indebtedness under the credit facility would become immediately due and payable, and the lender could foreclose on its security,
	which could materially adversely affect our business and future financial condition and could require us to curtail or otherwise
	cease our existing operations.




	 








	 



	8



	 







	 






	  






	We may need additional financing to
	satisfy our future capital requirements, which may not be readily available to us

	.



	 


	Our capital requirements may be significant
	in the future. In the future, we may incur additional expenses in the development and implementation of our operations. Due to
	fluctuations in the price, demand and availability of new refrigerants, our existing credit facility that expires in June 2020
	may not in the future be sufficient to provide all of the capital that we need to acquire and manage our inventories of new refrigerant.
	As a result, we may be required to seek additional equity or debt financing in order to develop our RefrigerantSide® Services
	business, our refrigerant sales business and our other businesses. We have no current arrangements with respect to, or sources
	of, additional financing other than our existing credit facility. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain any
	additional financing on terms acceptable to us or at all. Our inability to obtain financing, if and when needed, could materially
	adversely affect our business and future financial condition and could require us to curtail or otherwise cease our existing operations.




	 






	Adverse weather or economic downturn
	could adversely impact our financial results.




	 


	Our business could be negatively impacted
	by adverse weather or economic downturns. Weather is a significant factor in determining market demand for the refrigerants sold
	by us, and to a lesser extent, our RefrigerantSide® Services. Unusually cool temperatures in the spring and summer tend to
	depress demand for, and price of, refrigerants we sell. Protracted periods of cooler than normal spring and summer weather could
	result in a substantial reduction in our sales which could adversely affect our financial position as well as our results of operations.
	An economic downturn could cause customers to postpone or cancel purchases of the Company’s products or services. Either
	or both of these conditions could have severe negative implications to our business that may exacerbate many of the risk factors
	we identified in this report but not limited, to the following:



	 




	Liquidity




	 



	These conditions could reduce our liquidity
	and this could have a negative impact on our financial condition and results of operations.



	 




	Demand




	 



	These conditions could lower the demand and/or
	price for our product and services, which would have a negative impact on our results of operations.



	 





	The nature of our business exposes us
	to potential liability.




	 


	The refrigerant recovery and reclamation industry
	involves potentially significant risks of statutory and common law liability for environmental damage and personal injury. We,
	and in certain instances, our officers, directors and employees, may be subject to claims arising from our on-site or off-site
	services, including the improper release, spillage, misuse or mishandling of refrigerants classified as hazardous or non-hazardous
	substances or materials. We may be strictly liable for damages, which could be substantial, regardless of whether we exercised
	due care and complied with all relevant laws and regulations. Our current insurance coverage may not be sufficient to cover potential
	claims, and adequate levels of insurance coverage may not be available in the future at a reasonable cost. A partially or completely
	uninsured claim against us, if successful and of sufficient magnitude would have a material adverse effect on our business and
	financial condition.




	 






	Our business and financial condition
	is substantially dependent on the sale and continued environmental regulation of refrigerants.




	 


	Our business and prospects are largely dependent
	upon continued regulation of the use and disposition of refrigerants. Changes in government regulations relating to the emission
	of refrigerants into the atmosphere could have a material adverse effect on us. Failure by government authorities to otherwise
	continue to enforce existing regulations or significant relaxation of regulatory requirements could also adversely affect demand
	for our services and products.


	 




	Our business is subject to significant
	regulatory compliance burdens.




	 


	The refrigerant reclamation and management
	business is subject to extensive, stringent and frequently changing federal, state and local laws and substantial regulation under
	these laws by governmental agencies, including the EPA, the OSHA and DOT. Although we believe that we are in material compliance
	with all applicable regulations material to our business operations, amendments to existing statutes and regulations or adoption
	of new statutes and regulations which affect the marketing and sale of refrigerant could require us to continually alter our methods
	of operation and/or discontinue the sale of certain of our products resulting in costs to us that could be substantial. We may
	not be able, for financial or other reasons, to comply with applicable laws, regulations and permit requirements, particularly
	as we seek to enter into new geographic markets. Our failure to comply with applicable laws, rules or regulations or permit requirements
	could subject us to civil remedies, including substantial fines, penalties and injunctions, as well as possible criminal sanctions,
	which would, if of significant magnitude, materially adversely impact our operations and future financial condition.




	 








	 



	9



	 







	 






	  






	A number of factors could negatively
	impact the price and/or availability of refrigerants, which would, in turn, adversely affect our business and financial condition.





	 



	Refrigerant sales continue to represent
	a significant majority of our revenues. Therefore, our business is substantially dependent on the availability of both new
	and used refrigerants in large quantities, which may be affected by several factors including, without limitation: (i)
	commercial production and consumption limitations imposed by the Act and legislative limitations and ban on HCFC
	refrigerants; (ii) the ban on production of CFC based refrigerants under the Act; (iii) the amendment to the Montreal
	Protocol, if ratified, and any legislation and regulation enacted to implement the amendment, could impose limitations on
	production and consumption of HFC refrigerants; (iv) introduction of new refrigerants and air conditioning and refrigeration
	equipment; (v) price competition resulting from additional market entrants; (vi) changes in government regulation on the use
	and production of refrigerants; and (vii) reduction in demand for refrigerants. We do not maintain firm agreements with any
	of our suppliers of refrigerants and we do not hold allowances permitting us to purchase and import HCFC refrigerants from
	abroad. Sufficient amounts of new and/or used refrigerants may not be available to us in the future, particularly as a result
	of the further phase down of HCFC production, or may not be available on commercially reasonable terms. Additionally, we may
	be subject to price fluctuations, periodic delays or shortages of new and/or used refrigerants. Our failure to obtain and
	resell sufficient quantities of virgin refrigerants on commercially reasonable terms, or at all, or to obtain, reclaim and
	resell sufficient quantities of used refrigerants would have a material adverse effect on our operating margins and results
	of operations.




	 






	As a result of competition, and the
	strength of some of our competitors in the market, we may not be able to compete effectively.




	 


	The markets for our services and products
	are highly competitive. We compete with numerous regional and national companies which provide refrigerant recovery and reclamation
	services, as well as companies which market and deal in new and reclaimed alternative refrigerants, including certain of our suppliers,
	some of which possess greater financial, marketing, distribution and other resources than us. We also compete with numerous manufacturers
	of refrigerant recovery and reclamation equipment. Certain of these competitors have established reputations for success in the
	service of air conditioning and refrigeration systems. We may not be able to compete successfully, particularly as we seek to
	enter into new markets.


	 




	Issues relating to potential global
	warming and climate change could have an impact on our business.




	 


	Refrigerants are considered to be strong greenhouse
	gases that are believed to contribute to global warming and climate change and are now subject to various state and federal regulations
	relating to the sale, use and emissions of refrigerants. Current and future global warming
	and climate change or related legislation and/or regulations may impose additional compliance burdens on us and on our customers
	and suppliers which could potentially result in increased administrative costs, decreased demand in the marketplace for our products,
	and/or increased costs for our supplies and products. In addition, an amendment to the Montreal Protocol has established timetables for all developed and developing
	countries to freeze and then reduce production and use of HFCs by 85% between now and 2047, with the first reductions by developed
	countries starting in 2019. The amendment becomes effective January 1, 2019 if twenty countries ratify the amendment. To date,
	the amendment has not been ratified by the United States. It is unclear if the United States will ratify the amendment and, if
	it does ratify the amendment, what legislation and/or regulations will be enacted to implement the amendment.


	 




	The loss of key management personnel
	would adversely impact our business.




	 


	Our success is largely dependent upon the
	efforts of our Chief Executive Officer and Chairman. The loss of his services would have a material adverse effect on our business
	and prospects.


	 




	We have the ability to designate and
	issue preferred stock, which may have rights, preferences and privileges greater than Hudson’s common stock and which could
	impede a subsequent change in control of us.




	 


	Our Certificate of Incorporation authorizes
	our Board of Directors to issue up to 5,000,000 shares of “blank check” preferred stock and to fix the rights, preferences,
	privileges and restrictions, including voting rights, of these shares, without further shareholder approval. The rights of the
	holders of our common stock will be subject to, and may be adversely affected by, the rights of holders of any additional preferred
	stock that may be issued by us in the future. Our ability to issue preferred stock without shareholder approval could have the
	effect of making it more difficult for a third party to acquire a majority of our voting stock, thereby delaying, deferring or
	preventing a change in control of us.




	 






	If our common stock were delisted from
	NASDAQ it could be subject to “penny stock” rules which would negatively impact its liquidity and our shareholders’
	ability to sell their shares.




	 


	Our common stock is currently listed on the
	NASDAQ Capital Market. We must comply with numerous NASDAQ Marketplace rules in order to continue the listing of our common stock
	on NASDAQ. There can be no assurance that we can continue to meet the rules required to maintain the NASDAQ listing of our common
	stock. If we are unable to maintain our listing on NASDAQ, the market liquidity of our common stock may be severely limited.



	 







	 



	10



	 







	 




	  



	Our management has significant control
	over our affairs.



	 


	Currently, our officers and directors collectively
	own approximately 13% of our outstanding common stock. Accordingly, our officers and directors are in a position to significantly
	affect major corporate transactions and the election of our directors. There is no provision for cumulative voting for our directors.


	 




	We may fail to successfully integrate
	any acquisitions made by us into our operations.




	 


	As part of our business strategy, we may look
	for opportunities to grow by acquiring other product lines, technologies or facilities that complement or expand our existing
	business. We may be unable to identify suitable acquisition candidates or negotiate acceptable terms. In addition, we may not
	be able to successfully integrate any assets, liabilities, customers, systems or management personnel we may acquire into our
	operations and we may not be able to realize related revenue synergies and cost savings within expected time frames. There can
	be no assurance that we will be able to successfully integrate any prior or future acquisition.


	 






	Our information technology systems,
	processes, and sites may suffer interruptions, failures, or attacks which could affect our ability to conduct business.




	 


	Our information technology
	systems provide critical data connectivity, information and services for internal and external users. These include, among other
	things, processing transactions, summarizing and reporting results of operations, complying with regulatory, legal or tax requirements,
	storing project information and other processes necessary to manage the business. Our systems and technologies, or those of third
	parties on which we rely, could fail or become unreliable due to equipment failures, software viruses, cyber threats, terrorist
	acts, natural disasters, power failures or other causes. Cybersecurity threats are evolving and include, but are not limited to,
	malicious software, cyber espionage, attempts to gain unauthorized access to our sensitive information, including that of our customers,
	suppliers, and subcontractors, and other electronic security breaches that could lead to disruptions in mission critical systems,
	unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information, and corruption of data. Although we utilize various procedures
	and controls to monitor and mitigate these threats, there can be no assurance that these procedures and controls will be sufficient
	to prevent security threats from materializing. If any of these events were to materialize, the costs related to cyber or other
	security threats or disruptions may not be fully insured or indemnified and could have a material adverse effect on our reputation,
	operating results, and financial condition.





	 








	Item 1B. Unresolved
	Staff Comments




	 


	None.



	 







	Item 2.	Properties



	 


	The Company's headquarters are located in
	a 6,100 square foot office facility located in a multi-tenant building in Pearl River, New York. The building is leased from an
	unaffiliated third party at an annual rental of approximately $150,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring in December 2021.


	 


	The Company's Champaign, Illinois facility
	is located in a 48,000 square foot building, which was purchased by the Company in May 2005 for $999,999. On June 1, 2012, the
	Company entered into a mortgage note with Busey Bank for $855,000. The note bears interest at the fixed rate of 4% per annum,
	amortizing over 60 months and maturing on June 1, 2017. The mortgage note is secured by the Company’s land and building
	located in Champaign, Illinois. As of December 31, 2016, the Company has $93,000 outstanding under this mortgage.


	 


	The Company has established a second facility
	in Champaign, Illinois, which is a 135,000 square foot facility. The
	building is leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual rental of $504,000, pursuant to an arrangement expiring in December
	2018.


	 


	The Company’s Nashville, Tennessee facility
	is a 33,000 square foot office facility leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual rental of $173,000 pursuant to an
	agreement expiring March 2018.


	 


	The Company’s Ontario, California facility
	is a 20,000 square foot facility leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual rental of $90,000 pursuant to an agreement
	expiring in December 2018.


	 


	The Company’s Catano, Puerto Rico facility
	is a 15,000 square foot facility leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual rental of $124,000 pursuant to an agreement
	expiring in December 2020.


	 


	The Company's Auburn, Washington depot facility
	is a 6,000 square foot facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual rental
	of $39,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring August 2018.


	 


	The Company's Baton Rouge, Louisiana depot
	facility is a 3,000 square foot facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual
	rental of $23,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring in May 2019.


	 


	The Company's Charlotte, North Carolina depot
	facility is a 2,600 square foot facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from an unaffiliated third party at an annual
	rental of $26,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring in May 2019.


	 


	The Company’s Escondido,
	California depot facility is a 6,000 square foot facility leased from a company that is owned by a non-executive employee at
	an annual rental of $36,000 pursuant to a month to month rental agreement.


	 


	The Company’s Stony Point, New York
	depot facility is an 18,000 square foot facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from an unaffiliated third party at
	an annual rental of $90,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring in June 2021.


	 






	 



	11



	 







	 




	  


	The Company’s Tulsa, Oklahoma energy
	and carbon services facility is located in a 2,304 square foot office facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from
	an unaffiliated third party at an annual rental of $27,000 which includes our share of operating expenses. This lease expires
	December 2017.


	 


	The Company's Hampstead, New Hampshire telemarketing
	facility is located in a 2,546 square foot office facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from an unaffiliated third
	party at an annual rental of $52,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring in August 2022.


	 


	The Company’s Pottsboro, Texas telemarketing
	facility is located in a 1,000 square foot office facility located in a multi-tenant building leased from an unaffiliated third
	party at an annual rental of $6,000 pursuant to an agreement expiring in August 2017.


	 


	In addition to the above leases, the Company
	from time to time utilizes public warehouse space on a month to month basis. The Company typically enters into short-term leases
	for its facilities and whenever possible extends the expiration date of such leases. The Company believes that its insurance policies
	are adequate to protect the Company’s property.



	 







	Item 3. Legal
	Proceedings



	 


	On April 1, 1999, the Company reported a release
	of approximately 7,800 lbs. of R-11 refrigerant (the “1999 Release”), at its former leased facility in Hillburn, NY
	(the “Hillburn Facility”), which the Company vacated in June 2006.


	 


	Since September 2000, last modified in March
	2013, the Company signed an Order on Consent with the New York State Department of Environmental Conservation (“DEC”)
	whereby the Company agreed to operate a remediation system to reduce R-11 refrigerant levels in the groundwater under and around
	the Hillburn Facility and agreed to perform periodic testing at the Hillburn Facility until remaining groundwater contamination
	has been effectively abated. The Company accrued, as an expense in its consolidated financial statements, the costs that the Company
	believes it will incur in connection with its compliance with the Order of Consent through December 31, 2018. There can be no
	assurance that additional testing will not be required or that the Company will not incur additional costs and such costs in excess
	of the Company’s estimate may have a material adverse effect on the Company financial condition or results of operations.
	The Company has exhausted all insurance proceeds available for the 1999 Release under all applicable policies.


	 


	In May 2000 the Hillburn Facility, as a result
	of the 1999 Release, was nominated by EPA for listing on the National Priorities List (“NPL”) pursuant to CERCLA.
	In September 2003, the EPA advised the Company that it had no current plans to finalize the process for listing of the Hillburn
	Facility on the NPL.


	 


	During the years ended December 31,
	2016, 2015 and 2014 the Company incurred none, none, and $53,000, respectively, in additional remediation costs in connection
	with the matters above. The remaining liability on our Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2016 is approximately $150,000.
	There can be no assurance that the ultimate outcome of the 1999 Release will not have a material adverse effect on the
	Company's financial condition and results of operations. There can be no assurance that the EPA will not change its current
	plans and seek to finalize the process of listing the Hillburn Facility on the NPL, or that the ultimate outcome of such a
	listing will not have a material adverse effect on the Company's financial condition and results of operations.



	 







	Item 4. Mine Safety
	Disclosures



	 



	Not Applicable



	 






	 



	12



	 









	 




	  





	Part II



	 







	Item 5.	Market
	for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities



	 


	The Company's common stock trades on the NASDAQ
	Capital Market under the symbol “HDSN”. The following table sets forth, for the periods indicated, the range of the
	high and low sale prices for the common stock as reported by NASDAQ.


	 






	 


	 


	High


	 


	 


	Low


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	2015


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	- First Quarter


	 


	$


	4.56


	 


	 


	$


	3.35


	 




	- Second Quarter


	 


	$


	4.75


	 


	 


	$


	3.40


	 




	- Third Quarter


	 


	$


	3.58


	 


	 


	$


	2.45


	 




	- Fourth Quarter


	 


	$


	3.56


	 


	 


	$


	2.69


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	2016


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	- First Quarter


	 


	$


	3.69


	 


	 


	$


	2.64


	 




	- Second Quarter


	 


	$


	3.95


	 


	 


	$


	3.09


	 




	- Third Quarter


	 


	$


	6.72


	 


	 


	$


	3.26


	 




	- Fourth Quarter


	 


	$


	8.50


	 


	 


	$


	5.55


	 





	 



	Stock Price Performance Graph



	 


	The following graph illustrates a comparison of the total cumulative stockholder return on our common stock since December
	31, 2011, to two indices: the NASDAQ Composite Index and the Nasdaq Industrial Index. The stockholder return shown in the
	graph below is not necessarily indicative of future performance, and we do not make or endorse any predictions as to future
	stockholder returns. 


	 


Click to enlarge
	 


	 



	The above Stock Price Performance Graph
	and related information shall not be deemed “soliciting material” or to be “filed” with the Securities
	and Exchange Commission, nor shall such information be incorporated by reference into any future filing under the Securities Act
	of 1933 or Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each as amended, except to the extent that we specifically incorporate it by reference
	into such filing.



	 


	The number of record holders of the Company's
	common stock was approximately 153 as of March 1, 2017. The Company believes that there are in excess of 3,294 beneficial owners
	of its common stock.


	 


	To date, the Company has not declared or paid
	any cash dividends on its common stock. The payment of dividends, if any, in the future is within the discretion of the Board
	of Directors and will depend upon the Company's earnings, its capital requirements and financial condition, borrowing covenants,
	and other relevant factors. The Company presently intends to retain all earnings, if any, to finance the Company's operations
	and development of its business and does not expect to declare or pay any cash dividends on its common stock in the foreseeable
	future. In addition, the Company has a credit facility with PNC Bank National Association (“PNC”) that, among other
	things, restricts the Company's ability to declare or pay any cash dividends on its capital stock.


	 






	 



	13



	 








	 









	Item 6. Selected
	Financial Data



	 


	The following selected financial data, with
	respect to our financial position and results of operations for each of the five fiscal years in the period ended December 31,
	2016, set forth below, has been derived from, should be read in conjunction with and is qualified in its entirety by reference
	to, our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto, included either elsewhere in this report or in reports we have filed
	previously with the SEC. The selected financial data presented below should also be read in conjunction with ITEM 7, “Management’s
	Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”.


	 






	 


	 


	For the Year Ended


	 




	(Amounts in thousands, except per share data)


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 


	 


	2013


	 


	 


	2012


	 




	Selected Statement of Operations Data:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Revenues


	 


	$


	105,481


	 


	 


	$


	79,722


	 


	 


	$


	55,810


	 


	 


	$


	58,634


	 


	 


	$


	56,447


	 




	Gross Profit


	 


	$


	31,086


	 


	 


	$


	18,489


	 


	 


	$


	6,446


	 


	 


	$


	(730


	)


	 


	$


	22,542


	 




	Operating Income (Loss)


	 


	$


	18,947


	 


	 


	$


	8,181


	 


	 


	$


	(985


	)


	 


	$


	(8,485


	)


	 


	$


	14,880


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	10,637


	 


	 


	$


	4,763


	 


	 


	$


	(720


	)


	 


	$


	(5,842


	)


	 


	$


	12,801


	 




	Net income (loss) per share - Basic


	 


	$


	0.31


	 


	 


	$


	0.15


	 


	 


	$


	(0.02


	)


	 


	$


	(0.24


	)


	 


	$


	0.54


	 




	Net income (loss) per share- Diluted


	 


	$


	0.30


	 


	 


	$


	0.14


	 


	 


	$


	(0.02


	)


	 


	$


	(0.24


	)


	 


	$


	0.49


	 




	Weighted average number of shares- Basic


	 


	 


	34,104


	 


	 


	 


	32,547


	 


	 


	 


	29,123


	 


	 


	 


	24,826


	 


	 


	 


	23,907


	 




	Weighted average number of shares- Diluted


	 


	 


	35,417


	 


	 


	 


	33,936


	 


	 


	 


	29,123


	 


	 


	 


	24,826


	 


	 


	 


	26,354


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Selected Balance Sheet Data:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents


	 


	$


	33,931


	 


	 


	$


	1,258


	 


	 


	$


	935


	 


	 


	$


	669


	 


	 


	$


	3,991


	 




	Inventory


	 


	$


	68,601


	 


	 


	$


	61,897


	 


	 


	$


	37,017


	 


	 


	$


	33,967


	 


	 


	$


	40,167


	 




	Total assets


	 


	$


	122,470


	 


	 


	$


	85,011


	 


	 


	$


	59,935


	 


	 


	$


	52,368


	 


	 


	$


	57,232


	 




	Debt- short and long-term


	 


	$


	351


	 


	 


	$


	24,866


	 


	 


	$


	10,709


	 


	 


	$


	20,038


	 


	 


	$


	17,656


	 




	Stockholders’ Equity


	 


	$


	112,017


	 


	 


	$


	49,425


	 


	 


	$


	43,999


	 


	 


	$


	28,086


	 


	 


	$


	32,696


	 






	  







	Item 7.

	Management’s
	Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations




	 


	Certain statements, contained in this section
	and elsewhere in this Form 10-K, constitute “forward-looking statements” within the meaning of the Private Securities
	Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements involve a number of known and unknown risks, uncertainties and
	other factors which may cause the actual results, performance or achievements of the Company to be materially different from any
	future results, performance or achievements expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Such factors include, but
	are not limited to, changes in the laws and regulations affecting the industry, changes in the demand and price for refrigerants
	(including unfavorable market conditions adversely affecting the demand for, and the price of refrigerants), the Company's ability
	to source refrigerants, regulatory and economic factors, seasonality, competition, litigation, the nature of supplier or customer
	arrangements that become available to the Company in the future, adverse weather conditions, possible technological obsolescence
	of existing products and services, possible reduction in the carrying value of long-lived assets, estimates of the useful life
	of its assets, potential environmental liability, customer concentration, the ability to obtain financing, any delays or interruptions
	in bringing products and services to market, the timely availability of any requisite permits and authorizations from governmental
	entities and third parties as well as factors relating to doing business outside the United States, including changes in the laws,
	regulations, policies, and political, financial and economic conditions, including inflation, interest and currency exchange rates,
	of countries in which the Company may seek to conduct business, the Company’s ability to successfully integrate any assets
	it acquires from third parties into its operations, and other risks detailed in the this report and in the Company’s other
	subsequent filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”). The words “believe”, “expect”,
	“anticipate”, “may”, “plan”, “should” and similar expressions identify forward-looking
	statements. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the
	date the statement was made.



	 




	Critical Accounting Policies



	 


	The Company's discussion and analysis of its
	financial condition and results of operations are based upon its consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in
	accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The preparation of these consolidated financial
	statements requires the Company to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues
	and expenses and related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. Several of the Company's accounting policies involve
	significant judgments, uncertainties and estimates. The Company bases its estimates on historical experience and on various other
	assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments
	about the carrying values of assets and liabilities. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions
	or conditions. To the extent that actual results differ from management's judgments and estimates, there could be a material adverse
	effect on the Company. On a continuous basis, the Company evaluates its estimates, including, but not limited to, those estimates
	related to its allowance for doubtful accounts, inventory reserves, and valuation allowance for the deferred tax assets relating
	to its net operating loss carry forwards (“NOLs”) and commitments and contingencies. With respect to accounts receivable,
	the Company estimates the necessary allowance for doubtful accounts based on both historical and anticipated trends of payment
	history and the ability of the customer to fulfill its obligations. For inventory, the Company evaluates both current and anticipated
	sales prices of its products to determine if a write down of inventory to net realizable value is necessary. In determining the
	Company’s valuation allowance for its deferred tax assets, the Company assesses its ability to generate taxable income in
	the future. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the net assets acquired in business combinations
	accounted for under the purchase method of accounting. The Company tests for any impairment of goodwill annually. Intangibles
	with determinable lives are amortized over the estimated useful lives of the assets currently ranging from 2 to 10 years. The
	Company reviews these useful lives annually to determine that they reflect future realizable value. The Company utilizes both
	internal and external sources to evaluate potential current and future liabilities for various commitments and contingencies.
	In the event that the assumptions or conditions change in the future, the estimates could differ from the original estimates.


	 






	 



	14



	 







	 




	 


	Overview


	 


	Sales of refrigerants continue to represent
	a significant majority of the Company’s revenues. The Company’s refrigerant sales are primarily HCFC and HFC based
	refrigerants and to a lesser extent CFC based refrigerants that are no longer manufactured. Currently the Company purchases virgin
	HCFC and HFC refrigerants and reclaimable HCFC, HFC and CFC refrigerants from suppliers and its customers. Effective January 1,
	1996, the Clean Air Act (the “Act”) prohibited the production of virgin CFC refrigerants and limited the production
	of virgin HCFC refrigerants, which production was further limited in January 2004. Federal regulations enacted in January 2004
	established production and consumption allowances for HCFCs and imposed limitations on the importation of certain virgin HCFC
	refrigerants. Under the Act, production of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out during the period 2010
	through 2020, and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out by 2030. In October 2014, the EPA published
	the Final Rule providing further reductions in the production and consumption allowances for virgin HCFC refrigerants for the
	years 2015 through 2019. In the Final Rule, the EPA has established a linear annual phase down schedule for the production or
	importation of virgin HCFC-22 that started at approximately 22 million pounds in 2015 and is being reduced by approximately 4.5
	million pounds each year and ends at zero in 2020.


	 


	The Company has created and developed a service
	offering known as RefrigerantSide® Services. RefrigerantSide® Services are sold to contractors and end-users whose refrigeration
	systems are used in commercial air conditioning and industrial processing. These services are offered in addition to refrigerant
	sales and the Company's traditional refrigerant management services, which consist primarily of reclamation of refrigerants. The
	Company has created a network of service depots that provide a full range of the Company's RefrigerantSide® Services to facilitate
	the growth and development of its service offerings.


	 


	The Company focuses its sales and marketing
	efforts for its RefrigerantSide® Services on customers who the Company believes most readily appreciate and understand the
	value that is provided by its RefrigerantSide® Services offering. In pursuing its sales and marketing strategy, the Company
	offers its RefrigerantSide® Services to customers in the following industries: petrochemical, pharmaceutical, industrial power,
	manufacturing, commercial facility and property management and maritime. The Company may incur additional expenses as it further
	develops and markets its RefrigerantSide® Services offering.


	 


	In July 2016 the Company was awarded, as prime
	contractor, a five-year contract, including a five-year renewal option, by the United States Defense Logistics Agency (“DLA”)
	for the management, supply, and sale of refrigerants, compressed gases, cylinders and related terms.


	 




	Results of Operations


	 



	Year ended December 31, 2016 as compared
	to the year ended December 31, 2015



	 


	Revenues for the year ended December
	31, 2016 were $105.5 million, an increase of $25.8 million or 32% from the $79.7 million reported during the comparable
	2015 period. The increase in revenues was attributable to an increase in refrigerant revenues of $26.2 million, offset by
	a reduction in services revenues of $0.4 million. The increase in refrigerant revenue is primarily related to an increase in
	the selling price per pound of certain refrigerants sold, which accounted for an increase in revenues of $17.6 million, as
	well as an increase in the number of pounds of certain refrigerants sold, which accounted for an increase in revenues of $8.6
	million.


	 


	Cost of sales for the year ended December
	31, 2016 was $74.4 million or 71% of sales. The cost of sales for the year ended December 31, 2015 was $61.2 million or 77% of
	sales. The decrease in the cost of sales percentage from 77% for the year ended December 31, 2015 to 71% for the year ended December
	31, 2016 is primarily due to the increase in the selling price per pound of certain refrigerants sold and to a lesser extent,
	increases in volume sold for the year ended December 31, 2016 compared to the same period in 2015.


	 


	Operating expenses for the year
	ended December 31, 2016 were $12.1 million, an increase of $1.8 million from the $10.3 million
	reported during the comparable 2015 period. The increase in operating expenses is primarily due to an increase in non-cash, non-recurring stock
	compensation expense and professional fees in 2016 when compared to 2015.


	 


	Other expense for the year ended December
	31, 2016 was $1.7 million, compared to the $0.5 million reported during the comparable 2015 period. The Company recorded $0.6
	million of expense relating to a deferred acquisition cost in 2016, compared to $0.3 million of income in 2015. Interest expense
	included in Other expense increased from $0.8 million in 2015 to $1.1 million in 2016. The increase in interest expense is due
	to increased borrowings under the PNC Credit Facility. As of December 31, 2016, the Company paid off its borrowings under the
	PNC Credit Facility.


	 


	Income tax expense for the year ended December
	31, 2016 was $6.6 million compared to income tax expense for the year ended December 31, 2015 of $2.9 million. The $3.7 million
	increase was attributable to higher pre-tax income for 2016 when compared to 2015. For 2016 and 2015 the income tax expense was
	for federal and state income tax at statutory rates applied to the pre-tax income.


	 


	Net income for the year ended December 31,
	2016 was $10.6 million, an increase of $5.8 million from the $4.8 million net income reported during the comparable 2015 period,
	primarily due to the increase in revenues, partially offset by an increase in operating expenses and income tax expense.



	 




	Year ended December 31, 2015 as compared
	to the year ended December 31, 2014



	 


	Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2015
	were $79.7 million, an increase of $23.9 million or 43% from the $55.8 million reported during the comparable 2014 period. The
	increase in revenues was attributable to an increase in refrigerant revenues of $24.7 million, offset in part by a decrease in
	RefrigerantSide® Services revenues of $0.8 million. The increase in refrigerant revenue is related to both an increase in
	the selling price per pound of certain refrigerants sold, which accounted for an increase in revenues of $17.4 million, as well
	as an increase in the number of pounds of certain refrigerants sold, which accounted for an increase in revenues of $7.3 million.
	The decrease in RefrigerantSide® Services was primarily attributable to a decrease in the price of jobs completed when compared
	to the same period in 2014.


	 






	 



	15



	 







	 




	  


	Cost of sales for the year ended December
	31, 2015 was $61.2 million or 77% of sales. Cost of sales for year ended December 31, 2014 was $49.4 million, or 88% of sales.
	The decrease in the cost of sales percentage, from 88% in 2014 to 77% in 2015, is related to the increase in the selling price
	per pound of refrigerants, as described in the revenue discussion above.


	 


	Operating expenses for the year ended December
	31, 2015 were $10.3 million, an increase of $2.9 million from the $7.4 million reported during the comparable 2014 period. The
	increase in operating expenses is primarily attributable to payroll expenses of $2.4 million, of which approximately $1.1 million
	is associated with payroll for the acquisitions completed in late 2014 and early 2015 as well as approximately $0.5 million of
	amortization of intangibles associated with these same acquisitions.


	 


	Other expense for the year ended December
	31, 2015 was $0.5 million, compared to the $0.6 million reported during the comparable 2014 period. Other expense consists of
	interest expense of $0.8 million and $0.6 million for the comparable 2015 and 2014 periods, respectively. The increase in interest
	expense is due to increased borrowing on the PNC credit facility. Additionally, other expense includes other income of $0.3 million
	in 2015 related to the 2015 acquisition earn out that was less than the total amount that had been recorded as part of the purchase
	price accounting for the acquisition of a supplier of refrigerants and compressed gases.


	 


	Income tax expense for the year ended December
	31, 2015 was $2.9 million compared to an income tax benefit of $0.9 million reported during the comparable 2014 period. For 2015
	the income tax expense of $2.9 million was for federal and state income tax at statutory rates applied to the pre-tax income.
	For 2014 the income tax benefit of $0.9 million was for federal and state income tax at statutory rates applied to the pre-tax
	loss, as well as state income tax refunds for 2013.


	 


	Net income for the year ended December 31,
	2015 was $4.8 million, an increase of $5.5 million from the $0.7 million net loss reported during the comparable 2014 period,
	primarily due to the increase in revenue and gross profit partially offset by increases in operating expenses, interest expense
	and income tax expense.




	 






	Liquidity and Capital Resources



	 


	At December 31, 2016, the Company had working
	capital, which represents current assets less current liabilities, of $97.9 million, an increase of $59.4 million from the working
	capital of $38.5 million at December 31, 2015. The increase in working capital is primarily attributable to increased net income
	and the December 2016 public offering, as discussed further below.


	 


	The Company has historically financed its
	working capital requirements through cash flows from operations, the issuance of debt and equity securities, and bank borrowings.


	 


	Net cash provided by operating activities
	for the year ended December 31, 2016, was $9.3 million compared with net cash used in operating activities of $10.5 million for
	the comparable 2015 period and net cash provided by operating activities of $1.7 million for the comparable 2014 period. Net cash
	provided by operating activities for the 2016 period was primarily attributable to net income, offset by increases in accounts
	receivable and inventory. Net cash used by operating activities for the 2015 period was primarily attributable to an increase
	in inventory partially offset by net income, the utilization of the deferred tax assets, as well as increases in accounts payable
	and accrued expenses. Net cash provided by operating activities for the 2014 period was primarily attributable to a decrease in
	income taxes receivable, offset in part by an increase in inventory.


	 


	Net cash used by investing activities for
	the year ended December 31, 2016, was $1.7 million, compared with net cash used by investing activities of $3.3 million for the
	comparable 2015 period, and net cash used by investing activities of $8.0 million for the comparable 2014 period. The net cash
	used by investing activities for the 2016 period was primarily related to investment in general purpose equipment for the Company’s
	reclamations operations. The net cash used by investing activities for the 2015 period was primarily related to the acquisition
	of a refrigerant and compressed gases supplier, as well as investment in general purpose equipment for the Company’s Champaign,
	Illinois facility. The net cash used by investing activities for the 2014 period was primarily related to the acquisition of Polar
	Technologies, as well as investment in general purpose equipment for the Company’s Champaign, Illinois facility.


	 






	 



	16



	 







	 




	  


	Net cash provided by financing activities
	for the year ended December 31, 2016, was $25.1 million compared with net cash provided by financing activities of $14.2 million
	for the comparable 2015 period, and net cash provided by financing activities of $6.6 million for the comparable 2014 period.
	The net cash provided by financing activities for the 2016 period was primarily due to the proceeds from the issuance of common
	stock, offset by the repayment of debt and payment of deferred acquisition cost. The net cash provided by financing activities
	for the 2015 period was primarily due to increased borrowings on the PNC credit facility. The net cash provided by financing activities
	for the 2014 period was primarily due to the proceeds from the issuance of common stock, partially offset by the repayment of
	short term debt and long term debt.


	 


	The Company had cash and cash equivalents
	of $33.9 million and $1.3 million at December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively, with no debt currently outstanding under the current
	PNC facility. The Company may, to the extent necessary, continue to utilize its cash balances to purchase equipment primarily
	for its operations. The Company continues to assess its capital expenditure needs.


	 


	The following is a summary of the Company's
	significant contractual obligations for the periods indicated that existed as of December 31, 2016 (in 000’s)

	:



	 






	 


	 


	Twelve Month Period Ending December 31,


	 




	 


	 



	 


	2017



	 


	 



	 


	2018



	 


	 



	 


	2019



	 


	 



	 


	2020



	 


	 



	 


	2021



	 


	 



	 


	Thereafter



	 


	 



	 


	Total



	 




	Long and short term debt and capital lease  obligations:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Principal


	 


	$


	199


	 


	 


	$


	93


	 


	 


	$


	47


	 


	 


	$


	9


	 


	 


	$


	3


	 


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	$


	351


	 




	Estimated interest (1)


	 


	 


	10


	 


	 


	 


	5


	 


	 


	 


	1


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	16


	 




	Operating leases


	 


	 


	1,368


	 


	 


	 


	1,145


	 


	 


	 


	464


	 


	 


	 


	446


	 


	 


	 


	253


	 


	 


	 


	35


	 


	 


	 


	3,711


	 




	Acquisition earn out


	 


	 


	789


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	789


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total contractual obligations


	 


	$


	2,366


	 


	 


	$


	1,243


	 


	 


	$


	512


	 


	 


	$


	455


	 


	 


	$


	256


	 


	 


	$


	35


	 


	 


	$


	4,867


	 





	 


	(1) The estimated future interest payments
	on all debt other than revolving debt are based on the respective interest rates applied to the declining principal balances on
	each of the notes.


	 


	On June 22, 2012, a subsidiary of Hudson entered
	into a Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement (the “PNC Facility”) with PNC Bank, National Association,
	as agent (“Agent” or “PNC”), and such other lenders as may thereafter become a party to the PNC Facility.
	The Maximum Loan Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) is currently $50,000,000, and the Maximum Revolving Advance Amount (as
	defined in the PNC Facility) is $46,000,000. In December 2016, the Company repaid all of its debt under the current PNC facility.
	The Termination Date of the Facility (as defined in the PNC Facility) is June 30, 2020.


	 


	Under the terms of the original PNC Facility,
	as amended by the First Amendment to the PNC Facility, dated February 15, 2013, Hudson could initially borrow up to a maximum
	of $40,000,000 consisting of a term loan in the principal amount of $4,000,000 and revolving loans in a maximum amount up to $36,000,000.
	Amounts borrowed under the PNC Facility may be used by Hudson for working capital needs and to reimburse drawings under letters
	of credit.


	 


	Interest on loans under the PNC Facility is
	payable in arrears on the first day of each month with respect to loans bearing interest at the domestic rate (as set forth in
	the PNC Facility) and at the end of each interest period with respect to loans bearing interest at the Eurodollar Rate (as defined
	in the PNC Facility) or, for Eurodollar Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility) with an interest period in excess of three
	months, at the earlier of (a) each three months from the commencement of such Eurodollar Rate Loan or (b) the end of the interest
	period. Interest charges with respect to loans are computed on the actual principal amount of loans outstanding during the month
	at a rate per annum equal to (A) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility), the sum of the Alternate
	Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half of one percent (.50%) and (B) with respect to Eurodollar Rate Loans,
	the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%).


	 


	Hudson granted to PNC, for itself, and as
	agent for such other lenders as may thereafter become a lender under the PNC Facility, a security interest in Hudson’s receivables,
	intellectual property, general intangibles, inventory and certain other assets.


	 






	 



	17



	 







	 




	  


	The PNC Facility contains certain financial
	and non-financial covenants relating to Hudson, including limitations on Hudson’s ability to pay dividends on common stock
	or preferred stock, and also includes certain events of default, including payment defaults, breaches of representations and warranties,
	covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other obligations, events of bankruptcy and insolvency, certain ERISA events, judgments in
	excess of specified amounts, impairments to guarantees and a change of control. The PNC Facility contains a financial covenant
	to maintain at all times a Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio of not less than 1.10 to 1.00, tested quarterly on a rolling twelve month
	basis. Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio is defined in the PNC Facility, with respect to any fiscal period, as the ratio of (a) EBITDA
	of Hudson for such period, minus unfinanced capital expenditures (as defined in the PNC Facility) made by Hudson during such period,
	minus the aggregate amount of cash taxes paid by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of dividends and distributions
	made by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of payments made with cash by Hudson to satisfy soil sampling and
	reclamation related to environmental cleanup at the Company’s former Hillburn, NY facility during such period (to the extent
	not already included in the calculation of EBITDA as determined by the Agent) to (b) the aggregate amount of all principal payments
	due and/or made, except principal payments related to outstanding revolving advances with regard to all funded debt (as defined
	in the PNC Facility) of Hudson during such period, plus the aggregate interest expense of Hudson during such period. EBITDA as
	defined in the PNC Facility shall mean for any period the sum of (i) earnings before interest and taxes for such period plus (ii)
	depreciation expenses for such period, plus (iii) amortization expenses for such period, plus (iv) non-cash charges.


	 


	On October 25, 2013, the Company entered into
	the Second Amendment to the PNC facility (the “Second PNC Amendment”) which, among other things, waived the requirement
	to comply with the minimum fixed charge coverage ratio covenant of 1.10 to 1.00 for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2013,
	under the PNC Facility, and suspended the minimum fixed charge ratio covenant until the quarterly period ended March 31, 2015.


	 


	On July 2, 2014, the Company entered into
	the Third Amendment to the PNC Facility (the “Third PNC Amendment”) which, among other things, extended the term of
	PNC Facility. Pursuant to the Third PNC Amendment, which was effective June 30, 2014, the Termination Date of the PNC Facility
	(as defined in the PNC Facility) was extended to June 30, 2018.


	 


	On July 1, 2015, the Company entered into
	the Fourth Amendment to the PNC Facility (the “Fourth PNC Amendment”). The Fourth PNC Amendment redefined the “Revolving
	Interest Rate” as well as the “Term Loan Rate” (as defined in the PNC Facility) as follows:


	 


	“Revolving Interest Rate” shall
	mean an interest rate per annum equal to (a) the sum of the Alternate Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half
	of one percent (.50%) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans and (b) the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one
	percent (2.25%) with respect to the Eurodollar Rate Loans.


	 


	“Term Loan Rate” shall mean an
	interest rate per annum equal to (a) the sum of the Alternate Base Rate plus one half of one percent (.50%) with respect to the
	Domestic Rate Loans and (b) the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%) with respect to Eurodollar
	Rate Loans.


	 


	On April 8, 2016, the Company entered
	into the Fifth Amendment to the PNC Facility (the “Fifth PNC Amendment”). Pursuant to the Fifth PNC Amendment,
	the Maximum Loan Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been increased from $40,000,000 to $50,000,000, and the Maximum
	Revolving Advance Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been increased from $36,000,000 to $46,000,000. Additionally,
	pursuant to the Fifth PNC Amendment the Termination Date of the Facility (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been extended
	to June 30, 2020. In December 2016, the Company repaid its entire debt under the PNC Facility, with approximately $44 million
	of availability under the revolving line of credit at December 31, 2016. In addition, there is a $130,000 outstanding letter
	of credit under the PNC Facility at December 31, 2016.


	 


	The Company was in compliance with all covenants,
	under the PNC Facility as of December 31, 2016. The Company’s ability to comply with these covenants in future quarters
	may be affected by events beyond the Company’s control, including general economic conditions, weather conditions, regulations
	and refrigerant pricing. Although we expect to remain in compliance with all covenants in the PNC Facility, as amended, depending
	on our future operating performance and general economic conditions, we cannot make any assurance that we will continue to be
	in compliance.


	 


	The commitments under the PNC Facility will
	expire and the full outstanding principal amount of the loans, together with accrued and unpaid interest, are due and payable
	in full on June 30, 2020, unless the commitments are terminated for any reason or the outstanding principal amount of the loans
	are accelerated sooner following an event of default.


	 



	December 2016 Public Offering



	 


	On December 8, 2016 the Company entered into
	an Underwriting Agreement with two investment banking firms for themselves and as representatives for two other investment banking
	firms (collectively, the “Underwriters”), in connection with an underwritten offering (the “Offering”)
	of 6,428,571 shares of the Company’s common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the “Firm Shares”). Pursuant to
	the Underwriting Agreement, the Company agreed to sell to the Underwriters, and the Underwriters agreed to purchase from the Company,
	an aggregate of 6,428,571 shares of common stock and also granted the Underwriters a 30 day option to purchase up to 964,285 additional
	shares of its common stock to cover over-allotments, if any. The Company also agreed to reimburse certain expenses incurred by
	the Underwriters in the Offering.


	 


	The closing of the Offering was held on December
	14, 2016, at which time the Company sold 7,392,856 shares of its common stock to the Underwriters (including 964,285 shares to
	cover over-allotments) at a price to the public of $7.00 per share, less underwriting discounts and commissions, and received
	gross proceeds of $51.7 million. The Company incurred approximately $3.3 million of transaction fees in connection with the Offering,
	resulting in net proceeds of $48.4 million.


	 






	 



	18



	 







	 




	  


	The Company believes that it will be able
	to satisfy its working capital requirements for the foreseeable future from anticipated cash flows from operations and available
	funds under the PNC Facility. In addition, the proceeds from the Offering may be used for working capital and general corporate
	purposes which may include, among other things, funding additional acquisitions, although we have no present commitments or agreements
	with respect to any such transactions. Any unanticipated expenses, including, but not limited to, an increase in the cost of refrigerants
	purchased by the Company, an increase in operating expenses or failure to achieve expected revenues from the Company's RefrigerantSide®
	Services and/or refrigerant sales or additional expansion or acquisition costs that may arise in the future would adversely affect
	the Company's future capital needs. There can be no assurance that the Company's proposed or future plans will be successful,
	and as such, the Company may require additional capital sooner than anticipated, which capital may not be available on acceptable
	terms, or at all.


	 


	Inflation


	 


	Inflation has not historically had a material
	impact on the Company's operations.


	 


	Reliance on Suppliers and Customers


	 


	The Company participates in an industry that
	is highly regulated, and changes in the regulations affecting our business could affect our operating results. Currently the Company
	purchases virgin HCFC and HFC refrigerants and reclaimable, primarily HCFC and CFC, refrigerants from suppliers and its customers.
	Under the Act the phase-down of future production of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants commenced in 2010 and is scheduled to be
	fully phased out by the year 2020, and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out by the year 2030.
	To the extent that the Company is unable to source sufficient quantities of refrigerants or is unable to obtain refrigerants on
	commercially reasonable terms or experiences a decline in demand and/or price for refrigerants sold by it, the Company could realize
	reductions in revenue from refrigerant sales, which could have a material adverse effect on the Company’s operating results
	and financial position.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2016, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	30% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2016, there were no outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2015, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	33% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2015, there were no outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2014, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	25% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2014, there were $0.7 million in outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	The loss of a principal customer or a decline
	in the economic prospects of and/or a reduction in purchases of the Company's products or services by any such customer could
	have a material adverse effect on the Company's operating results and financial position.


	 


	Seasonality and Weather Conditions and
	Fluctuations in Operating Results


	 


	The Company's operating results vary from
	period to period as a result of weather conditions, requirements of potential customers, non-recurring refrigerant and service
	sales, availability and price of refrigerant products (virgin or reclaimable), changes in reclamation technology and regulations,
	timing in introduction and/or retrofit or replacement of refrigeration equipment, the rate of expansion of the Company's operations,
	and by other factors. The Company's business is seasonal in nature with peak sales of refrigerants occurring in the first nine
	months of each year. During past years, the seasonal decrease in sales of refrigerants has resulted in losses particularly in
	the fourth quarter of the year. In addition, to the extent that there is unseasonably cool weather throughout the spring and summer
	months, which would adversely affect the demand for refrigerants, there would be a corresponding negative impact on the Company.
	Delays or inability in securing adequate supplies of refrigerants at peak demand periods, lack of refrigerant demand, increased
	expenses, declining refrigerant prices and a loss of a principal customer could result in significant losses. There can be no
	assurance that the foregoing factors will not occur and result in a material adverse effect on the Company's financial position
	and significant losses. The Company believes that to a lesser extent there is a similar seasonal element to RefrigerantSide®
	Service revenues as refrigerant sales. The Company is continuing to assess its RefrigerantSide® Service revenues seasonal
	trend.


	 



	Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements



	 


	None.


	 






	 



	19



	 







	 




	  



	Recent Accounting Pronouncements



	 


	In August 2016, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update ("ASU") No. 2016-15, "Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments." This ASU
	addresses eight specific cash flow issues with the objective of eliminating the existing diversity in practice. The amendments
	in this ASU are effective for public business entities for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2017, and for interim periods
	therein. We elected to adopt ASU 2016-15 as of December 31, 2016, and the adoption did not have a material impact on the presentation
	of the statement of cash flows.


	 


	In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-13,
	"Financial Instruments - Credit Losses." This ASU requires an organization to measure all expected credit losses for
	financial assets held at the reporting date based on historical experience, current conditions, and reasonable and supportable
	forecasts. Financial institutions and other organizations will now use forward-looking information to better inform their credit
	loss estimates. The amendments in this ASU are effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2019, and for interim periods
	therein. The Company does not expect the amended standard to have a material impact on the Company’s results of operations.


	 


	In March 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-09,
	“Improvements to Employee Share-Based Payment Accounting.”

	Excess
	tax benefits and deficiencies will be recognized in the consolidated statement of earnings rather than capital in excess of par
	value of stock on a prospective basis. A policy election will be available to account for forfeitures as they occur, with the
	cumulative effect of the change recognized as an adjustment to retained earnings at the date of adoption. Excess tax benefits
	within the consolidated statement of cash flows will be presented as an operating activity (prospective or retrospective application)
	and cash payments to tax authorities in connection with shares withheld for statutory tax withholding requirements will be presented
	as a financing activity (retrospective application). The guidance is effective beginning in 2017.

	The Company expects that
	the future adoption of ASU No. 2016-09 will not have a material impact on the Company’s financial statements.


	 


	In February 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-02,
	"

	Leases (Topic 842)."

	The new standard establishes a right-of-use ("ROU") model that requires a lessee
	to record a ROU asset and a lease liability on the balance sheet for all leases with terms longer than 12 months. Leases will
	be classified as either finance or operating, with classification affecting the pattern of expense recognition in the statement
	of operations. This ASU is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018, including interim periods within those
	fiscal years and early adoption is permitted. A modified retrospective transition approach is required for capital and operating
	leases existing at, or entered into after, the beginning of the earliest comparative period presented in the financial statements,
	with certain practical expedients available. At a minimum, adoption of ASU 2016-02 will require recording a ROU asset and a lease
	liability on the Company's consolidated balance sheet; however, the Company is still currently evaluating the impact on its consolidated
	financial statements. See Note 10 for the current anticipated future operating lease payments.


	 


	In November 2015, the FASB issued ASU 2015-17,
	“Income Taxes (Topic 740) - Balance Sheet Classification of Deferred Taxes”. ASU 2015-17 requires that deferred tax
	liabilities and assets be classified as noncurrent in a classified statement of financial position. The amendments in ASU 2015-17
	apply to all entities that present a classified statement of financial position. The current requirement that deferred tax liabilities
	and assets of a tax-paying component of an entity be offset and presented as a single amount is not affected. For public business
	entities, the amendments in ASU 2015-17 are effective for financial statements issued for annual periods beginning after December
	15, 2016, and interim periods within those annual periods. The Company elected to early adopt ASU 2015-17 prospectively in the
	fourth quarter of 2016. As a result, all deferred tax assets and liabilities have been presented as noncurrent on the consolidated
	balance sheet as of December 31, 2016. There was no impact on our results of operations as a result of the adoption of ASU 2015-17
	and prior periods have not been adjusted.


	 


	In September 2015, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update No. 2015-16, “Business Combinations (Topic 805): Simplifying the Accounting for Measurement-Period Adjustments”, or
	ASU 2015-16. This amendment requires the acquirer in a business combination to recognize in the reporting period in which adjustment
	amounts are determined, any adjustments to provisional amounts that are identified during the measurement period, calculated as
	if the accounting had been completed at the acquisition date. Prior to the issuance of ASU 2015-16, an acquirer was required to
	restate prior period financial statements as of the acquisition date for adjustments to provisional amounts. The amendments in
	ASU 2015-16 are to be applied prospectively upon adoption. The Company adopted ASU 2015-16 in the fourth quarter of 2016. The
	adoption of the provisions of ASU 2015-16 did not have a material impact on its results of operations or financial position.


	 


	In May 2014, the FASB issued
	Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") 2014-09, "

	Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606)

	."
	The new revenue recognition standard provides a five-step analysis to determine when and how revenue is recognized. The
	standard requires that a company recognizes revenue to depict the transfer of promised goods or services to customers in an
	amount that reflects the consideration to which a company expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods or services.
	This ASU is effective for annual periods beginning after December 15, 2017 and will be applied retrospectively to each
	period presented or as a cumulative-effect adjustment as of the date of adoption. The Company is currently evaluating the
	impact of the pending adoption of ASU 2014-09.


	 






	 



	20



	 









	 




	  








	Item 7A. Quantitative
	and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk




	 



	Interest Rate Sensitivity




	 



	We are exposed to market risk from fluctuations
	in interest rates on the PNC Facility. The PNC Facility is a $50,000,000 secured facility. Interest on loans under the PNC Facility
	is payable in arrears on the first day of each month with respect to loans bearing interest at the domestic rate (as set forth
	in the PNC Facility) and at the end of each interest period with respect to loans bearing interest at the Eurodollar rate (as
	set forth in the PNC Facility) or, for Eurodollar rate loans with an interest period in excess of three months, at the earlier
	of (a) each three months from the commencement of such Eurodollar rate loan or (b) the end if he interest period. As of December
	31, 2016 interest charges with respect to loans are computed on the actual principal amount of loans outstanding during the month
	at a rate per annum equal to (A) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility), the sum of the Alternate
	Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half of one percent (.50%) and (B) with respect to Eurodollar Rate Loans,
	the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%). There was $0 outstanding balance on the PNC Facility
	as of December 31, 2016. Future interest rate changes on our borrowing under the PNC Facility may have an impact on our consolidated
	results of operations.



	 




	Refrigerant Market




	 



	We are also exposed to market risk from fluctuations
	in the demand, price and availability of refrigerants. To the extent that the Company is unable to source sufficient quantities
	of refrigerants or is unable to obtain refrigerants on commercially reasonable terms, or experiences a decline in demand and/or
	price for refrigerants sold by the Company, the Company could realize reductions in revenue from refrigerant sales or write downs
	of inventory, which could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations.



	 







	Item 8. Financial
	Statements and Supplementary Data



	 


	The financial statements appear in a separate
	section of this report following Part IV.






	 










	Item 9. Changes
	in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure



	 


	Not Applicable



	 







	Item 9A. Controls
	and Procedures



	 


	Disclosure Controls and Procedures



	 




	The Company,
	under the supervision and with the participation of the Company’s management, including the Company’s Chief Executive
	Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has evaluated the effectiveness of the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures,
	as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (“Exchange Act”), as of the end of
	the period covered by this report. Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer have
	concluded that the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective and provided reasonable assurance that information
	required to be disclosed in reports filed under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time
	periods specified in the rules and forms of the Securities and Exchange Commission, and that such information is accumulated and
	communicated to the Company’s management, including its principal executive officer and principal financial officer, as
	appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. Because of the inherent limitations in all control systems,
	any controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable assurance of achieving the
	desired control objectives, and management necessarily is required to apply its judgment in evaluating the cost-benefit relationship
	of possible controls and procedures. Furthermore, the Company’s controls and procedures can be circumvented by the individual
	acts of some persons, by collusion of two or more people or by management override of the control and misstatements due to error
	or fraud may occur and not be detected on a timely basis.



	 


	Changes in Internal Control over Financial
	Reporting


	 


	There were no changes in the Company’s
	internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act) during the quarter ended December
	31, 2016 that materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company’s internal control over financial
	reporting.


	 






	 



	21



	 







	 




	  



	Management’s Report on Internal Control
	over Financial Reporting





	 


	Management of the Company is responsible for
	establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting for the Company as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under
	the Exchange Act. The Company’s internal control over financial reporting is designed to provide reasonable assurance to
	the Company’s management and board of directors regarding the preparation and fair presentation of published financial statements
	and the reliability of financial reporting.


	 


	Because of its inherent limitations, internal
	control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Therefore, even those systems determined to be effective
	can provide only reasonable assurance with respect to financial statement preparation and presentation.


	 


	The Company’s Chief Executive Officer
	and Chief Financial Officer have assessed the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as
	of December 31, 2016. In making this assessment, the Company’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have
	used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”) in

	Internal
	Control – Integrated Framework (2013)

	. Based on our assessment, the Company’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief
	Financial Officer believe that, as of December 31, 2016, the Company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective
	based on those criteria.


	 


	BDO USA, LLP, the independent registered public
	accounting firm which audits our financial statements, has audited our internal control over financial reporting as of December
	31, 2016 and has expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.


	 






	 



	22



	 








	 




	  





	Report of Independent Registered Public
	Accounting Firm



	 


	Board of Directors and Stockholders


	 


	Hudson Technologies, Inc.


	Pearl River, NY


	 


	We have audited Hudson Technologies Inc.’s
	and Subsidiaries internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2016, based on criteria established in Internal
	Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (the
	COSO criteria). Hudson Technologies Inc.’s and Subsidiaries management is responsible for maintaining effective internal
	control over financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included
	in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an
	opinion on the company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit.


	 


	We conducted our audit in accordance with
	the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform
	the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all
	material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk
	that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on
	the assessed risk. Our audit also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We
	believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.


	 


	A company’s internal control over financial
	reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation
	of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal
	control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in
	reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable
	assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally
	accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations
	of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized
	acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.


	 


	Because of its inherent limitations, internal
	control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness
	to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree
	of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.


	 


	In our opinion, Hudson Technologies Inc. and
	Subsidiaries maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2016,
	based on the COSO criteria.


	 


	We also have audited, in accordance with the
	standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), the consolidated balance sheets of Hudson Technologies
	Inc. and Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2016 and 2015, and the consolidated statements of operations, stockholders’ equity,
	and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2016 and our report dated March 10, 2017 expressed
	an unqualified opinion thereon.


	 


	/s/ BDO USA, LLP


	 


	Stamford, CT


	March 10, 2017


	 






	 



	23



	 








	 




	  








	Item 9B. Other Information




	 


	None




	 





	Part III



	 








	Item
	10.  Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance




	 


	Reference is made
	to the disclosure required by Items 401, 405, 406, and 407(c)(3), (d)(4), and (d)(5) of Regulation S-K to be contained in the
	Registrant's definitive proxy statement to be mailed to stockholders on or about April 28, 2017, and to be filed with the Securities
	and Exchange Commission.



	 








	Item
	11.  Executive Compensation




	 


	Reference is made
	to the disclosure required by Items 402 and 407(e)(4) and (e)(5) of Regulation S-K to be contained in the Registrant's definitive
	proxy statement to be mailed to stockholders on or about April 28, 2017, and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.



	 








	Item
	12.  Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters




	 


	Reference is made
	to the disclosure required by Item 403 of Regulation S-K to be contained in the Registrant's definitive proxy statement to be
	mailed to stockholders on or about April 28, 2017, and to be filed with the Securities Exchange Commission.


	 





	Equity Compensation Plan



	 


	The following table provides certain information
	with respect to all of Hudson’s equity compensation plans as of December 31, 2016.


	 




	 


	 


	Number of securities to be

	issued upon exercise of

	outstanding
	options


	 


	 


	Weighted-average exercise

	price of outstanding options


	 


	 


	Number of securities remaining

	available for future issuance

	under
	equity compensation plans

	(excluding securities reflected

	 in column (a))


	 




	Plan Category


	 


	(a)


	 


	 


	(b)


	 


	 


	(c)


	 




	Equity compensation plans approved by security holders


	 


	 


	3,214,398


	 


	 


	$


	2.68


	 


	 


	 


	3,251,340


	 






	 








	Item
	13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence




	 


	Reference is made
	to the disclosure required by Items 404 and 407(a) of Regulation S-K to be contained in the Registrant's definitive proxy statement
	to be mailed to stockholders on or about April 28, 2017, and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.



	 








	Item
	14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services




	 


	Reference is made
	to the proposal regarding the approval of the Registrant's independent registered public accounting firm to be contained in the
	Registrant's definitive proxy statement to be mailed to stockholders on or about April 28, 2017, and to be filed with the Securities
	and Exchange Commission.


	 






	 



	24



	 







	 





	  





	Part IV







	 














	Item
	15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules









	 







	(A)(1)





	Financial Statements






	 



	The consolidated financial statements of Hudson Technologies,
	Inc. appear after Item 16 of this report






	(A)(2)





	Financial Statement Schedules






	 



	None






	(A)(3)





	Exhibits









	3.1




	Certificate of Incorporation and Amendment.  (1)






	3.2




	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation, dated July 20, 1994.  (1)






	3.3




	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation, dated October 26,
	1994.  (1)






	3.4




	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated March 16, 1999.  (2)






	3.5




	Certificate of Correction of the Certificate of Amendment dated
	March 25, 1999.  (2)






	3.6




	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated March 29, 1999.  (2)






	3.7




	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated February 16, 2001.  (4)






	3.8




	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation  dated
	March 20, 2002.  (5)






	3.9




	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated January 3, 2003.  (6)






	3.10




	Amended and Restated By-Laws adopted July 29, 2011. (14)






	3.11




	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated September 15, 2015.  (24)






	10.1




	Assignment of patent rights from Kevin J. Zugibe to Registrant.  (1)






	10.2




	1997 Stock Option Plan of the Company, as amended.  (3)
	*






	10.3



	2004 Stock Incentive Plan. (9)*





	10.4




	Commercial Mortgage, dated May 27, 2005, between Hudson Technologies
	Company and Busey Bank.  (7)






	10.5




	Commercial Installment Mortgage Note, dated May 27, 2005, between
	Hudson Technologies Company and Busey Bank. (7)






	10.6




	Amended and Restated Employment Agreement with Kevin J. Zugibe,
	as amended. (11)*






	10.7




	Agreement with Brian F. Coleman, as amended.  (11)*






	10.8




	Agreement with James R. Buscemi, as amended. (11)*






	10.9




	Agreement with Charles F. Harkins, as amended. (11)*






	10.10




	Agreement with Stephen P. Mandracchia, as amended. (11)*






	10.11




	2008 Stock Incentive Plan. (10)*






	10.12




	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock
	Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance. (11)*






	10.13




	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock
	Incentive Plan with options vesting in equal installments over two year period. (11)*






	10.14




	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008
	Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance. (11)*






	10.15




	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008
	Stock Incentive Plan with options vesting in equal installments over two year period. (11)*






	10.16




	First Amendment to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement
	with Kevin J. Zugibe, dated December 30, 2008. (11)*






	10.17




	Form of Warrant issued in the 2010 Offering. (12)






	10.18




	Form of Agreement and Consent, to amend warrants issued in connection
	with the 2010 Offering, dated March 7, 2011. (13)






	10.19




	Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement, dated June
	22, 2012, between Hudson Technologies Company as borrower and PNC Bank, National Association as lender and agent (15)






	10.20




	$23,000,000 Revolving Credit Note, dated June 22, 2012, by Hudson
	Technologies Company as borrower in favor of PNC (15)






	10.21




	$4,000,000 Term Note, dated June 22.2012, by Hudson Technologies
	Company as borrower in favor of PNC. (15)






	10.22




	Guaranty & Suretyship Agreement, dated June 22, 2012, made
	by Hudson Holdings, Inc. as guarantor on behalf of Hudson Technologies Company. (15)






	10.23




	Guaranty & Suretyship Agreement, dated June 22, 2012, made
	by the Company as guarantor on behalf of Hudson Technologies Company. (15)






	10.24




	Patent, Trademarks, and Copyrights Security Agreement, dated
	June 22, 2012, between the Company and PNC. (15)






	10.25




	Patent, Trademarks, and Copyrights Security Agreement, dated
	June 22, 2012, between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC. (15)






	10.26




	Long Term Care Insurance Plan Summary. (16)*






	10.27




	First Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan, and Security
	Agreement between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC dated February 15, 2013. (17)






	 






	 



	25



	 







	 




	  





	10.28




	$36,000,000 Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Note, dated
	February 15, 2013, by Hudson Technologies Company as borrower in favor of PNC. (17)






	10.29




	Guarantors’ Ratification dated February 15, 2013, by the
	Company and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (17)






	10.30




	Second Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security
	Agreement Between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC Bank, National Association dated October 25, 2013 (18)






	10.31




	Guarantors’ Ratification dated October 25, 2013 by Hudson
	Technologies, Inc. and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (18)






	10.32




	Amendment No. 1 to the Hudson Technologies, Inc. 2008 Stock
	Incentive Plan adopted October 22, 2013. (19) *






	10.33



	Underwriting Agreement between William Blair & Company, L.L.C., for itself and as representative of the several underwriters,
	and Hudson Technologies, Inc., dated June 6, 2014 (20)





	10.34



	Third Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement Between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC Bank,
	National Association, dated July 2, 2014 (21)





	10.35



	Guarantor’s Ratification, dated July 1, 2014, by Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (21)  





	10.36



	2014 Stock Incentive Plan (22)*




	10.37


	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.38


	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with options vesting in equal installments
	over two year period. (23)*




	10.39


	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.40


	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with options vesting in equal installments
	over two year period. (23)*




	10.41


	Form of Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance.
	(23)*




	10.42


	Form of Non-Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance.
	(23)*




	10.43


	Form of Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance.
	(23)*




	10.44


	Form of Non-Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance.
	(23)*




	10.45


	Fourth Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement Between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC Bank,
	National Association, dated July 1, 2015 (25)








	10.46


	Guarantor’s Ratification, dated July 1, 2015, by Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (25)




	10.47


	Second Amended and Restated Employment Agreement with Kevin J. Zugibe. (26)*




	10.48


	Amended and Restated Agreement with Brian Coleman (26)*




	10.49


	Fifth Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC, dated
	April 8, 2016. (27)




	10.50


	Second Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Note, dated April 8, 2016 by Hudson Technologies Company as borrower in favor
	of PNC. (27)




	10.51


	Guarantor’s’ Ratification, dated April 8, 2016 by the Registrant and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (27)




	10.52


	Agreement, dated September 5, 2016, between Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Nat Krishnumurti. (28)*




	10.53


	Underwriting Agreement among William Blair & Company, L.L.C. and Craig-Hallum Capital
	Group LLP, for themselves and as representatives of several underwriters, and Hudson Technologies, Inc. dated December 8, 2016.
	(29)









	14




	Code of Business Conduct and Ethics.  (8)






	21




	Subsidiaries of the Company. (30)






	23.1





	Consent of BDO USA,
	LLP. (30)

	 






	31.1





	Certification of
	Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.

	(30) 






	31.2





	Certification of
	Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. (30)

	 






	32.1




	Certification of the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18
	U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. (30)






	32.2




	Certification of the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18
	U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. (30)






	101





	Interactive data
	file pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T. (30)

	 





	 


	 







	 








	(1)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Registration Statement on Form SB-2 (No. 33-80279-NY).





	(2)


	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with the Company's Quarterly Report
	on Form 10-QSB for the quarter ended June 30, 1999.





	(3)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 1999.






	(4)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 2000.  





	 






	 



	26



	 







	 




	  





	(5)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 2001.






	(6)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 2002.






	(7)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-QSB for the quarter ended June 30, 2005.






	(8)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K, for the event dated March 3, 2005, and filed May 31, 2005.






	(9)




	Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s
	Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed August 18, 2004

	.

	 






	(10)




	Incorporated by reference to Appendix I to the Company’s
	Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed July 29, 2008.






	(11)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008.






	(12)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated July 1, 2010 and filed July 2, 2010.






	(13)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.






	(14)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form-10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.






	(15)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Report on Form 8-K for the event dated June 22, 2012 and filed June 28, 2012.






	(16)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012.






	(17)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated February 15, 2013 and filed February 20, 2013.






	(18)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated October 25, 2013 and filed October 31, 2013.






	(19)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.






	(20)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June 6, 2014.






	(21)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on July 7, 2014.






	(22)




	Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s
	Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed August 12, 2014

	.

	 






	(23)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014.






	(24)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2015.










	(25)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated July 7, 2015 and filed July 8, 2015.






	(26)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company Annual Report on form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015.






	(27)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 14, 2016.






	(28)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 9, 2016.






	(29)




	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed December 9, 2016.






	(30)




	Filed herewith






	(*)




	Denotes Management Compensation Plan, agreement or arrangement.





	 






	Item
	16. Form 10-K Summary




	None.


	 






	 



	27



	 







	 




	  





	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc.




	Consolidated Financial
	Statements




	 






	Contents



	 


	 




	 


	 


	 





	Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm



	 



	29






	Audited Consolidated Financial Statements:



	 


	 






	Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31,
	2016 and 2015




	 



	30







	Consolidated Statements of Operations for the
	years ended December 31, 2016, December 31, 2015, and December 31, 2014




	 



	31







	Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity
	for the years ended December 31, 2016, December 31, 2015, and December 31, 2014




	 



	32







	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the
	years ended December 31, 2016, December 31, 2015, and December 31, 2014




	 



	33







	Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements




	 



	34






	 






	 



	28



	 









	 




	  







	Report of Independent Registered Public
	Accounting Firm



	 


	Board of Directors and Stockholders


	 


	Hudson Technologies, Inc.


	Pearl River, NY


	 


	We have audited the accompanying consolidated
	balance sheets of Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2016 and 2015 and the related consolidated statements
	of operations, stockholders’ equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2016. These
	consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an
	opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits.


	 


	We conducted our audits in accordance with
	the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform
	the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement.
	An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements,
	assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation
	of the consolidated financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.


	 


	In our opinion, the consolidated financial
	statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Hudson Technologies, Inc. and
	subsidiaries at December 31, 2016 and 2015, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the three years in
	the period ended December 31, 2016, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.


	 


	We also have audited, in accordance with the
	standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), Hudson Technologies, Inc.’s internal control
	over financial reporting as of December 31, 2016, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework
	(2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) and our report dated March 10, 2017
	expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.


	 


	/s/ BDO USA, LLP


	 


	Stamford, CT


	March 10, 2017


	 






	 



	29



	 








	 




	  







	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc. and Subsidiaries




	Consolidated Balance
	Sheets



	(Amounts in thousands,
	except for share and par value amounts)


	 




	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current assets:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents


	 


	$


	33,931


	 


	 


	$


	1,258


	 




	Trade accounts receivable - net


	 


	 


	4,797


	 


	 


	 


	4,414


	 




	Inventories


	 


	 


	68,601


	 


	 


	 


	61,897


	 




	Deferred tax asset


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	376


	 




	Prepaid expenses and other current assets


	 


	 


	847


	 


	 


	 


	1,524


	 




	Total current assets


	 


	 


	108,176


	 


	 


	 


	69,469


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Property, plant and equipment, less accumulated depreciation


	 


	 


	7,532


	 


	 


	 


	7,536


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Deferred tax asset


	 


	 


	2,532


	 


	 


	 


	3,287


	 




	Goodwill


	 


	 


	856


	 


	 


	 


	856


	 




	Intangible assets, less accumulated amortization


	 


	 


	3,299


	 


	 


	 


	3,787


	 




	Other assets


	 


	 


	75


	 


	 


	 


	76


	 




	Total Assets


	 


	$


	122,470


	 


	 


	$


	85,011


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Trade accounts payable


	 


	$


	5,110


	 


	 


	$


	5,792


	 




	Accrued expenses and other current liabilities


	 


	 


	2,888


	 


	 


	 


	3,018


	 




	Accrued payroll


	 


	 


	1,782


	 


	 


	 


	1,577


	 




	Income taxes payable


	 


	 


	322


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Short-term debt and current maturities of long-term
	debt


	 


	 


	199




	 


	 


	20,573


	 




	Total current liabilities


	 


	 


	10,301


	 


	 


	 


	30,960


	 




	Other liabilities


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	333


	 




	Long-term debt, less current maturities


	 


	 


	152




	 


	 


	4,293


	 




	Total Liabilities


	 


	 


	10,453


	 


	 


	 


	35,586


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Commitments and contingencies


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stockholders' equity:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Preferred stock, shares authorized 5,000,000: Series
	A Convertible preferred stock, $0.01 par value ($100 liquidation preference value); shares authorized 150,000; none issued
	or outstanding


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Common stock, $0.01 par value; shares authorized 100,000,000;
	issued and outstanding 41,465,820 and 32,804,617


	 


	 


	415


	 


	 


	 


	328


	 




	Additional paid-in capital


	 


	 


	114,032


	 


	 


	 


	62,163


	 




	Accumulated deficit


	 


	 


	(2,430


	)


	 


	 


	(13,066


	)




	Total Stockholders' Equity


	 


	 


	112,017


	 


	 


	 


	49,425


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity


	 


	$


	122,470


	 


	 


	$


	85,011


	 





	 



	See Accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.




	 







	 



	30



	 







	 




	 







	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc. and Subsidiaries




	Consolidated Statements
	of Operations



	(Amounts in thousands,
	except for share and per share amounts)


	 




	 


	 


	For the years ended
	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Revenues


	 


	$


	105,481


	 


	 


	$


	79,722


	 


	 


	$


	55,810


	 




	Cost of sales


	 


	 


	74,395


	 


	 


	 


	61,233


	 


	 


	 


	49,364


	 




	Gross profit


	 


	 


	31,086


	 


	 


	 


	18,489


	 


	 


	 


	6,446


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Operating expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Selling and marketing


	 


	 


	4,310


	 


	 


	 


	4,179


	 


	 


	 


	2,723


	 




	General and administrative


	 


	 


	7,829


	 


	 


	 


	6,129


	 


	 


	 


	4,708


	 




	Total operating expenses


	 


	 


	12,139


	 


	 


	 


	10,308


	 


	 


	 


	7,431


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Operating income (loss)


	 


	 


	18,947


	 


	 


	 


	8,181


	 


	 


	 


	(985


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other income (expense):


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	(1,118


	)


	 


	 


	(776


	)


	 


	 


	(641


	)




	Other income (expense)


	 


	 


	(564


	)


	 


	 


	302


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Total other (expense)


	 


	 


	(1,682


	)


	 


	 


	(474


	)


	 


	 


	(641


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Income (loss) before income taxes


	 


	 


	17,265


	 


	 


	 


	7,707


	 


	 


	 


	(1,626


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Income tax expense (benefit)


	 


	 


	6,628


	 


	 


	 


	2,944


	 


	 


	 


	(906


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	10,637


	 


	 


	$


	4,763


	 


	 


	$


	(720


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss) per common share - Basic


	 


	$


	0.31


	 


	 


	$


	0.15


	 


	 


	$


	(0.02


	)




	Net income (loss) per common share - Diluted


	 


	$


	0.30


	 


	 


	$


	0.14


	 


	 


	$


	(0.02


	)






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – Basic


	 


	 


	34,104,476


	 


	 


	 


	32,546,840


	 


	 


	 


	29,122,746


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – Diluted


	 


	 


	35,416,910


	 


	 


	 


	33,936,099


	 


	 


	 


	29,122,746


	 






	 




	See Accompanying Notes to the Consolidated
	Financial Statements.




	 







	 



	31



	 







	 





	  








	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc. and Subsidiaries




	Consolidated Statements
	of Stockholders' Equity



	(Amounts in thousands,
	except for share amounts)


	 




	 


	 


	       Common
	Stock


	 


	 


	               Additional


	 


	 


	Accumulated


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	Shares


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	Paid-in Capital


	 


	 


	Deficit


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	Balance at January 1, 2014


	 


	 


	25,070,386


	 


	 


	$


	251


	 


	 


	$


	44,944


	 


	 


	$


	(17,109


	)


	 


	$


	28,086


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Sale of common stock


	 


	 


	6,900,000


	 


	 


	 


	69


	 


	 


	 


	15,547


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	15,616


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of common stock upon exercise of stock options


	 


	 


	341,890


	 


	 


	 


	3


	 


	 


	 


	306


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	309


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Value of share-based arrangements


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	708


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	708


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net loss


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	(720


	)


	 


	 


	(720


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Balance at December 31, 2014


	 


	 


	32,312,276


	 


	 


	$


	323


	 


	 


	$


	61,505


	 


	 


	$


	(17,829


	)


	 


	$


	43,999


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of common stock upon exercise of stock options and warrants


	 


	 


	482,506


	 


	 


	 


	5


	 


	 


	 


	455


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	460


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of common stock for services


	 


	 


	9,835


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	30


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	30


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Value of share-based arrangements


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	173


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	173


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	4,763


	 


	 


	 


	4,763


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Balance at December 31, 2015


	 


	 


	32,804,617


	 


	 


	$


	328


	 


	 


	$


	62,163


	 


	 


	$


	(13,066


	)


	 


	$


	49,425


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Sale of common stock


	 


	 


	7,392,856


	 


	 


	 


	74


	 


	 


	 


	48,282


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	48,356


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of common stock upon exercise of stock options and warrants


	 


	 


	1,251,199


	 


	 


	 


	13


	 


	 


	 


	2,691


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	2,704


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Excess tax benefits from exercise of stock options


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	189


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	189


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of common stock for services


	 


	 


	17,148


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	105


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	105


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Value of share-based arrangements


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	601


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	601


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	10,637


	 


	 


	 


	10,637


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Balance at December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	41,465,820


	 


	 


	$


	415


	 


	 


	$


	114,032


	 


	 


	$


	(2,430


	)


	 


	$


	112,017


	 





	 



	See Accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.




	 







	 



	32



	 







	 




	  







	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc. and Subsidiaries




	Consolidated Statements
	of Cash Flows



	(Amounts in thousands)


	 






	 


	 


	For the years ended
	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash flows from operating activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	10,637


	 


	 


	$


	4,763


	 


	 


	$


	(720


	)




	Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss):


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Depreciation and amortization


	 


	 


	2,225


	 


	 


	 


	2,072


	 


	 


	 


	979


	 




	Allowance for doubtful accounts


	 


	 


	21


	 


	 


	 


	99


	 


	 


	 


	31


	 




	Amortization of deferred finance cost


	 


	 


	154


	 


	 


	 


	75


	 


	 


	 


	112


	 




	Value of share-based payment arrangements


	 


	 


	706


	 


	 


	 


	203


	 


	 


	 


	708


	 




	Excess tax benefits from stock option exercise


	 


	 


	(189


	)


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Deferred tax expense (benefit)


	 


	 


	1,080


	 


	 


	 


	2,768


	 


	 


	 


	(857


	)




	Other non cash (income) expenses


	 


	 


	564


	 


	 


	 


	(302


	)


	 


	 


	414


	 




	Changes in assets and liabilities (net of acquisitions):


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Trade accounts receivable


	 


	 


	(404


	)


	 


	 


	(545


	)


	 


	 


	(293


	)




	Inventories


	 


	 


	(6,704


	)


	 


	 


	(23,430


	)


	 


	 


	(1,150


	)




	Prepaid and other assets


	 


	 


	523


	 


	 


	 


	(465


	)


	 


	 


	(548


	)




	Income taxes payable


	 


	 


	562


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	2,709


	 




	Accounts payable and accrued expenses


	 


	 


	173


	 


	 


	 


	4,259


	 


	 


	 


	316


	 




	Cash provided (used) by operating
	activities


	 


	 


	9,348


	 


	 


	 


	(10,503


	)


	 


	 


	1,701


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash flows from investing activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Payments for acquisitions


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	(2,424


	)


	 


	 


	(7,368


	)




	Additions to patents


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	(12


	)


	 


	 


	(10


	)




	Additions to property, plant and equipment


	 


	 


	(1,733


	)


	 


	 


	(889


	)


	 


	 


	(716


	)




	Investment in affiliates


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	63


	 




	Cash used in investing activities


	 


	 


	(1,733


	)


	 


	 


	(3,325


	)


	 


	 


	(8,031


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash flows from financing activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net proceeds from issuances of common stock


	 


	 


	51,060


	 


	 


	 


	460


	 


	 


	 


	15,925


	 




	Excess tax benefits from stock-based compensation


	 


	 


	189


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	(Repayments of) borrowing from short-term debt - net


	 


	 


	(20,227


	)


	 


	 


	14,172


	 


	 


	 


	(9,024


	)




	Proceeds from long-term debt


	 


	 


	61


	 


	 


	 


	292


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Repayment of long-term debt


	 


	 


	(4,349


	)


	 


	 


	(328


	)


	 


	 


	(305


	)




	Payment of deferred acquisition cost


	 


	 


	(1,676


	)


	 


	 


	(445


	)


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Cash provided by financing activities


	 


	 



	25,058



	 


	 


	 


	14,151


	 


	 


	 


	6,596


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Increase in cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	32,673


	 


	 


	 


	323


	 


	 


	 


	266


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period


	 


	 


	1,258


	 


	 


	 


	935


	 


	 


	 


	669


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents at
	end of period


	 


	$


	33,931


	 


	 


	$


	1,258


	 


	 


	$


	935


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental disclosure of cash flow information:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash paid during period for interest


	 


	$


	964


	 


	 


	$


	701


	 


	 


	$


	529


	 




	Cash paid for income taxes


	 


	$


	4,985


	 


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	$


	—


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Non cash investing activity:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Deferred acquisition cost


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	$


	1,982


	 


	 


	$


	667


	 







	 



	See Accompanying Notes
	to the Consolidated Financial Statements



	 






	 



	33



	 







	 




	  





	Hudson Technologies,
	Inc. and Subsidiaries






	Notes to the
	Consolidated Financial Statements



	 



	Note 1 -	Summary of Significant
	Accounting Policies



	 


	Business


	 


	Hudson Technologies, Inc., incorporated under
	the laws of New York on January 11, 1991, is a refrigerant services company providing innovative solutions to recurring problems
	within the refrigeration industry. The Company’s operations consist of one reportable segment. The Company's products and
	services are primarily used in commercial air conditioning, industrial processing and refrigeration systems, and include refrigerant
	and industrial gas sales, refrigerant management services consisting primarily of reclamation of refrigerants and RefrigerantSide®
	Services performed at a customer's site, consisting of system decontamination to remove moisture, oils and other contaminants.
	In addition, the Company’s SmartEnergy OPS

	TM

	service is a web-based real time continuous monitoring service applicable
	to a facility’s refrigeration systems and other energy systems. The Company’s Chiller Chemistry® and Chill Smart®
	services are also predictive and diagnostic service offerings. As a component of the Company’s products and services, the
	Company also participates in the generation of carbon offset projects. The Company operates principally through its wholly-owned
	subsidiary, Hudson Technologies Company. Unless the context requires otherwise, references to the “Company”, “Hudson”,
	“we", “us”, “our”, or similar pronouns refer to Hudson Technologies, Inc. and its subsidiaries.


	 


	In preparing the accompanying consolidated
	financial statements, and in accordance with ASC855-10 “Subsequent Events”, the Company’s management has evaluated
	subsequent events through the date that the financial statements were filed.


	 


	In the opinion of management, all estimates
	and adjustments considered necessary for a fair presentation have been included and all such adjustments were normal and recurring.


	 


	Consolidation


	 


	The consolidated financial statements represent
	all companies of which Hudson directly or indirectly has majority ownership or otherwise controls. Significant intercompany accounts
	and transactions have been eliminated. The Company's consolidated financial statements include the accounts of wholly-owned subsidiaries
	Hudson Holdings, Inc. and Hudson Technologies Company. The Company does not present a statement of comprehensive income as its
	comprehensive income is the same as its net income.


	 


	Fair Value of Financial Instruments


	 


	The carrying values of financial instruments
	including trade accounts receivable and accounts payable approximate fair value at December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2015, because
	of the relatively short maturity of these instruments. The carrying value of short and long-term debt approximates fair value,
	due to the variable rate nature of the debt, as of December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2015. Please see Note 2 for further details
	on fair value description and hierarchy of the Company’s deferred acquisition cost.


	 


	Credit Risk


	 


	Financial instruments, which potentially subject
	the Company to concentrations of credit risk, consist principally of temporary cash investments and trade accounts receivable.
	The Company maintains its temporary cash investments in highly-rated financial institutions and, at times, the balances exceed
	FDIC insurance coverage. The Company's trade accounts receivable are primarily due from companies throughout the United States.
	The Company reviews each customer's credit history before extending credit.


	 


	The Company establishes an allowance for doubtful
	accounts based on factors associated with the credit risk of specific accounts, historical trends, and other information. The
	carrying value of the Company’s accounts receivable is reduced by the established allowance for doubtful accounts. The allowance
	for doubtful accounts includes any accounts receivable balances that are determined to be uncollectible, along with a general
	reserve for the remaining accounts receivable balances. The Company adjusts its reserves based on factors that affect the collectability
	of the accounts receivable balances.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2016, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	30% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2016, there were no outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	For the year ended December 31, 2015, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	33% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2015, there were no outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 






	 



	34



	 







	 




	  


	For the year ended December 31, 2014, two
	customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company’s revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for
	25% of the Company’s revenues. At December 31, 2014, there were $0.7 million in outstanding receivables from these customers.


	 


	The loss of a principal customer or a decline
	in the economic prospects of and/or a reduction in purchases of the Company's products or services by any such customer could
	have a material adverse effect on the Company's operating results and financial position.


	 


	Cash and Cash Equivalents


	 


	Temporary investments with original maturities
	of ninety days or less are included in cash and cash equivalents.


	 


	Inventories


	 


	Inventories, consisting primarily of refrigerant
	products available for sale, are stated at the lower of cost, on a first-in first-out basis, or market. Where the market price
	of inventory is less than the related cost, the Company may be required to write down its inventory through a lower of cost or
	market adjustment, the impact of which would be reflected in cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Any such
	adjustment would be based on management’s judgment regarding future demand and market conditions and analysis of historical
	experience.


	 


	Property, Plant and Equipment


	 


	Property, plant and equipment are stated at
	cost, including internally manufactured equipment. The cost to complete equipment that is under construction is not considered
	to be material to the Company's financial position. Provision for depreciation is recorded (for financial reporting purposes)
	using the straight-line method over the useful lives of the respective assets. Leasehold improvements are amortized on a straight-line
	basis over the shorter of economic life or terms of the respective leases. Costs of maintenance and repairs are charged to expense
	when incurred.


	 


	Due to the specialized nature of the Company's
	business, it is possible that the Company's estimates of equipment useful life periods may change in the future.


	 


	Goodwill



	 



	Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase
	price over the fair value of the net assets acquired in business combinations accounted for under the purchase method of accounting.
	The Company performed the annual goodwill impairment assessment using a qualitative approach to determine whether it is more likely
	than not that the fair value of goodwill is less than its carrying value. In performing the qualitative assessment, we identify
	and consider the significance of relevant key factors, events, and circumstances that affect the fair value of our goodwill. These
	factors include external factors such as macroeconomic, industry, and market conditions, as well as entity-specific factors, such
	as our actual and planned financial performance. If the results of the qualitative assessment conclude that it is not more likely
	than not that the fair value of goodwill exceeds its carrying value, additional quantitative impairment testing is performed.


	 


	Revenues and Cost of Sales


	 


	Revenues are recorded upon completion
	of service or product shipment and passage of title to customers in accordance with contractual terms. The Company
	evaluates each sale to ensure collectability. In addition, each sale is based on an arrangement with the customer and the
	sales price to the customer is fixed. In July 2016 the Company was awarded, as prime contractor, a five-year contract,
	including a five-year renewal option, by the United States Defense Logistics Agency (“DLA”) for the management,
	supply, and sale of refrigerants, compressed gases, cylinders and related terms. Due to the contract containing multiple
	elements, the Company assessed the arrangement in accordance with Accounting Standards Codification
	(“ASC”) 605-25, 

	Revenue Recognition: Multiple-Element Arrangements

	. ASC 605-25 addresses when and how
	a company that is providing more than one revenue generating activity or deliverable should separate and account for a
	multiple element arrangement. The Company determined that the sale of refrigerants and the management services provided under
	the contract each have stand-alone value, and accordingly revenue related to the sale of product is recognized at the time of
	product shipment, and service revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the term of the arrangement. Annual service
	revenue under the contract is approximately $2.4 million, of which $1.3 million was recognized during 2016 and recorded in
	Product and related sales.


	 


	Cost of sales is recorded based on the cost
	of products shipped or services performed and related direct operating costs of the Company's facilities. To the extent that the
	Company charges its customers shipping fees, such amounts are included as a component of revenue and the corresponding costs are
	included as a component of cost of sales.


	 






	 



	35



	 







	 




	  


	The Company's revenues are derived from
	Product and related sales and RefrigerantSide® Services revenues. The revenues for each of
	these lines are as follows:


	 






	Years Ended December 31,


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Product and related sales


	 


	$


	101,344


	 


	 


	$


	75,154


	 


	 


	$


	50,460


	 




	RefrigerantSide

	®

	Services


	 


	 


	4,137


	 


	 


	 


	4,568


	 


	 


	 


	5,350


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	105,481


	 


	 


	$


	79,722


	 


	 


	$


	55,810


	 





	 


	Income Taxes


	 


	The Company utilizes the asset and liability
	method for recording deferred income taxes, which provides for the establishment of deferred tax asset or liability accounts based
	on the difference between tax and financial reporting bases of certain assets and liabilities. The tax benefit associated with
	the Company's net operating loss carry forwards (“NOLs”) is recognized to the extent that the Company is expected
	to recognize future taxable income. The Company assesses the recoverability of its deferred tax assets based on its expectation
	that it will recognize future taxable income and adjusts its valuation allowance accordingly. As of December 31, 2016 and 2015,
	the net deferred tax asset was $2.5 million and $3.7 million, respectively.


	 


	Certain states either do not allow or limit
	NOLs and as such the Company will be liable for certain state taxes. To the extent that the Company utilizes its NOLs, it will
	not pay tax on such income but may be subject to the federal alternative minimum tax. In addition, to the extent that the Company’s
	net income, if any, exceeds the annual NOL limitation it will pay income taxes based on existing statutory rates. Moreover, as
	a result of a “change in control”, as defined by the Internal Revenue Service, the Company’s ability to utilize
	its existing NOLs is subject to certain annual limitations. All of the Company’s remaining $5.4 million of NOLs are subject
	to annual limitations of $1.3 million.


	 


	As a result of an Internal Revenue Service
	audit, the 2013 and prior federal tax years have been closed. The Company operates in many states throughout the United States
	and, as of December 31, 2016, the various states’ statutes of limitations remain open for tax years subsequent to 2009.
	The Company recognizes interest and penalties, if any, relating to income taxes as a component of the provision for income taxes.


	 


	The Company evaluates uncertain tax positions,
	if any, by determining if it is more likely than not to be sustained upon examination by the taxing authorities. As of December
	31, 2016 and 2015, the Company had no uncertain tax positions.


	 


	Income per Common and Equivalent Shares


	 


	If dilutive, common equivalent shares (common
	shares assuming exercise of options and warrants) utilizing the treasury stock method are considered in the presentation of diluted
	earnings per share. The reconciliation of shares used to determine net income per share is as follows (dollars in thousands):


	 






	 


	 


	Years  ended
	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$ 


	10,637


	 


	 


	$ 


	4,763


	 


	 


	$ 


	(720


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Weighted average number of shares - basic


	 


	 


	34,104,476


	 


	 


	 


	32,546,840


	 


	 


	 


	29,122,746


	 




	Shares underlying warrants


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	300,846


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Shares underlying options


	 


	 


	1,312,434


	 


	 


	 


	1,088,413


	 


	 


	 


	—


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – diluted


	 


	 


	35,416,910


	 


	 


	 


	33,936,099


	 


	 


	 


	29,122,746


	 





	 


	During the years ended December 31, 2016,
	2015 and 2014, certain options and warrants aggregating 73,034, 106,290 and 4,449,624 shares, respectively, have been excluded
	from the calculation of diluted shares, due to the fact that their effect would be anti-dilutive.


	 


	Estimates and Risks


	 


	The preparation of financial statements in
	conformity with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States requires management to make estimates and assumptions
	that affect reported amounts of certain assets and liabilities, the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities, and the results
	of operations during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from these estimates.


	 






	 



	36



	 







	 




	  


	The Company utilizes both internal and external
	sources to evaluate potential current and future liabilities for various commitments and contingencies. In the event that the
	assumptions or conditions change in the future, the estimates could differ from the original estimates.


	 


	Several of the Company's accounting policies
	involve significant judgments, uncertainties and estimates. The Company bases its estimates on historical experience and on various
	other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments
	about the carrying values of assets and liabilities. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions
	or conditions. To the extent that actual results differ from management's judgments and estimates, there could be a material adverse
	effect on the Company. On a continuous basis, the Company evaluates its estimates, including, but not limited to, those estimates
	related to its allowance for doubtful accounts, inventory reserves, and valuation allowance for the deferred tax assets relating
	to its NOLs and commitments and contingencies. With respect to accounts receivable, the Company estimates the necessary allowance
	for doubtful accounts based on both historical and anticipated trends of payment history and the ability of the customer to fulfill
	its obligations. For inventory, the Company evaluates both current and anticipated sales prices of its products to determine if
	a write down of inventory to net realizable value is necessary. In determining the Company’s valuation allowance for its
	deferred tax assets, the Company assesses its ability to generate taxable income in the future.


	 


	The Company participates in an industry that
	is highly regulated, and changes in the regulations affecting our business could affect our operating results. Currently the Company
	purchases virgin hydrochlorofluorocarbon (“HCFC”) and hydrofluorocarbon (“HFC”) refrigerants and reclaimable,
	primarily HCFC, HFC and chlorofluorocarbon (“CFC”), refrigerants from suppliers and its customers. Effective January
	1, 1996, the Clean Air Act (the “Act”) prohibited the production of virgin CFC refrigerants and limited the production
	of virgin HCFC refrigerants. Effective January 2004, the Act further limited the production of virgin HCFC refrigerants and federal
	regulations were enacted which established production and consumption allowances for HCFC refrigerants which imposed limitations
	on the importation of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants. Under the Act, production of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled
	to be phased out during the period 2010 through 2020, and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased
	out by 2030. In April 2013, the Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) published a final rule providing for the production
	or importation of 63 million and 51 million pounds of HCFC-22 in 2013 and 2014, respectively. In October 2014, the EPA published
	a final rule providing further reductions in the production and consumption allowances for virgin HCFC refrigerants for the years
	2015 through 2019 (the “Final Rule”). In the Final Rule, the EPA has established a linear draw down for the production
	or importation of virgin HCFC-22 that started at approximately 22 million pounds in 2015 and reduces by approximately 4.5 million
	pounds each year and ends at zero in 2020.


	 


	To the extent that the Company is unable to
	source sufficient quantities of refrigerants or is unable to obtain refrigerants on commercially reasonable terms or experiences
	a decline in demand and/or price for refrigerants sold by the Company, the Company could realize reductions in revenue from refrigerant
	sales, which could have a material adverse effect on its operating results and its financial position.


	 


	The Company is subject to various legal proceedings.
	The Company assesses the merit and potential liability associated with each of these proceedings. In addition, the Company estimates
	potential liability, if any, related to these matters. To the extent that these estimates are not accurate, or circumstances change
	in the future, the Company could realize liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on its operating results and
	its financial position.



	 



	Impairment of Long-lived Assets


	 


	The Company reviews long-lived assets for
	impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. Recoverability
	of assets to be held and used is measured by a comparison of the carrying amount of the assets to the future net cash flows expected
	to be generated by the asset. If such assets are considered to be impaired, the impairment to be recognized is measured by the
	amount by which the carrying amount of the assets exceeds the fair value of the assets. Assets to be disposed of are reported
	at the lower of the carrying amount or fair value less the cost to sell.


	 


	Recent Accounting Pronouncements


	 


	In August 2016, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update ("ASU") No. 2016-15, "Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments." This ASU
	addresses eight specific cash flow issues with the objective of eliminating the existing diversity in practice. The amendments
	in this ASU are effective for public business entities for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2017, and for interim periods
	therein. We elected to adopt ASU 2016-15 as of December 31, 2016, and the adoption did not have a material impact on the presentation
	of the statement of cash flows.


	 


	In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-13,
	"Financial Instruments - Credit Losses." This ASU requires an organization to measure all expected credit losses for
	financial assets held at the reporting date based on historical experience, current conditions, and reasonable and supportable
	forecasts. Financial institutions and other organizations will now use forward-looking information to better inform their credit
	loss estimates. The amendments in this ASU are effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2019, and for interim periods
	therein. The Company does not expect the amended standard to have a material impact on the Company’s results of operations.


	 






	 



	37



	 







	 




	  


	In March 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-09,
	“Improvements to Employee Share-Based Payment Accounting.”

	Excess
	tax benefits and deficiencies will be recognized in the consolidated statement of earnings rather than capital in excess of par
	value of stock on a prospective basis. A policy election will be available to account for forfeitures as they occur, with the
	cumulative effect of the change recognized as an adjustment to retained earnings at the date of adoption. Excess tax benefits
	within the consolidated statement of cash flows will be presented as an operating activity (prospective or retrospective application)
	and cash payments to tax authorities in connection with shares withheld for statutory tax withholding requirements will be presented
	as a financing activity (retrospective application). The guidance is effective beginning in 2017.

	The Company expects that
	the future adoption of ASU No. 2016-09 will not have a material impact on the Company’s financial statements.


	 


	In February 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-02,
	"

	Leases (Topic 842)."

	The new standard establishes a right-of-use ("ROU") model that requires a lessee
	to record a ROU asset and a lease liability on the balance sheet for all leases with terms longer than 12 months. Leases will
	be classified as either finance or operating, with classification affecting the pattern of expense recognition in the statement
	of operations. This ASU is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018, including interim periods within those
	fiscal years and early adoption is permitted. A modified retrospective transition approach is required for capital and operating
	leases existing at, or entered into after, the beginning of the earliest comparative period presented in the financial statements,
	with certain practical expedients available. At a minimum, adoption of ASU 2016-02 will require recording a ROU asset and a lease
	liability on the Company's consolidated balance sheet; however, the Company is still currently evaluating the impact on its consolidated
	financial statements. See Note 10 for the current anticipated future operating lease payments.


	 


	In November 2015, the FASB issued ASU 2015-17,
	“Income Taxes (Topic 740) - Balance Sheet Classification of Deferred Taxes”. ASU 2015-17 requires that deferred tax
	liabilities and assets be classified as noncurrent in a classified statement of financial position. The amendments in ASU 2015-17
	apply to all entities that present a classified statement of financial position. The current requirement that deferred tax liabilities
	and assets of a tax-paying component of an entity be offset and presented as a single amount is not affected. For public business
	entities, the amendments in ASU 2015-17 are effective for financial statements issued for annual periods beginning after December
	15, 2016, and interim periods within those annual periods. The Company elected to early adopt ASU 2015-17 prospectively in the
	fourth quarter of 2016. As a result, all deferred tax assets and liabilities have been presented as noncurrent on the consolidated
	balance sheet as of December 31, 2016. There was no impact on our results of operations as a result of the adoption of ASU 2015-17
	and prior periods have not been adjusted.


	 


	In September 2015, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update No. 2015-16, “Business Combinations (Topic 805): Simplifying the Accounting for Measurement-Period Adjustments”, or
	ASU 2015-16. This amendment requires the acquirer in a business combination to recognize in the reporting period in which adjustment
	amounts are determined, any adjustments to provisional amounts that are identified during the measurement period, calculated as
	if the accounting had been completed at the acquisition date. Prior to the issuance of ASU 2015-16, an acquirer was required to
	restate prior period financial statements as of the acquisition date for adjustments to provisional amounts. The amendments in
	ASU 2015-16 are to be applied prospectively upon adoption. The Company adopted ASU 2015-16 in the fourth quarter of 2016. The
	adoption of the provisions of ASU 2015-16 did not have a material impact on its results of operations or financial position.


	 


	In May 2014, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update ("ASU") 2014-09, "

	Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606)

	." The new revenue
	recognition standard provides a five-step analysis to determine when and how revenue is recognized. The standard requires that
	a company recognizes revenue to depict the transfer of promised goods or services to customers in an amount that reflects the
	consideration to which a company expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods or services. This ASU is effective for annual
	periods beginning after December 15, 2017 and will be applied retrospectively to each period presented or as a cumulative-effect
	adjustment as of the date of adoption. The Company is currently evaluating the impact of the pending adoption of ASU 2014-09.


	  



	Note 2- Fair Value



	 


	ASC Subtopic 820-10 defines fair value as
	the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between
	market participants at the measurement date. The Company often utilizes certain assumptions that market participants would
	use in pricing the asset or liability, including assumptions about risk and/or the risks inherent in the inputs to the
	valuation technique. These inputs can be readily observable, market-corroborated, or generally unobservable inputs. The
	Company utilizes valuation techniques that maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs.
	Based upon observable inputs used in the valuation techniques, the Company is required to provide information according to
	the fair value hierarchy.


	 






	 



	38



	 







	 




	  


	The fair value hierarchy ranks the quality
	and reliability of the information used to determine fair values into three broad levels as follows:


	 


	Level 1: Valuations for assets and liabilities
	traded in active markets from readily available pricing sources for market transactions involving identical assets or liabilities.


	 


	Level 2: Valuations for assets and liabilities
	traded in less active dealer or broker markets.  Valuations are obtained from third-party pricing services for identical
	or similar assets or liabilities.


	 


	Level 3: Valuations for assets and liabilities
	include certain unobservable inputs in the assumptions and projections used in determining the fair value assigned to such assets
	or liabilities.


	 


	In instances where the determination of the
	fair value measurement is based on inputs from different levels of the fair value hierarchy, the level in the fair value hierarchy
	within which the entire fair value measurement falls is based on the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value
	measurement in its entirety. The Company's assessment of the significance of a particular input to the fair value measurement
	in its entirety requires judgment, and considers factors specific to the asset or liability. The valuation methodologies used
	for the Company's financial instruments measured on a recurring basis at fair value, including the general classification of such
	instruments pursuant to the valuation hierarchy, is set forth in the tables below.


	 






	(in thousands)


	 


	As of December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	Fair Value Measurements


	 




	 


	 


	Carrying Amount


	 


	 


	Fair Value


	 


	 


	Level 1


	 


	 


	Level 2


	 


	 


	Level 3


	 




	Liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Deferred acquisition cost


	 


	$


	789


	 


	 


	$


	789


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	$


	789


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	As of December 31, 2015


	 


	 


	Fair Value Measurements


	 




	 


	 


	Carrying Amount


	 


	 


	Fair Value


	 


	 


	Level 1


	 


	 


	Level 2


	 


	 


	Level 3


	 




	Liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Deferred acquisition cost


	 


	$


	1,902


	 


	 


	$


	1,902


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	$


	1,902


	 





	 


	The following is a rollforward of deferred
	acquisition costs in 2015 and 2016.


	 






	(in thousands)


	 


	Acquisition of Polar


	 


	 



	2015


	Acquisition

	(1)




	 


	 


	Total Deferred

	Acquisition Cost

	Payable


	 




	Balance at January 1, 2015


	 


	$


	667


	 


	 


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	 


	$


	667


	 




	2015 Acquisition (1)


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	 


	1,982


	 


	 


	 


	 


	1,982


	 




	Payments


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	 


	(445


	)


	 


	 


	 


	(445


	)




	Total adjustments included in earnings


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	 


	(302


	)


	 


	 


	 


	(302


	)




	Balance at December, 31, 2015


	 


	$


	667


	 


	 


	 


	$


	1,235


	 


	 


	 


	$


	1,902


	 




	Payments


	 


	 


	(667


	)


	 


	 


	 


	(1,010


	)


	 


	 


	 


	(1,677


	)




	Total adjustments included in earnings


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	 


	564


	 


	 


	 


	 


	564


	 




	Balance at December 31, 2016


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	 


	$


	789


	 


	 


	 


	$


	789


	 





	 


	(1) Represents acquisition of a supplier
	of refrigerants and compressed gases in January 2015.


	 


	Note 3 - Trade accounts receivable -
	net


	 


	At December 31, 2016, 2015, and
	2014 trade accounts receivable are net of reserves for doubtful accounts of $0.4 million, $0.3 million and $0.2 million,
	respectively. The following table represents the activity occurring in the reserves for doubtful accounts in 2016, 2015 and
	2014.


	 






	(in thousands)


	 


	Beginning Balance

	at January 1


	 


	 


	Net additions charged to

	Operations


	 


	 


	Deductions and Other

	(1)


	 


	 


	Ending Balance

	at December 31


	 




	2016


	 


	$


	335


	 


	 


	$


	21


	 


	 


	$


	9


	 


	 


	$


	365


	 




	2015


	 


	$


	244


	 


	 


	$


	99


	 


	 


	$


	(8


	)


	 


	$


	335


	 




	2014


	 


	$


	227


	 


	 


	$


	31


	 


	 


	$


	(14


	)


	 


	$


	244


	 





	 






	(1)


	2016 includes a reclassification
	adjustment not affecting operations




	 




	Note 4- Inventories


	 


	Inventories, net of reserve, consist of the
	following:


	 







	 

	December
	31

	,





	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Refrigerant and cylinders


	 


	$


	11,168


	 


	 


	$


	11,167


	 




	Packaged refrigerants


	 


	 


	57,433


	 


	 


	 


	50,730


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	68,601


	 


	 


	$


	61,897


	 





	 






	 



	39



	 







	 




	  






	Note 5 - Property, plant and equipment


	 


	Elements of property, plant and equipment
	are as follows:


	 






	December
	31

	,





	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	Estimated Lives




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Property, plant and equipment


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 - Land


	 


	$


	535


	 


	 


	$


	535


	 


	 


	 




	 - Buildings


	 


	 


	830


	 


	 


	 


	830


	 


	 


	39 years




	 - Building improvements


	 


	 


	873


	 


	 


	 


	810


	 


	 


	39 years




	 - Equipment


	 


	 


	13,423


	 


	 


	 


	13,206


	 


	 


	3-7 years




	 - Equipment under capital lease


	 


	 


	248


	 


	 


	 


	234


	 


	 


	5-7 years




	 - Vehicles


	 


	 


	1,360


	 


	 


	 


	1,311


	 


	 


	5 years




	 - Lab and computer equipment, software


	 


	 


	2,652


	 


	 


	 


	2,499


	 


	 


	3-5 years




	 - Furniture & fixtures


	 


	 


	289


	 


	 


	 


	276


	 


	 


	7-8 years




	 - Leasehold improvements


	 


	 


	119


	 


	 


	 


	110


	 


	 


	3 years




	 - Equipment under construction


	 


	 


	1,654


	 


	 


	 


	491


	 


	 


	 




	Subtotal


	 


	 


	21,983


	 


	 


	 


	20,302


	 


	 


	 




	Accumulated depreciation


	 


	 


	14,451


	 


	 


	 


	12,766


	 


	 


	 




	 Total


	 


	$


	7,532


	 


	 


	$


	7,536


	 









	 



	Depreciation
	expense for the years ended December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014 was $1.7 million, $1.6 million, and $0.9 million, respectively.



	 


	Note 6 - Income taxes


	 


	Income tax expense (benefit) for the years
	ended December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014 was $6.6 million, $2.9 million and ($0.9 million), respectively. The income tax expense
	(benefit) for each of the years ended December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014 was for federal and state income tax at statutory rates
	applied to the pre-tax income (loss) for each of the periods.


	 


	The following summarizes the (benefit) / provision
	for income taxes:


	 






	Years Ended December 31,


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Federal


	 


	$


	4,981


	 


	 


	$


	174


	 


	 


	$


	0


	 




	State and local


	 


	 


	567


	 


	 


	 


	2


	 


	 


	 


	(49


	)




	 


	 


	 


	5,548


	 


	 


	 


	176


	 


	 


	 


	(49


	)




	Deferred:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Federal


	 


	 


	949


	 


	 


	 


	2,460


	 


	 


	 


	(767


	)




	State and local


	 


	 


	131


	 


	 


	 


	308


	 


	 


	 


	(90


	)




	 


	 


	 


	1,080


	 


	 


	 


	2,768


	 


	 


	 


	(857


	)




	Expense (benefit) for income taxes


	 


	$


	6,628


	 


	 


	$


	2,944


	 


	 


	$


	(906


	)





	  


	Reconciliation of the Company's actual tax
	rate to the U.S. Federal statutory rate is as follows:


	 






	Years ended December 31,


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 





	Income tax rates



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 - Statutory U.S. federal rate


	 


	 


	35


	%


	 


	 


	34


	%


	 


	 


	34


	%




	 - States, net U.S. benefits


	 


	 


	3


	%


	 


	 


	4


	%


	 


	 


	4


	%




	 - Tax benefit from prior year


	 


	 


	0


	%


	 


	 


	0


	%


	 


	 


	18


	%




	Total


	 


	 


	38


	%


	 


	 


	38


	%


	 


	 


	56


	%





	 


	As of December 31, 2016, the Company had NOL's
	of approximately $5.4 million expiring through 2023, all of which are subject to annual limitations of $1.3 million.


	 






	 



	40



	 







	 




	  


	Elements of deferred income tax assets (liabilities)
	are as follows:


	 








	December
	31

	,





	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Deferred tax assets (liabilities)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 - Depreciation & amortization


	 


	$


	(236


	)


	 


	$


	(412


	)




	 - Reserves for doubtful accounts


	 


	 


	139


	 


	 


	 


	127


	 




	 - Inventory reserve


	 


	 


	304


	 


	 


	 


	250


	 




	 - Non qualified stock options


	 


	 


	247


	 


	 


	 


	108


	 




	 - NOL


	 


	 


	2,078


	 


	 


	 


	3,430


	 




	 - AMT credit carryforward


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	160


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	2,532


	 


	 


	$


	3,663


	 





	 



	As discussed
	above in Note 1, the Company elected to early adopt ASU 2015-17 prospectively in the fourth quarter of 2016. As a result,
	all deferred tax assets and liabilities have been presented as noncurrent on the consolidated balance sheet as of December 31,
	2016.




	 




	The Company
	considered its projected future taxable income, and associated annual limitations, in determining the amount of deferred tax assets
	to recognize. The Company believes that given the extended time period that it may recognize its deferred tax assets, it is more
	likely than not it will realize the benefit of these assets prior to their expiration.



	 


	Note 7 – Goodwill and intangible
	assets


	 


	Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase
	price over the fair value of the net assets acquired in business combinations accounted for under the purchase method of accounting.
	The Company performed the annual goodwill impairment assessment using a qualitative approach to determine whether it is more likely
	than not that the fair value of goodwill is less than its carrying value. In performing the qualitative assessment, we identify
	and consider the significance of relevant key factors, events, and circumstances that affect the fair value of our goodwill. These
	factors include external factors such as macroeconomic, industry, and market conditions, as well as entity-specific factors, such
	as our actual and planned financial performance. If the results of the qualitative assessment conclude that it is not more likely
	than not that the fair value of goodwill exceeds its carrying value, additional quantitative impairment testing is performed.


	 


	The impairment test was performed at the operating
	segment level as the acquired businesses have been fully integrated into our existing structure. Based on the results of the impairment
	assessment performed, we concluded that it is more likely than not that the fair value of our goodwill significantly exceeds the
	carrying value.



	 



	At December 31, 2016 the Company had $0.9
	million of goodwill, of which $0.4 million is attributable to the acquisition of Polar Technologies, LLC and $0.4 million is attributable
	to the acquisition of a supplier of refrigerants and compressed gases. Please see Note 12 for further details.


	 


	The Company’s other intangible assets consist
	of the following:


	 






	December 31,


	 


	 


	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 




	                  2015




	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	Amortization


	 


	 


	Gross


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Gross


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	Period


	 


	 


	Carrying


	 


	 


	Accumulated


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Carrying


	 


	 


	Accumulated


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	(in years)


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	Amortization


	 


	 


	Net


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	Amortization


	 


	 


	Net


	 




	Intangible Assets with determinable lives


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Patents


	 


	 


	5


	 


	 


	$


	386


	 


	 


	$


	366


	 


	 


	$


	20


	 


	 


	$


	387


	 


	 


	$


	352


	 


	 


	$


	35


	 




	Covenant Not to Compete


	 


	 



	6 - 10



	 


	 


	 


	1,270


	 


	 


	 


	322


	 


	 


	 


	948


	 


	 


	 


	1,270


	 


	 


	 


	171


	 


	 


	 


	1,099


	 




	Customer Relationships


	 


	 



	3 - 10



	 


	 


	 


	2,000


	 


	 


	 


	452


	 


	 


	 


	1,548


	 


	 


	 


	2,000


	 


	 


	 


	236


	 


	 


	 


	1,764


	 




	Trade Name


	 


	 


	2


	 


	 


	 


	30


	 


	 


	 


	30


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 


	 


	 


	30


	 


	 


	 


	24


	 


	 


	 


	6


	 




	Licenses


	 


	 


	10


	 


	 


	 


	1,000


	 


	 


	 


	217


	 


	 


	 


	783


	 


	 


	 


	1,000


	 


	 


	 


	117


	 


	 


	 


	883


	 




	Totals identifiable intangible assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	4,686


	 


	 


	$


	1,387


	 


	 


	$


	3,299


	 


	 


	$


	4,687


	 


	 


	$


	900


	 


	 


	$


	3,787


	 





	 


	Intangible assets are reviewed for impairment
	whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset or asset group may not be recoverable.
	No impairments were recognized for the years ended December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2015.


	 


	The amortization of intangible assets for
	the years ended December 31, 2016, 2015, and 2014 were $0.5 million, $0.5 million and $0.1 million respectively. Future estimated
	amortization expense is as follows: 2017 - $0.5 million, 2018 - $0.4 million, 2019 - $0.4 million, 2020 - $0.4 million, 2021-
	$0.4 million and thereafter - $1.1 million.


	 






	 



	41



	 







	 




	  




	Note 8 - Short-term and long-term debt


	 


	Elements of short-term and long-term debt
	are as follows:


	 






	December
	31

	,





	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Short-term & long-term debt


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Short-term debt:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 - Bank credit line


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	$


	20,227


	 




	 - Long-term debt: current


	 


	 


	199


	 


	 


	 


	346


	 




	Subtotal


	 


	 


	199


	 


	 


	 


	20,573


	 




	Long-term debt:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 - Bank credit line


	 


	 


	—


	 


	 


	 


	4,000


	 




	 - Building and land mortgage


	 


	 


	93


	 


	 


	 


	260


	 




	 - Vehicle and equipment loans


	 


	 


	70


	 


	 


	 


	145


	 




	 - Capital lease obligations


	 


	 


	188


	 


	 


	 


	234


	 




	 - Less: current maturities


	 


	 


	(199


	)


	 


	 


	(346


	)




	Subtotal


	 


	 


	152


	 


	 


	 


	4,293


	 




	Total short-term & long-term debt


	 


	$


	351


	 


	 


	$


	24,866


	 





	 


	Bank Credit Line


	 


	On June 22, 2012, a subsidiary of Hudson
	entered into a Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement (the “PNC Facility”) with PNC Bank, National
	Association, as agent (“Agent” or “PNC”), and such other lenders as may thereafter become a party to
	the PNC Facility. The Maximum Loan Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) is currently $50,000,000, and the Maximum
	Revolving Advance Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) is $46,000,000. In December 2016, the Company repaid all of its
	debt under the current PNC Facility, with approximately $44 million of availability under the revolving line of credit at
	December 31, 2016. In addition, there is a $130,000 outstanding letter of credit under the PNC Facility at December
	31, 2016. The Termination Date of the Facility (as defined in the PNC Facility) is June 30, 2020.


	 


	Under the terms of the original PNC Facility,
	as amended by the First Amendment to the PNC Facility, dated February 15, 2013, Hudson could initially borrow up to a maximum
	of $40,000,000 consisting of a term loan in the principal amount of $4,000,000 and revolving loans in a maximum amount up to $36,000,000.
	Amounts borrowed under the PNC Facility may be used by Hudson for working capital needs and to reimburse drawings under letters
	of credit.


	 


	Interest on loans under the PNC Facility is
	payable in arrears on the first day of each month with respect to loans bearing interest at the domestic rate (as set forth in
	the PNC Facility) and at the end of each interest period with respect to loans bearing interest at the Eurodollar Rate (as defined
	in the PNC Facility) or, for Eurodollar Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility) with an interest period in excess of three
	months, at the earlier of (a) each three months from the commencement of such Eurodollar Rate Loan or (b) the end of the interest
	period. Interest charges with respect to loans are computed on the actual principal amount of loans outstanding during the month
	at a rate per annum equal to (A) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility), the sum of the Alternate
	Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half of one percent (.50%) and (B) with respect to Eurodollar Rate Loans,
	the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%).


	 


	Hudson granted to PNC, for itself, and as
	agent for such other lenders as may thereafter become a lender under the PNC Facility, a security interest in Hudson’s receivables,
	intellectual property, general intangibles, inventory and certain other assets.


	 


	The PNC Facility contains certain financial
	and non-financial covenants relating to Hudson, including limitations on Hudson’s ability to pay dividends on common stock
	or preferred stock, and also includes certain events of default, including payment defaults, breaches of representations and warranties,
	covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other obligations, events of bankruptcy and insolvency, certain ERISA events, judgments in
	excess of specified amounts, impairments to guarantees and a change of control. The PNC Facility contains a financial covenant
	to maintain at all times a Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio of not less than 1.10 to 1.00, tested quarterly on a rolling twelve month
	basis. Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio is defined in the PNC Facility, with respect to any fiscal period, as the ratio of (a) EBITDA
	of Hudson for such period, minus unfinanced capital expenditures (as defined in the PNC Facility) made by Hudson during such period,
	minus the aggregate amount of cash taxes paid by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of dividends and distributions
	made by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of payments made with cash by Hudson to satisfy soil sampling and
	reclamation related to environmental cleanup at the Company’s former Hillburn, NY facility during such period (to the extent
	not already included in the calculation of EBITDA as determined by the Agent) to (b) the aggregate amount of all principal payments
	due and/or made, except principal payments related to outstanding revolving advances with regard to all funded debt (as defined
	in the PNC Facility) of Hudson during such period, plus the aggregate interest expense of Hudson during such period. EBITDA as
	defined in the PNC Facility shall mean for any period the sum of (i) earnings before interest and taxes for such period plus (ii)
	depreciation expenses for such period, plus (iii) amortization expenses for such period, plus (iv) non-cash charges.


	 






	 



	42



	 







	 




	  


	On October 25, 2013, the Company entered into
	the Second Amendment to the PNC facility (the “Second PNC Amendment”) which, among other things, waived the requirement
	to comply with the minimum fixed charge coverage ratio covenant of 1.10 to 1.00 for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2013,
	under the PNC Facility, and suspended the minimum fixed charge ratio covenant until the quarterly period ended March 31, 2015.


	 


	On July 2, 2014, the Company entered into
	the Third Amendment to the PNC Facility (the “Third PNC Amendment”) which, among other things, extended the term of
	PNC Facility. Pursuant to the Third PNC Amendment, which was effective June 30, 2014, the Termination Date of the PNC Facility
	(as defined in the PNC Facility) was extended to June 30, 2018.


	 


	On July 1, 2015, the Company entered into
	the Fourth Amendment to the PNC Facility (the “Fourth PNC Amendment”). The Fourth PNC Amendment redefined the “Revolving
	Interest Rate” as well as the “Term Loan Rate” (as defined in the PNC Facility) as follows:


	 


	“Revolving Interest Rate” shall
	mean an interest rate per annum equal to (a) the sum of the Alternate Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half
	of one percent (.50%) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans and (b) the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one
	percent (2.25%) with respect to the Eurodollar Rate Loans.


	 


	“Term Loan Rate” shall mean an
	interest rate per annum equal to (a) the sum of the Alternate Base Rate plus one half of one percent (.50%) with respect to the
	Domestic Rate Loans and (b) the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%) with respect to Eurodollar
	Rate Loans.


	 


	On April 8, 2016, the Company entered into
	the Fifth Amendment to the PNC Facility (the “Fifth PNC Amendment”). Pursuant to the Fifth PNC Amendment, the Maximum
	Loan Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been increased from $40,000,000 to $50,000,000, and the Maximum Revolving Advance
	Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been increased from $36,000,000 to $46,000,000. Additionally, pursuant to the Fifth
	PNC Amendment the Termination Date of the Facility (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been extended to June 30, 2020. In December
	2016, the Company repaid its entire debt under the PNC Facility.


	  


	The Company was in compliance with all covenants,
	under the PNC Facility as of December 31, 2016. The Company’s ability to comply with these covenants in future quarters
	may be affected by events beyond the Company’s control, including general economic conditions, weather conditions, regulations
	and refrigerant pricing. Although we expect to remain in compliance with all covenants in the PNC Facility, as amended, depending
	on our future operating performance and general economic conditions, we cannot make any assurance that we will continue to be
	in compliance.


	 


	The commitments under the PNC Facility will
	expire and the full outstanding principal amount of the loans, together with accrued and unpaid interest, are due and payable
	in full on June 30, 2020, unless the commitments are terminated for any reason or the outstanding principal amount of the loans
	are accelerated sooner following an event of default.



	 



	Building and Land Mortgage


	 


	On June 1, 2012, the Company entered into
	a mortgage note with Busey Bank for $855,000. The note bears interest at the fixed rate of 4% per annum, amortizing over 60 months
	and maturing on June 1, 2017. The mortgage note is secured by the Company’s land and building located in Champaign, Illinois.
	At December 31, 2016 the principal balance of this mortgage note was $93,000.


	 


	Vehicle and Equipment Loans


	 


	The Company has entered into various vehicle
	and equipment loans. These loans are payable in 60 monthly payments through March 2020 and bear interest ranging from 0.0% to
	6.7%.


	 



	Capital Lease Obligations




	 



	The Company rents certain equipment with a
	net book value of approximately $249,000 at December 31, 2016 under leases which have been classified as capital leases. Scheduled
	future minimum lease payments under capital leases, net of interest, are as follows:


	 






	Years ended December 31,


	 


	Amount


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	-2017


	 


	$


	82


	 




	-2018


	 


	 


	82


	 




	-2019


	 


	 


	31


	 




	-2020


	 


	 


	6


	 




	-2021


	 


	 


	3


	 




	Subtotal


	 


	 


	204


	 




	Less interest expense


	 


	 


	(16


	)




	Total


	 


	$


	188


	 





	 






	 



	43



	 







	 




	  


	Scheduled maturities of the Company's long-term
	debt and capital lease obligations are as follows:


	 






	Years ended December 31,


	 


	Amount


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	-2018


	 


	$


	93


	 




	-2019


	 


	 


	47


	 




	-2020


	 


	 


	9


	 




	-2021


	 


	 


	3


	 




	Thereafter


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	152


	 






	 



	Note 9 - Stockholders' equity


	 


	On July 7, 2010, the Company sold 2,737,500
	units, with the aggregate units consisting of 2,737,500 shares of the Company’s common stock and warrants to purchase 1,368,750
	shares, at a price of $2.00 per unit in a registered direct offering (the “2010 Offering”). The warrants issued as
	part of the 2010 Offering had an exercise price of $2.60 per share and were exercisable for a five-year period, which commenced
	on January 7, 2011. The net proceeds pursuant to the 2010 Offering were approximately $4.9 million. The value of the aggregate
	number of warrants issued pursuant to the 2010 Offering was approximately $1,300,000 and such amount was charged as a component
	of stockholders’ equity to additional paid-in capital.


	 


	Effective as of March 4, 2011, the Company
	re-purchased warrants to purchase 150,000 shares of the Company’s common stock, at a price of $0.60 per share, which warrants
	were issued in connection with the 2010 Offering.


	 


	On March 7, 2011, the remaining 1,218,750
	warrants issued in connection with the 2010 Offering were amended upon consent of the holders of more than two-thirds of the remaining
	warrants, to among other things, extend the expiration date of the warrants to July 7, 2016.


	 


	Between January 2016 and July
	2016, 1,161,252 warrants issued in connection with the 2010 Offering were exercised at $2.60 per share. In July 2016, 7,498
	warrants issued in connection with the 2010 Offering expired.


	 


	On December 8, 2016 the Company entered into
	an Underwriting Agreement with two investment banking firms for themselves and as representatives for two other investment banking
	firms (collectively, the “Underwriters”), in connection with an underwritten offering (the “Offering”)
	of 6,428,571 shares of the Company’s common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the “Firm Shares”). Pursuant to
	the Underwriting Agreement, the Company agreed to sell to the Underwriters, and the Underwriters agreed to purchase from the Company,
	an aggregate of 6,428,571 shares of common stock and also granted the Underwriters a 30 day option to purchase up to 964,285 additional
	shares of its common stock to cover over-allotments, if any. The Company also agreed to reimburse certain expenses incurred by
	the Underwriters in the Offering.


	 


	The closing of the Offering was held on December
	14, 2016, at which time the Company sold 7,392,856 shares of its common stock to the Underwriters (including 964,285 shares to
	cover over-allotments) at a price to the public of $7.00 per share, less underwriting discounts and commissions, and received
	gross proceeds of $51.7 million. The Company incurred approximately $3.3 million of transaction fees in connection with the Offering,
	resulting in net proceeds of $48.4 million.


	 



	Note 10 - Commitments and contingencies



	 


	Rents and operating leases


	 


	Hudson utilizes leased facilities and operates
	equipment under non-cancelable operating leases through August 31, 2022 as follows:


	 




	Properties


	 




	Location


	 


	Annual Rent


	 


	 


	Lease Expiration

	Date




	Auburn, Washington


	 


	$


	39,000


	 


	 


	8/2018




	Baton Rouge, Louisiana


	 


	$


	23,000


	 


	 


	5/2019




	Champaign, Illinois


	 


	$


	504,000


	 


	 


	12/2018




	Charlotte, North Carolina


	 


	$


	26,000


	 


	 


	5/2019




	Escondido, California


	 


	$


	36,000


	 


	 


	Month to Month




	Hampstead, New Hampshire


	 


	$


	52,000


	 


	 


	8/2022




	Nashville, Tennessee


	 


	$


	173,000


	 


	 


	3/2018




	Ontario, California


	 


	$


	90,000


	 


	 


	12/2018




	Pearl River, New York


	 


	$


	150,000


	 


	 


	12/2021




	Pottsboro, Texas


	 


	$


	6,000


	 


	 


	8/2017




	Catano, Puerto Rico


	 


	$


	124,000


	 


	 


	12/2020




	Stony Point, New York


	 


	$


	90,000


	 


	 


	6/2021




	Tulsa, Oklahoma


	 


	$


	27,000


	 


	 


	12/2017





	 






	 



	44



	 







	 




	  


	The Company rents properties and various equipment
	under operating leases. Rent expense for the years ended December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014 totaled approximately $1.4 million,
	$1.2 million and $0.8 million, respectively. In addition to the properties above, the Company does at times utilize public warehouse
	space on a month to month basis. The Company typically enters into short-term leases for the facilities and wherever possible
	extends the expiration date of such leases.


	 


	Future commitments under operating leases
	are summarized as follows:


	 






	Years ended December 31,


	 


	Amount


	 




	(in thousands)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	-2017


	 


	$


	1,368


	 




	-2018


	 


	 


	1,145


	 




	-2019


	 


	 


	464


	 




	-2020


	 


	 


	446


	 




	-2021


	 


	 


	253


	 




	Thereafter


	 


	 


	35


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	3,711


	 





	Legal Proceedings


	 


	On April 1, 1999, the Company reported a release
	of approximately 7,800 lbs. of R-11 refrigerant (the “1999 Release”), at its former leased facility in Hillburn, NY
	(the “Hillburn Facility”), which the Company vacated in June 2006.


	 


	Since September 2000, last modified in March
	2013, the Company signed an Order on Consent with the New York State Department of Environmental Conservation (“DEC”)
	whereby the Company agreed to operate a remediation system to reduce R-11 refrigerant levels in the groundwater under and around
	the Hillburn Facility and agreed to perform periodic testing at the Hillburn Facility until remaining groundwater contamination
	has been effectively abated. The Company accrued, as an expense in its consolidated financial statements, the costs that the Company
	believes it will incur in connection with its compliance with the Order of Consent through December 31, 2018. There can be no
	assurance that additional testing will not be required or that the Company will not incur additional costs and such costs in excess
	of the Company’s estimate may have a material adverse effect on the Company financial condition or results of operations.
	The Company has exhausted all insurance proceeds available for the 1999 Release under all applicable policies.


	 


	In May 2000, the Hillburn Facility as a result
	of the 1999 Release, was nominated by EPA for listing on the National Priorities List (“NPL”) pursuant to CERCLA.
	In September 2003, the EPA advised the Company that it had no current plans to finalize the process for listing of the Hillburn
	Facility on the NPL.


	 


	During the years ended December 31, 2016,
	2015 and 2014 the Company incurred $0, $0, and $53,000, respectively, in additional remediation costs in connection with the matters
	above. The remaining liability on the Company’s Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2016 is approximately $0.1 million. There
	can be no assurance that the ultimate outcome of the 1999 Release will not have a material adverse effect on the Company's financial
	condition and results of operations. There can be no assurance that the EPA will not change its current plans and seek to finalize
	the process of listing the Hillburn Facility on the NPL, or that the ultimate outcome of such a listing will not have a material
	adverse effect on the Company's financial condition and results of operations.


	 


	Note 11 - Share-Based Compensation


	 


	Share-based compensation represents the cost
	related to share-based awards, typically stock options or stock grants, granted to employees, non-employees, officers and directors.
	Share-based compensation is measured at grant date, based on the estimated aggregate fair value of the award on the grant date,
	and such amount is charged to compensation expense on a straight-line basis (net of estimated forfeitures) over the requisite
	service period. For the years ended 2016, 2015 and 2014, the share-based compensation expense of $0.6 million, $0.2 million and
	$0.7 million, respectively, is reflected in general and administrative expenses in the consolidated Statements of Operations.


	 






	 



	45



	 







	 




	  


	Share-based awards have historically been
	made as stock options, and recently during the third quarter 2015 as stock grants, issued pursuant to the terms of the Company’s
	stock option and stock incentive plans, (collectively, the “Plans”), described below. The Plans may be administered
	by the Board of Directors or the Compensation Committee of the Board or by another committee appointed by the Board from among
	its members as provided in the Plans. Presently, the Plans are administered by the Company’s Compensation Committee of the
	Board of Directors. As of December 31, 2016, the Plans authorized the issuance of stock options to purchase 6,000,000 shares `of
	the Company’s common stock and, as of December 31, 2016 there were 3,251,340 shares of the Company’s common stock
	available for issuance for future stock option grants or other stock based awards.


	 


	Stock option awards, which allow the recipient
	to purchase shares of the Company’s common stock at a fixed price, are typically granted at an exercise price equal to the
	Company’s stock price at the date of grant. Typically, the Company’s stock option awards have vested from immediately
	to two years from the grant date and have had a contractual term ranging from three to ten years.


	 


	During the years ended December 31, 2016,
	2015 and 2014, the Company issued options to purchase 1,170,534 shares, 164,506 shares and 1,055,500 shares, respectively. During
	the years ended 2016, 2015 and 2014, the Company issued stock grants of 17,148 shares, 9,835 shares and no shares, respectively.


	 


	Effective July 25, 1997, the Company adopted
	its 1997 Employee Stock Option Plan, which was amended on August 19, 1999, (“1997 Plan”) pursuant to which 2,000,000
	shares of common stock were reserved for issuance upon the exercise of options designated as either (i) incentive stock options
	(“ISOs”) under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the “Code”), or (ii) nonqualified options.
	ISOs could be granted under the 1997 Plan to employees and officers of the Company. Non-qualified options could be granted to
	consultants, directors (whether or not they are employees), employees or officers of the Company. Stock appreciation rights could
	also be issued in tandem with stock options. Effective June 11, 2007, the Company’s ability to grant options or stock appreciation
	rights under the 1997 Plan expired.


	 


	Effective September 10, 2004, the Company
	adopted its 2004 Stock Incentive Plan (“2004 Plan”) pursuant to which 2,500,000 shares of common stock were reserved
	for issuance (i) upon the exercise of options, designated as either ISOs under the Code or nonqualified options, or (ii) as stock,
	deferred stock or other stock-based awards. ISOs could be granted under the 2004 Plan to employees and officers of the Company.
	Non-qualified options, stock, deferred stock or other stock-based awards could be granted to consultants, directors (whether or
	not they are employees), employees or officers of the Company. Stock appreciation rights could also be issued in tandem with stock
	options. Effective September 10, 2014, the Company’s ability to grant options or other awards under the 2004 Plan expired.


	 


	Effective August 27, 2008, the Company adopted
	its 2008 Stock Incentive Plan (“2008 Plan”) pursuant to which 3,000,000 shares of common stock were reserved for issuance
	(i) upon the exercise of options, designated as either ISOs under the Code or nonqualified options, or (ii) as stock, deferred
	stock or other stock-based awards. ISOs may be granted under the 2008 Plan to employees and officers of the Company. Non-qualified
	options, stock, deferred stock or other stock-based awards may be granted to consultants, directors (whether or not they are employees),
	employees or officers of the Company. Stock appreciation rights may also be issued in tandem with stock options. Unless the 2008
	Plan is sooner terminated, the ability to grant options or other awards under the 2008 Plan will expire on August 27, 2018.


	 


	ISOs granted under the 2008 Plan may not be
	granted at a price less than the fair market value of the common stock on the date of grant (or 110% of fair market value in the
	case of persons holding 10% or more of the voting stock of the Company). Nonqualified options granted under the 2008 Plan may
	not be granted at a price less than the fair market value of the common stock. Options granted under the 2008 Plan expire not
	more than ten years from the date of grant (five years in the case of ISOs granted to persons holding 10% or more of the voting
	stock of the Company).


	 


	Effective September 17, 2014, the Company
	adopted its 2014 Stock Incentive Plan (“2014 Plan”) pursuant to which 3,000,000 shares of common stock were reserved
	for issuance (i) upon the exercise of options, designated as either ISOs under the Code or nonqualified options, or (ii) as stock,
	deferred stock or other stock-based awards. ISOs may be granted under the 2014 Plan to employees and officers of the Company.
	Non-qualified options, stock, deferred stock or other stock-based awards may be granted to consultants, directors (whether or
	not they are employees), employees or officers of the Company. Stock appreciation rights may also be issued in tandem with stock
	options. Unless the 2014 Plan is sooner terminated, the ability to grant options or other awards under the 2014 Plan will expire
	on September 17, 2024.


	 


	ISOs granted under the 2014 Plan may not be
	granted at a price less than the fair market value of the common stock on the date of grant (or 110% of fair market value in the
	case of persons holding 10% or more of the voting stock of the Company). Nonqualified options granted under the 2014 Plan may
	not be granted at a price less than the fair market value of the common stock. Options granted under the 2014 Plan expire not
	more than ten years from the date of grant (five years in the case of ISOs granted to persons holding 10% or more of the voting
	stock of the Company).


	 


	All stock options have been granted to employees
	and non-employees at exercise prices equal to or in excess of the market value on the date of the grant.


	 






	 



	46



	 







	 




	  


	The Company determines the fair value of share
	based awards at the grant date by using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model, and is incorporating the simplified method to
	compute expected lives of share based awards with the following weighted-average assumptions:



	 









	Years
	ended





	December 31,




	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	Assumptions


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Dividend yield


	 


	 


	0


	%


	 


	 


	0


	%


	 


	 


	0


	%




	Risk free interest rate


	 


	 



	0.%-1.0



	%


	 


	 



	0.83%-1.03



	%


	 


	 



	1.00%-1.69



	%




	Expected volatility


	 


	 



	47%-53



	%


	 


	 



	49%-60



	%


	 


	 



	59%-66



	%




	Expected lives


	 


	 



	3 years



	 


	 


	 



	3 years



	 


	 


	 



	3-5 years



	 





	 


	A summary of the activity for the Company's
	Plans for the indicated periods is presented below:


	 






	Stock Option Plan Totals


	 


	Shares


	 


	 




	Weighted





	Average





	Exercise Price




	 




	Outstanding at December 31, 2013


	 


	 


	2,517,911


	 


	 


	$


	1.33


	 




	-Exercised


	 


	 


	(292,537


	)


	 


	$


	1.03


	 




	-Granted


	 


	 


	1,055,500


	 


	 


	$


	3.28


	 




	Outstanding at December 31, 2014


	 


	 


	3,280,874


	 


	 


	$


	1.98


	 




	-Cancelled


	 


	 


	(132,500


	)


	 


	$


	3.72


	 




	-Exercised


	 


	 


	(679,291


	)


	 


	$


	1.65


	 




	-Granted


	 


	 


	164,506


	 


	 


	$


	3.28


	 




	Outstanding at December
	31, 2015


	 


	 


	2,633,589


	 


	 


	$


	2.06


	 




	-Exercised


	 


	 


	(589,725


	)


	 


	$


	2.43


	 




	-Granted


	 


	 


	1,170,534


	 


	 


	$


	3.95


	 




	Outstanding at December
	31, 2016


	 


	 



	3,214,398



	 


	 


	$


	2.68


	 





	 


	The following is the weighted average contractual
	life in years and the weighted average exercise price at December 31, 2016 and 2015 of:


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted Average


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	Number of


	 


	 


	Remaining


	 


	Weighted Average


	 




	2016


	 


	Options


	 


	 


	Contractual Life


	 


	Exercise Price


	 




	Options outstanding


	 


	 


	3,214,398


	 


	 


	2.0 years


	 


	$


	2.68


	 




	Options vested


	 


	 


	1,191,368


	 


	 


	3.0 years


	 


	$


	3.94


	 




	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted Average


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	Number of


	 


	 


	Remaining


	 


	Weighted Average


	 




	2015


	 


	Options


	 


	 


	Contractual Life


	 


	Exercise Price


	 




	Options outstanding


	 


	 


	2,633,589


	 


	 


	2.8 years


	 


	$


	2.06


	 




	Options vested


	 


	 


	2,612,755


	 


	 


	2.8 years


	 


	$


	2.05


	 





	 


	The intrinsic values of options outstanding
	at December 31, 2016 and 2015 are $17.1 million and $2.8 million respectively.


	 


	The intrinsic values of options vested and
	exercised during the years ended 2016, 2015 and 2014 were as follows

	:



	 






	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2014


	 




	Intrinsic value of options vested


	 


	$


	4,843,774


	 


	 


	$


	5,000


	 


	 


	$


	535,000


	 




	Intrinsic value of options exercised


	 


	$


	1,777,476


	 


	 


	$


	1,309,000


	 


	 


	$


	793,000


	 





	 


	Note 12 - Acquisitions


	 


	On November 5, 2014 the Company purchased
	certain assets from Polar Technologies, LLC (“Polar”) related to its refrigerant reclamation business and facilities
	in Nashville, Tennessee; Ontario, California, and San Juan, Puerto Rico; hiring approximately thirty-two Polar employees associated
	with the business. The purchase price for this acquisition was $8.0 million. A portion of the purchase price was to be paid in
	the future pursuant to the purchase agreement. The preliminary asset allocation reflected in the December 31, 2014 financial statements
	was approximately $5.4 million of tangible assets, approximately $2.3 million of intangible assets, and approximately $0.3 million
	of goodwill. The intangible assets are being amortized over a period of 2 to 10 years. The goodwill recognized as part of the
	acquisition, is deductible for tax purposes.


	 






	 



	47



	 







	 




	  


	As of December 31, 2015 the valuation and
	allocation of the purchase price for Polar was finalized resulting in an increase in tangible assets of $0.2 million, as well
	as an increase in goodwill of $0.2 million and a decrease in intangible assets of $0.3 million. This final valuation was reflected
	in the December 31, 2015 financial statements.


	 


	The results of the Polar operations are included
	in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations from the date of acquisition and are not material to the Company’s
	financial position or results of operations.


	 


	On January 16, 2015, the Company acquired
	certain assets of a supplier of refrigerants and compressed gases, and also hired three employees associated with the business.
	The purchase price for this acquisition was $2.4 million cash paid at closing and the assumption of a liability of $20,000, and
	a maximum of an additional $3.0 million of deferred acquisition cost, or earn-out. The preliminary asset allocation was approximately
	$1.6 million of tangible assets, approximately $1.5 million of intangible assets, and approximately $2.3 million of goodwill.


	 


	As of December 31, 2015 the valuation and
	allocation of the purchase price for this acquisition was finalized. As part of that process it was determined that the deferred
	acquisition cost payable that had been previously recorded at the maximum earn out of $3.0 million per the purchase agreement
	was overstated by approximately $1.0 million. This adjustment to the deferred acquisition cost payable resulted in lowering the
	purchase price from approximately $5.4 million to approximately $4.4 million. The final valuation resulted in a reduction in goodwill
	by approximately $1.9 million, and increase in intangible assets of approximately $0.8 million and an increase in current assets
	of approximately $0.1 million. This final valuation, as well as the respective changes in the amortization of intangibles, was
	reflected in the December 31, 2015 financial statements.


	 


	Please see table in Note 2 for a rollforward
	of the deferred acquisition cost. During the year ended December 31, 2015, approximately $0.4 million of the 2015 deferred acquisition
	cost liability was paid. During the year ended December 31, 2015, as a result of reduced earnings, the Company reduced the deferred
	acquisition cost liability by approximately $0.3 million, which was reflected in the December 31, 2015 Consolidated Statements
	of Operations as Other Income (Expense).


	 


	The deferred acquisition cost liability
	balance at December 31, 2015, which was included in Accrued expenses and other current liabilities, was $1.9 million. During
	the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company paid approximately $1.7 million in deferred acquisition cost. During the year
	ended December 31, 2016, as a result of improved performance, the Company increased this deferred acquisition cost liability
	by approximately $0.6 million and recorded the amount as Other Income (Expense) in 2016. The remaining liability of $0.8
	million was subsequently paid in January 2017.


	 


	The intangible assets are being amortized
	over a period ranging from two to ten years. The goodwill recognized as part of the acquisition will be deductible for tax purposes.
	The transaction also provides for additional employee compensation for years 2017 through 2019, based on certain revenue performance.
	The total additional employee compensation, if any, cannot exceed $3,000,000.


	 


	The results of the acquired business operations
	are included in the Company’s consolidated Statements of Operations from the date of acquisition, and are not material to
	the Company’s financial position or results of operations.



	 






	Note 13- Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)



	(in thousands, except share and per share data)


	 




	 


	 


	For the Year Ended 2016


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	Q1


	 


	 


	Q2


	 


	 


	Q3


	 


	 


	Q4


	 


	 


	Total (a)


	 




	Revenues


	 


	$


	28,167


	 


	 


	$


	34,605


	 


	 


	$


	34,930


	 


	 


	$


	7,779


	 


	 


	$


	105,481


	 




	Gross profit


	 


	$


	7,522


	 


	 


	$


	10,491


	 


	 


	$


	12,040


	 


	 


	$


	1,033


	 


	 


	$


	31,086


	 




	Operating expenses


	 


	$


	2,503


	 


	 


	$


	2,347


	 


	 


	$


	4,022


	 


	 


	$


	3,267


	 


	 


	$


	12,139


	 




	Operating income (loss)


	 


	$


	5,019


	 


	 


	$


	8,144


	 


	 


	$


	8,018


	 


	 


	$


	(2,234


	)


	 


	$


	18,947


	 




	Other (expense)


	 


	$


	(271


	)


	 


	$


	(352


	)


	 


	$


	(296


	)


	 


	$


	(763


	)


	 


	$


	(1,682


	)




	Income (loss) before income taxes


	 


	$


	4,748


	 


	 


	$


	7,792


	 


	 


	$


	7,722


	 


	 


	$


	(2,997


	)


	 


	$


	17,265


	 




	Income tax expense (benefit)


	 


	$


	1,804


	 


	 


	$


	2,962


	 


	 


	$


	2,933


	 


	 


	$


	(1,071


	)


	 


	$


	6,628


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	2,944


	 


	 


	$


	4,830


	 


	 


	$


	4,789


	 


	 


	$


	(1,926


	)


	 


	$


	10,637


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss) per common share – Basic (a)


	 


	$


	0.09


	 


	 


	$


	0.15


	 


	 


	$


	0.14


	 


	 


	$


	(0.05


	)


	 


	$


	0.31


	 




	Net income (loss) per common share – Diluted (a)


	 


	$


	0.09


	 


	 


	$


	0.14


	 


	 


	$


	0.14


	 


	 


	$


	(0.05


	)


	 


	$


	0.30


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – Basic


	 


	 


	32,888,659


	 


	 


	 


	33,128,518


	 


	 


	 


	33,873,479


	 


	 


	 


	36,527,250


	 


	 


	 


	34,104,476


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – Diluted


	 


	 


	33,944,876


	 


	 


	 


	34,270,337


	 


	 


	 


	35,297,585


	 


	 


	 


	36,527,250


	 


	 


	 


	35,416,910


	 





	 






	(a)


	The sum of the net earnings per share
	may not add up to the full year amount due to rounding and because the quarterly calculations
	are based on varying numbers of shares outstanding.




	 






	 



	48



	 







	 




	  






	 


	 


	For the Year Ended 2015


	 


	 




	 




	 


	 


	Q1


	 


	 


	Q2


	 


	 


	Q3


	 


	 


	Q4


	 


	 


	Total (a)


	 




	Revenues


	 


	$


	22,103


	 


	 


	$


	28,637


	 


	 


	$


	21,682


	 


	 


	$


	7,300


	 


	 


	$


	79,722


	 




	Gross profit


	 


	$


	5,525


	 


	 


	$


	7,212


	 


	 


	$


	4,384


	 


	 


	$


	1,368


	 


	 


	$


	18,489


	 




	Operating expenses


	 


	$


	2,255


	 


	 


	$


	2,451


	 


	 


	$


	2,482


	 


	 


	$


	3,120


	 


	 


	$


	10,308


	 




	Operating income (loss)


	 


	$


	3,270


	 


	 


	$


	4,761


	 


	 


	$


	1,902


	 


	 


	$


	(1,752


	)


	 


	$


	8,181


	 




	Other Income (expense)


	 


	$


	(207


	)


	 


	$


	(236


	)


	 


	$


	(157


	)


	 


	$


	126


	 


	 


	$


	(474


	)




	Income (loss) before income taxes


	 


	$


	3,063


	 


	 


	$


	4,525


	 


	 


	$


	1,745


	 


	 


	$


	(1,626


	)


	 


	$


	7,707


	 




	Income tax expense (benefit)


	 


	$


	1,170


	 


	 


	$


	1,714


	 


	 


	$


	663


	 


	 


	$


	(603


	)


	 


	$


	2,944


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	1,893


	 


	 


	$


	2,811


	 


	 


	$


	1,082


	 


	 


	$


	(1,023


	)


	 


	$


	4,763


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss) per common share – Basic


	 


	$


	0.06


	 


	 


	$


	0.09


	 


	 


	$


	0.03


	 


	 


	$


	(0.03


	)


	 


	$


	0.15


	 




	Net income (loss) per common share – Diluted


	 


	$


	0.06


	 


	 


	$


	0.08


	 


	 


	$


	0.03


	 


	 


	$


	(0.03


	)


	 


	$


	0.14


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – Basic


	 


	 


	32,333,443


	 


	 


	 


	32,542,672


	 


	 


	 


	32,639,429


	 


	 


	 


	32,715,802


	 


	 


	 


	32,546,840


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding – Diluted


	 


	 


	34,280,385


	 


	 


	 


	34,383,092


	 


	 


	 


	33,856,045


	 


	 


	 


	32,715,802


	 


	 


	 


	33,936,099


	 





	 






	(a)


	The sum of the net earnings per share
	may not add up to the full year amount due to rounding and because the quarterly calculations
	are based on varying numbers of shares outstanding.




	 






	 



	49



	 








	 




	  







	SIGNATURES



	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13
	or 15 (d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the
	undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


	 



	HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES, INC.




	 






	By:




	/s/ Kevin J. Zugibe




	 





	 



	Kevin J. Zugibe, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer



	 




	 


	 


	 





	Date:




	March 10, 2017



	 




	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities
	Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities
	and on the dates indicated.


	 






	Signature





	 





	Title





	 





	Date







	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Kevin J. Zugibe




	 




	Chairman of the Board
	and Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)




	 




	March  10, 2017






	Kevin J. Zugibe




	 






	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Nat Krishnamurti




	 




	Chief Financial Officer
	(Principal Financial and Accounting Officer)




	 




	March  10, 2017






	Nat Krishnamurti




	 






	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Vincent P. Abbatecola




	 




	Director




	 




	March 10, 2017






	Vincent P. Abbatecola




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Brian F. Coleman




	 




	Director and President
	and Chief Operating Officer




	 




	March 10, 2017






	Brian F. Coleman




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Dominic J. Monetta




	 




	Director




	 




	March 10, 2017






	Dominic J. Monetta




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Otto C. Morch




	 




	Director




	 




	March 10, 2017






	Otto C. Morch




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Richard Parrillo




	 




	Director




	 




	March 10, 2017






	Richard Parrillo




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	/s/
	Eric A. Prouty




	 




	Director




	 




	March 10, 2017






	Eric A. Prouty




	 




	 




	 




	 





	 






	 



	50



	 








	 




	  






	Index to Exhibits




	 








	Exhibit





	Number




	 




	Description






	 


	 


	 




	 


	 



	Exhibits






	3.1



	 



	Certificate of Incorporation and Amendment.  (1)






	3.2



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation, dated July 20, 1994.  (1)






	3.3



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation, dated October 26,
	1994.  (1)






	3.4



	 



	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated March 16, 1999.  (2)






	3.5



	 



	Certificate of Correction of the Certificate of Amendment dated
	March 25, 1999.  (2)






	3.6



	 



	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated March 29, 1999.  (2)






	3.7



	 



	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated February 16, 2001.  (4)






	3.8



	 



	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation  dated
	March 20, 2002.  (5)






	3.9



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated January 3, 2003.  (6)






	3.10



	 



	Amended and Restated By-Laws adopted July 29, 2011. (14)






	3.11



	 



	Certificate of Amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation
	dated September 15, 2015.  (24)






	10.1



	 



	Assignment of patent rights from Kevin J. Zugibe to Registrant.  (1)






	10.2



	 



	1997 Stock Option Plan of the Company, as amended.  (3)
	*






	10.3



	 


	2004 Stock Incentive Plan. (9)*





	10.4



	 



	Commercial Mortgage, dated May 27, 2005, between Hudson Technologies
	Company and Busey Bank.  (7)






	10.5



	 



	Commercial Installment Mortgage Note, dated May 27, 2005, between
	Hudson Technologies Company and Busey Bank. (7)






	10.6



	 



	Amended and Restated Employment Agreement with Kevin J. Zugibe,
	as amended. (11)*






	10.7



	 



	Agreement with Brian F. Coleman, as amended.  (11)*






	10.8



	 



	Agreement with James R. Buscemi, as amended. (11)*






	10.9



	 



	Agreement with Charles F. Harkins, as amended. (11)*






	10.10



	 



	Agreement with Stephen P. Mandracchia, as amended. (11)*






	10.11



	 



	2008 Stock Incentive Plan. (10)*






	10.12



	 



	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock
	Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance. (11)*






	10.13



	 



	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock
	Incentive Plan with options vesting in equal installments over two year period. (11)*






	10.14



	 



	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008
	Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting upon issuance. (11)*






	10.15



	 



	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2008
	Stock Incentive Plan with options vesting in equal installments over two year period. (11)*






	10.16



	 



	First Amendment to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement
	with Kevin J. Zugibe, dated December 30, 2008. (11)*






	10.17



	 



	Form of Warrant issued in the 2010 Offering. (12)






	10.18



	 



	Form of Agreement and Consent, to amend warrants issued in connection
	with the 2010 Offering, dated March 7, 2011. (13)






	10.19



	 



	Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement, dated June
	22, 2012, between Hudson Technologies Company as borrower and PNC Bank, National Association as lender and agent (15)






	10.20



	 



	$23,000,000 Revolving Credit Note, dated June 22, 2012, by Hudson
	Technologies Company as borrower in favor of PNC (15)






	10.21



	 



	$4,000,000 Term Note, dated June 22.2012, by Hudson Technologies
	Company as borrower in favor of PNC. (15)






	10.22



	 



	Guaranty & Suretyship Agreement, dated June 22, 2012, made
	by Hudson Holdings, Inc. as guarantor on behalf of Hudson Technologies Company. (15)






	10.23



	 



	Guaranty & Suretyship Agreement, dated June 22, 2012, made
	by the Company as guarantor on behalf of Hudson Technologies Company. (15)






	10.24



	 



	Patent, Trademarks, and Copyrights Security Agreement, dated
	June 22, 2012, between the Company and PNC. (15)






	10.25



	 



	Patent, Trademarks, and Copyrights Security Agreement, dated
	June 22, 2012, between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC. (15)






	10.26



	 



	Long Term Care Insurance Plan Summary. (16)*






	10.27



	 



	First Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan, and Security
	Agreement between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC dated February 15, 2013. (17)






	10.28



	 



	$36,000,000 Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Note, dated
	February 15, 2013, by Hudson Technologies Company as borrower in favor of PNC. (17)






	10.29



	 



	Guarantors’ Ratification dated February 15, 2013, by the
	Company and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (17)






	 






	 



	51



	 







	 




	  







	10.30



	 



	Second Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan
	and Security Agreement Between Hudson Technologies Company and PNC Bank, National Association dated October 25, 2013 (18)






	10.31



	 



	Guarantors’ Ratification dated October 25, 2013 by Hudson
	Technologies, Inc. and Hudson Holdings, Inc. (18)






	10.32



	 



	Amendment No. 1 to the Hudson Technologies, Inc. 2008 Stock
	Incentive Plan adopted October 22, 2013. (19) *






	10.33



	 


	Underwriting Agreement between William Blair & Company, L.L.C., for itself and as representative
	of the several underwriters, and Hudson Technologies, Inc., dated June 6, 2014 (20)





	10.34



	 


	Third Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement Between Hudson Technologies
	Company and PNC Bank, National Association, dated July 2, 2014 (21)





	10.35



	 


	Guarantor’s Ratification, dated July 1, 2014, by Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Hudson
	Holdings, Inc. (21)  





	10.36



	 


	2014 Stock Incentive Plan (22)*




	10.37


	 


	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with full vesting
	upon issuance. (23)*




	10.38


	 


	Form of Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with options
	vesting in equal installments over two year period. (23)*




	10.39


	 


	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with full
	vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.40


	 


	Form of Non-Incentive Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with options
	vesting in equal installments over two year period. (23)*




	10.41


	 


	Form of Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2014 Stock Incentive Plan with
	full vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.42


	 


	Form of Non-Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock Incentive Plan with
	full vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.43


	 


	Form of Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock Incentive Plan with
	full vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.44


	 


	Form of Non-Incentive Barrier Stock Option Agreement under the 2008 Stock Incentive Plan with
	full vesting upon issuance. (23)*




	10.45


	 


	Fourth Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement Between Hudson Technologies
	Company and PNC Bank, National Association, dated July 1, 2015 (25)




	10.46


	 


	Guarantor’s Ratification, dated July 1, 2015, by Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Hudson
	Holdings, Inc. (25)




	10.47


	 


	Second Amended and Restated Employment Agreement with Kevin J. Zugibe. (26)*




	10.48


	 


	Amended and Restated Agreement with Brian Coleman (26)*




	10.49


	 


	Fifth Amendment to Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement between Hudson Technologies
	Company and PNC, dated April 8, 2016. (27)




	10.50


	 


	Second Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Note, dated April 8, 2016 by Hudson Technologies
	Company as borrower in favor of PNC. (27)




	10.51


	 


	Guarantor’s’ Ratification, dated April 8, 2016 by the Registrant and Hudson Holdings,
	Inc. (27)




	10.52


	 


	Agreement, dated September 5, 2016 between Hudson Technologies, Inc. and Nat Krishnumurti.
	(28)*




	10.53


	 


	Underwriting Agreement among William Blair & Company, L.L.C. and Craig-Hallum Capital
	Group LLP, for themselves and as representatives of several underwriters, and Hudson Technologies, Inc. dated December 8, 2016.
	(29)





	14



	 



	Code of Business Conduct and Ethics.  (8)






	21



	 



	Subsidiaries of the Company. (30)






	23.1



	 




	Consent of BDO USA,
	LLP. (30)

	 






	31.1



	 




	Certification of
	Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. (30)

	 






	31.2



	 




	Certification of
	Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. (30)

	 






	32.1



	 




	Certification of
	the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
	(30)

	 






	32.2



	 




	Certification of
	the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
	(30)

	 






	101



	 



	Interactive data file pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T. (30)






	 






	 









	(1)



	 



	Incorporated by reference
	to the comparable exhibit filed with the Company's Registration Statement on Form SB-2 (No. 33-80279-NY).





	(2)


	 


	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with the Company's Quarterly Report
	on Form 10-QSB for the quarter ended June 30, 1999.





	(3)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 1999.






	(4)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 2000.  






	(5)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 2001.






	(6)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-KSB for the year ended December 31, 2002.





	 






	 



	52



	 







	 




	  





	(7)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit
	filed with the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-QSB for the quarter ended June 30, 2005.






	(8)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K, for the event dated March 3, 2005, and filed May 31, 2005.






	(9)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s
	Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed August 18, 2004

	.

	 






	(10)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to Appendix I to the Company’s
	Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed July 29, 2008.






	(11)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008.






	(12)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated July 1, 2010 and filed July 2, 2010.






	(13)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.






	(14)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form-10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.






	(15)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Report on Form 8-K for the event dated June 22, 2012 and filed June 28, 2012.






	(16)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012.






	(17)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated February 15, 2013 and filed February 20, 2013.






	(18)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated October 25, 2013 and filed October 31, 2013.






	(19)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.






	(20)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June 6, 2014.






	(21)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on July 7, 2014.






	(22)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s
	Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed August 12, 2014

	.

	 






	(23)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014.






	(24)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2015.






	(25)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K for the event dated July 7, 2015 and filed July 8, 2015.






	(26)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company Annual Report on form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015.






	(27)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 14, 2016.






	(28)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 9, 2016.






	(29)



	 



	Incorporated by reference to the comparable exhibit filed with
	the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed December 9, 2016.






	(30)



	 



	Filed herewith






	(*)



	 



	Denotes Management Compensation Plan, agreement or arrangement.






	 







	 



	53



	 








	 














	 




	Exhibit 21:



	 


	Subsidiaries of the Registrant


	 


	Hudson Technologies Company d/b/a Hudson Technologies
	of Tennessee incorporated in the State of Tennessee.


	 


	Hudson Holdings, Inc. incorporated in the State
	of Nevada.


	 


	Safety Hi-Tech USA, LLC, a Delaware limited liability
	company, of which Hudson Holdings, Inc. owns 50% of the equity.


	 




	 




	 








	 



	Exhibit 23.1:



	 





	Consent of Independent Registered Public
	Accounting Firm



	 


	Hudson Technologies, Inc.


	Pearl River, New York


	 


	We hereby consent to the incorporation by reference
	in the Registration Statements on Form S-8 (No.333-17133, No.333-38598, No.333-129057, No.333-164650 and No.333-202955) and Registration
	Statements on Form S-3 (No.333-182526, No.333-185490 and No.333-207969) of Hudson Technologies, Inc. of our reports dated March
	10, 2017 relating to the consolidated financial statements and the effectiveness of Hudson Technologies Inc.’s internal control
	over financial reporting, which appear in this Form 10-K.


	 





	/s/ BDO USA, LLP



	 




	 


	 





	Stamford, CT



	 





	March 10, 2017



	 





	 




	 




	 








	 



	Exhibit 31.1:



	 



	Hudson Technologies, Inc.






	Certification of Principal Executive Officer



	 


	I, Kevin J. Zugibe, certify that:


	 




	1.


	I have reviewed this annual report on Form 10-K of Hudson Technologies, Inc.;




	 




	2.


	Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;




	 




	3.


	Based on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;




	 




	4.


	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:




	 




	 


	a)


	Designed such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;




	 




	 


	b)


	Designed such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;




	 


	 


	 




	 


	c)


	Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and




	 




	 


	d)


	Disclosed in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s most recent fiscal quarter (the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and




	 




	5.


	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent functions):




	 




	 


	a)


	All significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and




	 




	 


	b)


	Any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.




	 




	Date:	March 10, 2017


	 




	 


	/s/ Kevin J. Zugibe




	 


	Kevin J. Zugibe




	 


	Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board






	 





	 





	 














	 




	Exhibit 31.2:



	 



	Hudson Technologies, Inc.






	Certification of Principal Financial Officer



	 


	I, Nat Krishnamurti, certify that:


	 




	1.


	I have reviewed this annual report on Form 10-K of Hudson Technologies, Inc.;




	 




	2.


	Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;




	 




	3.


	Based on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;




	 




	4.


	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:




	 




	 


	a)


	Designed such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;




	 




	 


	b)


	Designed such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;




	 


	 


	 




	 


	c)


	Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and




	 




	 


	d)


	Disclosed in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s most recent fiscal quarter (the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and




	 




	5.


	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent functions):




	 




	 


	a)


	All significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and




	 




	 


	b)


	Any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.




	 




	Date:	March  10, 2017


	 




	 


	/s/Nat Krishnamurti




	 


	Nat Krishnamurti




	 


	Chief Financial Officer






	 





	 





	 














	 




	Exhibit 32.1:



	 





	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906 OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF
	2002



	 


	In connection with the Annual Report of Hudson Technologies, Inc.
	(the “Company”) on Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2016 as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
	on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Kevin J. Zugibe, as Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board of the
	Company, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that,
	to the best of my knowledge:


	 




	 


	(1)


	The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and




	 


	 


	 




	 


	(2)


	The information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company.




	 




	 


	/s/ Kevin J. Zugibe




	 


	Kevin J. Zugibe




	 


	Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board




	 


	 




	 


	March  10, 2017





	 




	 




	 










	 



	Exhibit 32.2



	 





	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906 OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF
	2002



	 


	In connection with the Annual Report of Hudson Technologies, Inc.
	(the “Company”) on Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2016 as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
	on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Nat Krishnamurti, as Chief Financial Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant
	to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that, to the best of my knowledge:


	 




	 


	(1)


	The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and




	 


	 


	 




	 


	(2)


	The information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company.




	 




	 


	/s/ Nat Krishnamurti




	 


	Nat Krishnamurti




	 


	Chief Financial Officer




	 


	 




	 


	March  10, 2017





	 




	 




	 










Security Check Required




FacebookJoin or Log Into Facebook   Email or PhonePasswordForgot account?Log InDo you want to join Facebook?Sign UpSign UpSecurity CheckPlease enter the text belowCan't read the text above?Try another text or an audio captchaText in the box:What's this?Security CheckThis is a standard security test that we use to prevent spammers from creating fake accounts and spamming users.SubmitEnglish (US)EspañolFrançais (France)中文(简体)العربيةPortuguês (Brasil)Italiano한국어Deutschहिन्दी日本語MessengerFacebook LitePeoplePlacesGamesLocationsCelebritiesMarketplaceGroupsRecipesMomentsInstagramAboutCreate AdCreate PageDevelopersCareersPrivacyCookiesAd ChoicesTermsSettingsActivity Log Facebook © 2017


Hudson Technologies, Inc.: NASDAQ:HDSN quotes & news - Google FinanceCookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookiesLearn moreGot itMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceHudson Technologies, Inc.(NASDAQ:HDSN)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Hudson Technologies, Inc.  (Public, NASDAQ:HDSN)  
Watch this stock
 




















7.96


-0.04
(-0.50%)



After Hours: 7.95
-0.01
(-0.13%)
Jul 28, 5:38PM EDT  
NASDAQ
real-time data -
Disclaimer

Currency in USD








Range

7.92 - 8.21



52 week

4.70 - 9.44



Open

7.98



Vol / Avg.

666,146.00/796,374.00



Mkt cap

330.65M



P/E

22.37



Div/yield

    -



EPS

0.36



Shares

41.54M



Beta

1.13



Inst. own

76%





































News





Relevance



Date











All news for Hudson Technologies, Inc. »

Subscribe






Advertisement




Events




Add HDSN to my calendars





Aug 9, 2017
Q2 2017 Hudson Technologies Inc Earnings Call
- 5:00PM EDT -






Jul 31, 2017
Q2 2017 Hudson Technologies Inc Earnings Release (Estimated)
- 4:00PM EDT -






Jun 21, 2017
Hudson Technologies Inc at ROTH Cleantech & Industrial Growth Day



May 24, 2017
Hudson Technologies Inc at B. Riley Investor Conference



May 3, 2017
Q1 2017 Hudson Technologies Inc Earnings Call



May 3, 2017
Q1 2017 Hudson Technologies Inc Earnings Release





More events from DailyFinance » 
  



Key stats and ratios




Q1 (Mar '17)
2016


Net profit margin
14.77%
10.08%

Operating margin
24.19%
17.96%

EBITD margin
-
20.07%

Return on average assets
16.69%
10.25%

Return on average equity
20.00%
13.18%

Employees
137
-

CDP Score
-

-


Screen stocks with similar metrics »

Address
One Blue Hill Plaza, 14Th Floor, PO Box 1541PEARL RIVER, NY 10965United States
- Map+1-845-7356000 (Phone)+1-845-5126070 (Fax)

Website links


http://www.hudsontech.com/



External links

Analyst Estimates - MarketWatch
SEC Filings - EDGAR Online
Major Holders - MSN Money
Research Reports - Reuters















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view



Volume delayed by 15 mins.Prices are not from all markets.

Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel







Sector: Non-Cyclical Consumer Goods & Services > Industry: Consumer Repair Services

More from FactSet »










Description




Hudson Technologies, Inc. is a refrigerant services company. The Company's products and services are primarily used in commercial air conditioning, industrial processing and refrigeration systems, and include refrigerant and industrial gas sales, refrigerant management services consisting primarily of reclamation of refrigerants and RefrigerantSide Services performed at a customer's site, consisting of system decontamination to remove moisture, oils and other contaminants. In addition, the Company's SmartEnergy OPS service is a Web-based real time continuous monitoring service applicable to a facility's refrigeration systems and other energy systems. The Company's Chiller Chemistry and Chill Smart services are also predictive and diagnostic service offerings. The Company sells reclaimed and virgin (new) refrigerants to a variety of customers in various segments of the air conditioning and refrigeration industry, and sells industrial gases to a variety of industry segments.


More from Reuters »








Officers and directors





Kevin J. Zugibe

Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Officer





Age: 52

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters
Trading Activity - Yahoo Finance

Brian F. Coleman

President, Chief Operating Officer, Director





Age: 54

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters
Trading Activity - Yahoo Finance

Nat Krishnamurti CPA

Chief Financial Officer, Vice President





Age: 44

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Charles F. Harkins Jr.

Vice President - Sales





Age: 54

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Stephen P. Mandracchia

Vice President - Legal and Regulatory, Secretary





Age: 56

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters
Trading Activity - Yahoo Finance

Eric A. Prouty

Director





Age: 45

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Vincent P. Abbatecola

Independent Director





Age: 69

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Dominic J. Monetta

Independent Director





Age: 74

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Otto C. Morch

Independent Director





Age: 82

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Richard Parrillo

Independent Director





Age: 62

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters



Full list on Reuters »








Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service

Hudson Technologies Inc Competitors and Products in the Pollution Equipment Buyer's Guide   Pollution Equipment Buyer's GuideHudson Technologies IncHudson Technologies Inc Rating: 0 -  Write A Review 0One Blue Hill PlazaPearl River, NY 10965Competitors of Hudson Technologies IncVermeer Manufacturing CompanyVermeer Manufacturing Company manufactures a full line of brush chippers, stump cutters, and horizontal and tub grinders. In addition, Vermeer also offers compost turning equipment. Vermeer ohas a worldwide sales, support, service and parts through an independent, authorized dealer network. write a reviewShapiro MetalsWhat started in 1904 as one man with a horse-drawn carriage has grown into Shapiro Metals, one of the most respected leaders in the scrap metal industry with our Lean RecyclingSM programs. As a family-owned business, we are passionate about meeting our customers’ needs with trust, integrity... write a review77 Recycling LLC77 Recycling, LLC is a Massachusetts-based company dealing with post industrial plastic scrap. Our focus is to transform your plastic scrap into a re-usable product. We buy and sell regrind and virgin resin as well as parts and runners. write a review×Rate and Review Hudson Technologies Inc     Click on a star to rate this companyRating is requiredYour AssociationCustomerPartnerSupplierOther Name, Title, Company  Post anonymouslyYour Comments When writing a review, please adhere to the Review Guidelines.     Thanks for submitting your review of Hudson Technologies Inc. We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours). We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Thanks for submitting your review of Hudson Technologies Inc.We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours).We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Close×Rate and Review Vermeer Manufacturing Company     Click on a star to rate this companyRating is requiredYour AssociationCustomerPartnerSupplierOther Name, Title, Company  Post anonymouslyYour Comments When writing a review, please adhere to the Review Guidelines.     Thanks for submitting your review of Vermeer Manufacturing Company. We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours). We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Thanks for submitting your review of Vermeer Manufacturing Company.We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours).We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Close×Rate and Review Shapiro Metals     Click on a star to rate this companyRating is requiredYour AssociationCustomerPartnerSupplierOther Name, Title, Company  Post anonymouslyYour Comments When writing a review, please adhere to the Review Guidelines.     Thanks for submitting your review of Shapiro Metals. We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours). We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Thanks for submitting your review of Shapiro Metals.We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours).We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Close×Rate and Review 77 Recycling LLC     Click on a star to rate this companyRating is requiredYour AssociationCustomerPartnerSupplierOther Name, Title, Company  Post anonymouslyYour Comments When writing a review, please adhere to the Review Guidelines.     Thanks for submitting your review of 77 Recycling LLC. We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours). We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Thanks for submitting your review of 77 Recycling LLC.We'll email you as soon as it's published, (typically within 48 hours).We really value your contributions, and so does our community of business professionals. They count on honest reviews like yours.Close×Sign up for full directory site access or loginLogin or sign upForgot PasswordLinkedIn user?You can use your LinkedIn account to login to Pollution Equipment Buyer's Guide. Login with LinkedInEmail AddressPasswordInvalid username or password    Forgot PasswordPrivacy Policy | Terms of UseLinkedIn user?You can use your LinkedIn account to sign up for Pollution Equipment Buyer's Guide. Sign up with LinkedInNameEmail AddressJob FunctionAdministrationCEO/President/ OwnerCFOCIO/CTOConsultantCustomer ServiceEngineer/ProgrammerFacilities/OperationsFinance ManagerFinance StaffGeneral ManagerHuman ResourcesIS/ IT StaffIS/IT ManagementMarketing ManagerMarketing StaffOtherPartner/PrincipalPurchasing ManagerSales Dev.Sales Dev. ManagerVP/Senior Manager Company NamePasswordAccount already exists. Please login with correct username and password.Privacy Policy | Terms of UseForgot Your Password? Enter the email address on your account. We will email you information to reset your password. LoginEmail Address


Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




10:22 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































10-Q: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,830
+33.76
+0.15%






Nasdaq

6,375
-7.51
-0.12%






S&P 500

2,472
-3.32
-0.13%









9:15 P.M. ET


Updated
      Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
                                





 
7:38 P.M. ET


                                  Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
                                





 
7:28 P.M. ET


                                  A Wild Week in Washington 
                                





 
6:32 P.M. ET


Updated
      The dark side of cruises
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


                                   Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


Updated
      The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


Updated
      O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
                                





 
6:30 P.M. ET


Updated
      Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
                                





 
6:29 P.M. ET


Updated
      Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
                                





 
6:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
                                





 
6:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
                                





 
6:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
                                





 
6:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      Americans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
                                





 
6:26 P.M. ET


Updated
      5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
                                





 
6:14 P.M. ET


Updated
      Beyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
                                





 
6:13 P.M. ET


Updated
      These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
                                





 
6:11 P.M. ET


Updated
      Watch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
                                





 
6:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
                                





 
6:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      ‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
                                





 
6:08 P.M. ET


Updated
      This basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY
    








    By

Published: May 4, 2017 5:15 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2 - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  Certain statements, contained in this section and elsewhere in this Form 10-Q, constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements involve a number of known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause the actual results, performance or achievements of the Company to be materially different from any future results, performance or achievements expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Such factors include, but are not limited to, changes in the laws and regulations affecting the refrigerant industry, changes in the demand and price for refrigerants (including unfavorable market conditions adversely affecting the demand for, and the price of refrigerants), the Company's ability to source refrigerants, regulatory and economic factors, seasonality, competition, litigation, the nature of supplier or customer arrangements that become available to the Company in the future, adverse weather conditions, possible technological obsolescence of existing products and services, possible reduction in the carrying value of long-lived assets, estimates of the useful life of its assets, potential environmental liability, customer concentration, the ability to obtain financing, any delays or interruptions in bringing products and services to market, the timely availability of any requisite permits and authorizations from governmental entities and third parties as well as factors relating to doing business outside the United States, including changes in the laws, regulations, policies, and political, financial and economic conditions, including inflation, interest and currency exchange rates, of countries in which the Company may seek to conduct business, the Company's ability to successfully integrate any assets it acquires from third parties into its operations, and other risks detailed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016. and in the Company's other subsequent filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). The words "believe", "expect", "anticipate", "may", "plan", "should" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date the statement was made.  Critical Accounting Policies  The Company's discussion and analysis of its financial condition and results of operations are based upon its consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The preparation of these consolidated financial statements requires the Company to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses and related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. Several of the Company's accounting policies involve significant judgments, uncertainties and estimates. The Company bases its estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions. To the extent that actual results differ from management's judgments and estimates, there could be a material adverse effect on the Company. On a continuous basis, the Company evaluates its estimates, including, but not limited to, those estimates related to its allowance for doubtful accounts, inventory reserves, and valuation allowance for the deferred tax assets relating to its net operating loss carry forwards ("NOLs") and commitments and contingencies. With respect to accounts receivable, the Company estimates the necessary allowance for doubtful accounts based on both historical and anticipated trends of payment history and the ability of the customer to fulfill its obligations. For inventory, the Company evaluates both current and anticipated sales prices of its products to determine if a write down of inventory to net realizable value is necessary. In determining the Company's valuation allowance for its deferred tax assets, the Company assesses its ability to generate taxable income in the future. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the net assets acquired in business combinations accounted for under the purchase method of accounting. The Company tests for any impairment of goodwill annually unless indicators arise. Intangibles with determinable lives are amortized over the estimated useful lives of the assets currently ranging from 2 to 10 years. The Company reviews these useful lives annually to determine that they reflect future realizable value. The Company utilizes both internal and external sources to evaluate potential current and future liabilities for various commitments and contingencies. In the event that the assumptions or conditions change in the future, the estimates could differ from the original estimates.  Overview  Sales of refrigerants continue to represent a significant portion of the Company's revenues. The Company's refrigerant sales are primarily HCFC and HFC based refrigerants and to a lesser extent CFC based refrigerants that are no longer manufactured. Currently the Company purchases virgin HCFC and HFC refrigerants and reclaimable HCFC, HFC and CFC refrigerants from suppliers and its customers. Effective January 1, 1996, the Clean Air Act (the "Act") prohibited the production of virgin CFC refrigerants and limited the production of virgin HCFC refrigerants, which production was further limited in January 2004. Federal regulations enacted in January 2004 established production and consumption allowances for HCFCs and imposed limitations on the importation of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants. Under the Act, production of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out during the period 2010 through 2020, and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out by 2030. In October 2014, the EPA published the Final Rule providing further reductions in the production and consumption allowances for virgin HCFC refrigerants for the years 2015 through 2019. In the Final Rule, the EPA has established a linear annual phase down schedule for the production or importation of virgin HCFC-22 that started at approximately 22 million pounds in 2015 and is being reduced by approximately 4.5 million pounds each year and ends at zero in 2020. In October 2016, more than 200 countries, including the United States, agreed to amend the Montreal Protocol to phase down production of HFCs by 85% between now and 2047. The amendment establishes timetables for all developed and developing countries to freeze and then reduce production and use of HFCs, with the first reductions by developed countries starting in 2019.  The Company has created and developed a service offering known as RefrigerantSide(R) Services. RefrigerantSide(R) Services are sold to contractors and end-users whose refrigeration systems are used in commercial air conditioning and industrial processing. These services are offered in addition to refrigerant sales and the Company's traditional refrigerant management services, which consist primarily of reclamation of refrigerants. The Company has created a network of service depots that provide a full range of the Company's RefrigerantSide(R) Services to facilitate the growth and development of its service offerings.  The Company focuses its sales and marketing efforts for its RefrigerantSide(R) Services on customers who the Company believes most readily appreciate and understand the value that is provided by its RefrigerantSide(R) Services offering. In pursuing its sales and marketing strategy, the Company offers its RefrigerantSide(R) Services to customers in the following industries:  Results of Operations  Three month period ended March 31, 2017 as compared to the three month period ended March 31, 2016  Revenues for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 were $38.8 million, an increase of $10.6 million or 38% from the $28.2 million reported during the comparable 2016 period. The increase in revenues was mainly attributable to an increase in the selling price per pound of certain refrigerants sold, which accounted for an increase in revenues of $9.6 million, and an increase in the number pounds of certain refrigerants sold, which accounted for an increase in revenues of $1.4 million.  Cost of sales for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 was $26.4 million or 68% of sales. The cost of sales for the three month period ended March 31, 2016 was $20.6 million or 73% of sales. The decrease in the cost of sales percentage from 73% for the three month period ended March 31, 2016 to 68% for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 is primarily due to the increase in the selling price per pound of certain refrigerants sold for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 compared to the same period in 2016.  Operating expenses for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 were $3.1 million, an increase of $0.6 million from the $2.5 million reported during the comparable 2016 period. The increase in operating expenses is primarily due to an increase in nonrecurring fees relating to corporate development initiatives incurred during the first quarter of 2017, slightly offset by reduced marketing expenses.  Interest expense, net for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 was $0.1 million, compared to the $0.3 million reported during the comparable 2016 period. As a result of the paydown of the PNC Facility and December 2016 public offering during the fourth quarter of 2016, the Company incurred lower interest expense in the first quarter of 2017 when compared to the same period in 2016.  Income tax expense for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 was $3.6 million compared to income tax expense for the three month period ended March 31, 2016 of $1.8 million. For 2017 and 2016 the income tax expense was for federal and state income tax at statutory rates applied to the pre-tax income.  Net income for the three month period ended March 31, 2017 was $5.7 million, an increase of $2.8 million from the $2.9 million net income reported during the comparable 2016 period, primarily due to the increase in revenues partially offset by an increase in operating expenses and income tax expense.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  At March 31, 2017, the Company had working capital, which represents current assets less current liabilities, of $104.6 million, an increase of $6.7 million from the working capital of $97.9 million at December 31, 2016. The increase in working capital is primarily attributable to increased net income and cash flows during the period.  Inventory and trade receivables are principal components of current assets. At March 31, 2017, the Company had inventories of $72.4 million, an increase of $3.8 million from $68.6 million at December 31, 2016. The increase in the inventory balance is primarily due to the timing and availability of inventory purchases and the sale of refrigerants. The Company's ability to sell and replace its inventory on a timely basis and the prices at which it can be sold are subject, among other things, to current market conditions and the nature of supplier or customer arrangements and the Company's ability to source CFC based refrigerants (which are no longer being produced), HCFC refrigerants (which are currently being phased down leading to a full phase out of virgin production), or non-CFC based refrigerants. At March 31, 2017, the Company had trade receivables, net of allowance for doubtful accounts, of $20.7 million, an increase of $15.9 million from $4.8 million at December 31, 2016. The Company's trade receivables are concentrated with various wholesalers, brokers, contractors and end-users within the refrigeration industry that are primarily located in the continental United States.  The Company has historically financed its working capital requirements through cash flows from operations, the issuance of debt and equity securities, and bank borrowings.  At March 31, 2017, cash and cash equivalents was $40.2 million, or approximately $6.3 million higher than the $33.9 million of cash and cash equivalents at December 31, 2016.  Net cash provided by operating activities for the three month period ended March 31, 2017, was $6.9 million compared with net cash used in operating activities of $5.7 million for the comparable 2016 period. Net cash provided by operating activities in the 2017 period was primarily attributable to an increase in net income as well as timing in the Company's accounts payable and accrued expenses.  Net cash used in investing activities for the three month period ended March 31, 2017, was $0.4 million compared with net cash used by investing activities of $0.1 million for the comparable 2016 period. The net cash used by investing activities for the 2017 and 2016 periods was primarily related to investment in general purpose equipment for the Company's Champaign, Illinois facility.  Net cash used in financing activities for the three month period ended March 31, 2017, was $0.3 million compared with net cash provided by financing activities of $5.8 million for the comparable 2016 period. During the fourth quarter of 2016, the Company paid off the PNC Facility and raised capital in a public offering, resulting in lower interest and no additional borrowings during the first quarter of 2017 when compared to the same period in 2016. During the first quarter of 2017, the Company also paid its final earnout relating to the 2015 acquisition of a supplier of refrigerants and compressed gases.  The Company continues to assess its capital expenditure needs. The Company may, to the extent necessary, continue to utilize its cash balances to purchase equipment primarily for its operations.  The following is a summary of the Company's significant contractual cash obligations for the periods indicated that existed as of March 31, 2017 (in 000's) :   Twelve Month Period Ended March 31, 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 Thereafter Total Long and short term debt and capital lease obligations: Principal $ 137 $ 94 $ 27 $ 7 $ 2 - $ 267 Estimated interest (1) 9 4 - - - - 13 Operating leases 1,420 941 451 401 176 22 3,411 Total contractual cash obligations $ 1,566 $ 1,039 $ 478 $ 408 $ 178 $ 22 $ 3,691  (1) The estimated future interest payments on all debt other than revolving debt are based on the respective interest rates applied to the declining principal balances on each of the notes.  On June 22, 2012, a subsidiary of Hudson entered into a Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement (the "PNC Facility") with PNC Bank, National Association, as agent ("Agent" or "PNC"), and such other lenders as may thereafter become a party to the PNC Facility. The Maximum Loan Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) is currently $50,000,000, and the Maximum Revolving Advance Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) is $46,000,000. In December 2016, the Company repaid all of its debt under the current PNC Facility, with approximately $50 million of availability under the revolving line of credit at March 31, 2017. In addition, there is a $130,000 outstanding letter of credit under the PNC Facility at March 31, 2017. The Termination Date of the Facility (as defined in the PNC Facility) is June 30, 2020.  Under the terms of the original PNC Facility, as amended on February 15, 2013, Hudson could initially borrow up to a maximum of $40,000,000 consisting of a term loan in the principal amount of $4,000,000 and revolving loans in a maximum amount up to $36,000,000. Amounts borrowed under the PNC Facility may be used by Hudson for working capital needs and to reimburse drawings under letters of credit.  Interest on loans under the PNC Facility is payable in arrears on the first day of each month with respect to loans bearing interest at the domestic rate (as set forth in the PNC Facility) and at the end of each interest period with respect to loans bearing interest at the Eurodollar Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) or, for Eurodollar Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility) with an interest period in excess of three months, at the earlier of (a) each three months from the commencement of such Eurodollar Rate Loan or (b) the end of the interest period. Interest charges with respect to loans are computed on the actual principal amount of loans outstanding during the month at a rate per annum equal to (A) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans (as defined in the PNC Facility), the sum of the Alternate Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half of one percent (.50%) and (B) with respect to Eurodollar Rate Loans, the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%).  Hudson granted to PNC, for itself, and as agent for such other lenders as may thereafter become a lender under the PNC Facility, a security interest in Hudson's receivables, intellectual property, general intangibles, inventory and certain other assets.  The PNC Facility contains certain financial and non-financial covenants relating to Hudson, including limitations on Hudson's ability to pay dividends on common stock or preferred stock, and also includes certain events of default, including payment defaults, breaches of representations and warranties, covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other obligations, events of bankruptcy and insolvency, certain ERISA events, judgments in excess of specified amounts, impairments to guarantees and a change of control. The PNC Facility contains a financial covenant to maintain at all times a Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio of not less than 1.10 to 1.00, tested quarterly on a rolling twelve-month basis. Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio is defined in the PNC Facility, with respect to any fiscal period, as the ratio of (a) EBITDA of Hudson for such period, minus unfinanced capital expenditures (as defined in the PNC Facility) made by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of cash taxes paid by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of dividends and distributions made by Hudson during such period, minus the aggregate amount of payments made with cash by Hudson to satisfy soil sampling and reclamation related to environmental cleanup at the Company's former Hillburn, NY facility during such period (to the extent not already included in the calculation of EBITDA as determined by the Agent) to  On July 1, 2015, the Company entered into an amendment to the PNC Facility (the "2015 PNC Amendment"). The 2015 PNC Amendment redefined the "Revolving Interest Rate" as well as the "Term Loan Rate" (as defined in the PNC Facility) as follows:  "Revolving Interest Rate" shall mean an interest rate per annum equal to (a) the sum of the Alternate Base Rate (as defined in the PNC Facility) plus one half of one percent (.50%) with respect to Domestic Rate Loans and (b) the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%) with respect to the Eurodollar Rate Loans.  "Term Loan Rate" shall mean an interest rate per annum equal to (a) the sum of the Alternate Base Rate plus one half of one percent (.50%) with respect to the Domestic Rate Loans and (b) the sum of the Eurodollar Rate plus two and one quarter of one percent (2.25%) with respect to Eurodollar Rate Loans.  On April 8, 2016, the Company entered into an amendment to the PNC Facility (the "2016 PNC Amendment"). Pursuant to the 2016 PNC Amendment, the Maximum Loan Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been increased from $40,000,000 to $50,000,000, and the Maximum Revolving Advance Amount (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been increased from $36,000,000 to $46,000,000. Additionally, pursuant to the 2016 PNC Amendment the Termination Date of the Facility (as defined in the PNC Facility) has been extended to June 30, 2020.  The Company was in compliance with all covenants, under the PNC Facility as of March 31, 2017. The Company's ability to comply with these covenants in future quarters may be affected by events beyond the Company's control, including general economic conditions, weather conditions, regulations and refrigerant pricing. Although we expect to remain in compliance with all covenants in the PNC Facility, as amended, depending on our future operating performance and general economic conditions, we cannot make any assurance that we will continue to be in compliance.  The commitments under the PNC Facility will expire and the full outstanding principal amount of the loans, together with accrued and unpaid interest, are due and payable in full on June 30, 2020, unless the commitments are terminated for any reason or the outstanding principal amount of the loans are accelerated sooner following an event of default.  December 2016 Public Offering  On December 8, 2016 the Company entered into an Underwriting Agreement with two investment banking firms for themselves and as representatives for two other investment banking firms (collectively, the "Underwriters"), in connection with an underwritten offering (the "Offering") of 6,428,571 shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Firm Shares"). Pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement, the Company agreed to sell to the Underwriters, and the Underwriters agreed to purchase from the Company, an aggregate of 6,428,571 shares of common stock and also granted the Underwriters a 30 day option to purchase up to 964,285 additional shares of its common stock to cover over-allotments, if any. The Company also agreed to reimburse certain expenses incurred by the Underwriters in the Offering.  The closing of the Offering was held on December 14, 2016, at which time the Company sold 7,392,856 shares of its common stock to the Underwriters (including 964,285 shares to cover over-allotments) at a price to the public of $7.00 per share, less underwriting discounts and commissions, and received gross proceeds of $51.7 million. The Company incurred approximately $3.3 million of transaction fees in connection with the Offering, resulting in net proceeds of $48.4 million.  Inflation  Inflation has not historically had a material impact on the Company's operations.  Reliance on Suppliers and Customers  The Company participates in an industry that is highly regulated, and changes in the regulations affecting our business could affect our operating results. Currently the Company purchases virgin HCFC and HFC refrigerants and reclaimable, primarily HCFC and CFC, refrigerants from suppliers and its customers. Under the Act the phase-down of future production of certain virgin HCFC refrigerants commenced in 2010 and is scheduled to be fully phased out by the year 2020, and production of all virgin HCFC refrigerants is scheduled to be phased out by the year 2030. To the extent that the Company is unable to source sufficient quantities of refrigerants or is unable to obtain refrigerants on commercially reasonable terms or experiences a decline in demand and/or price for refrigerants sold by it, the Company could realize reductions in revenue from refrigerant sales, which could have a material adverse effect on the Company's operating results and financial position.  For the three month period ended March 31, 2017, two customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company's revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for 39% of the Company's revenues. At March 31, 2017, there were $4.7 million in outstanding receivables from these customers.  For the three month period ended March 31, 2016, two customers each accounted for 10% or more of the Company's revenues and, in the aggregate these two customers accounted for 44% of the Company's revenues. At March 31, 2016, there were $5.1 in outstanding receivables from these customers.  The loss of a principal customer or a decline in the economic prospects of and/or a reduction in purchases of the Company's products or services by any such customer could have a material adverse effect on the Company's operating results and financial position.  Seasonality and Weather Conditions and Fluctuations in Operating Results  The Company's operating results vary from period to period as a result of weather conditions, requirements of potential customers, non-recurring refrigerant and service sales, availability and price of refrigerant products (virgin or reclaimable), changes in reclamation technology and regulations, timing in introduction and/or retrofit or replacement of refrigeration equipment, the rate of expansion of the Company's operations, and by other factors. The Company's business is seasonal in nature with peak sales of refrigerants occurring in the first half of each year. During past years, the seasonal decrease in sales of refrigerants has resulted in losses particularly in the fourth quarter of the year. In addition, to the extent that there is unseasonably cool weather throughout the spring and summer months, which would adversely affect the demand for refrigerants, there would be a corresponding negative impact on the Company. Delays or inability in securing adequate supplies of refrigerants at peak demand periods, lack of refrigerant demand, increased expenses, declining refrigerant prices and a loss of a principal customer could result in significant losses. There can be no assurance that the foregoing factors will not occur and result in a material adverse effect on the Company's financial position and significant losses. The Company believes that to a lesser extent there is a similar seasonal element to RefrigerantSide(R) Service revenues as refrigerant sales. The Company is continuing to assess its RefrigerantSide(R) Service revenues seasonal trend.  Recent Accounting Pronouncements  In January 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") No. 2017-04, "Intangibles-Goodwill and Other (Topic 350): Simplifying the Test for Goodwill Impairment" (ASU 2017-04) which simplifies the accounting for goodwill impairment by eliminating Step 2 of the current goodwill impairment test which requires a hypothetical purchase price allocation to measure goodwill impairment. Under the new standard, a company will record an impairment charge based on the excess of a reporting unit's carrying amount over its fair value. ASU 2017-04 does not change the guidance on completing Step 1 of the goodwill impairment test and still allows a company to perform the optional qualitative goodwill impairment assessment before determining whether to proceed to Step 1. The standard is effective for annual and interim goodwill impairment tests in fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2019 with early adoption permitted for any impairment test performed on testing dates after January 1, 2017. The Company adopted this standard on January 1, 2017 and will apply its guidance on future impairment assessments.  In August 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-15, "Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments." This ASU addresses eight specific cash flow issues with the objective of eliminating the existing diversity in practice. The . . .  May 04, 2017  (c) 1995-2017 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch




















Most Popular





Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials





All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart





S&P 500, Nasdaq finish lower after Amazon disappointment; Dow closes at record





Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’





Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




10:22 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15
























































 HDSN - Stock quote for Hudson Technologies Inc - MSN Money















msn  back to msn home

money










web search














Sign in








Change language & content:

América Latina (español)
Argentina (español)
Australia (English)
België (Nederlands)
Belgique (français)
Brasil (português)
Canada (English)
Canada (français)
Chile (español)
Colombia (español)
Danmark (Dansk)
Deutschland (Deutsch)
España (español)
France (français)
India (English)
Indonesia (Bahasa Indonesia)
Ireland (English)
Italia (italiano)
Malaysia (English)
México (español)
Nederland (Nederlands)
New Zealand (English)
Norge (norsk, bokmål)
Österreich (Deutsch)
Perú (español)
Philippines (English)
Polska (polski)
Portugal (Português)
Schweiz (Deutsch)
Singapore (English)
South Africa (English)
Suisse (français)
Suomi (suomi)
Sverige (svenska)
Türkiye (Türkçe)
United Arab Emirates (English)
United Kingdom (English)
United States (English)
United States (español)
Venezuela (español)
Việt Nam (Tiếng Việt)
Ελλάδα (ελληνικά)
Россия (Pусский)
ישראל (עברית)‏
الإمارات العربية المتحدة (العربية‏)
المملكة العربية السعودية (العربية‏)
مصر (العربية‏)
ไทย (ไทย)
한국 (한국어)
中华人民共和国 (简体中文)
台灣 (繁體中文)
日本 (日本語)
香港特别行政區 (繁體中文)



Switch to Latino (Español)



 Feedback



Help






























AdChoices














Hudson Technologies Inc
NASDAQ: HDSN



US Markets Closed










AdChoices








7.96


▼


-0.04
-0.50%



After Hours : 
7.95
-0.01
-0.13%



 July 28, 2017 5:38 PM EDT. Delayed 15 minutes; NASDAQ. Currency In USD                
















Save














            Summary
        



            Financials
        



            Analysis
        



            Options
        



            Ownership
        



            Company
        



            History
        



            Related
        


















































Open
7.98


Previous Close
8.00


Volume (Avg) 
666.15k (632.87k)


Day's Range
7.92-8.21


52Wk Range
4.70-9.44


Market Cap.
330.65M


Dividend Rate ( Yield)
-


Beta
1.14


Shares Outstanding
41.54M


P/E Ratio (EPS)
23.42 (0.34) 









Recent News







Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 2017 Results

                            
                            NASDAQ
                        
1 day ago






Parthenon Llc Buys Salesforce.com Inc, Salesforce. ...

                            
                            NASDAQ
                        
6 days ago






4 Charts for Navigating Murky Markets

                            
                            Minyanville
                        
7/6/2017






POPULAR, INC. (NASDAQ:BPOPM) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Financial Condition

                            
                            4 Traders
                        
2 days ago






Somewhat Positive Press Coverage Very Likely to Affect Hudson Technologies (NASDAQ:HDSN) Share Price

                            
                            Breeze
                        
7/21/2017






Hudson Technologies (HDSN) Given Daily News Sentiment Rating of 0.19

                            
                            themarketsdaily.com
                        
7/20/2017








Hudson Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:HDSN) Upgraded to Buy by BidaskClub

                            
                            Breeze
                        
7/19/2017






EnLink Midstream Partners, LP (ENLK): Are There Still Some Reasons For Optimism?

                            
                            ekosvoice.com
                        
7/18/2017






BidaskClub Lowers Medical Properties Trust, Inc. (MPW) to Sell

                            
                            techzolix.com
                        
7/18/2017






Hudson Technologies (HDSN) Receiving Favorable Media Coverage, Analysis Shows

                            
                            BNS
                        
7/11/2017






Team India under-23 face steaming Singapore in first friendly on Sunday

                            
                            latribunadecanarias.com
                        
7/9/2017






Oxford Asset Management Has $326000 Position in Hudson Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:HDSN)

                            
                            Le Camp des recrues
                        
7/9/2017








First Trust Advisors LP Reduces Stake in Hudson Technologies, Inc. (HDSN)

                            
                            leisuretravelaid.com
                        
7/9/2017






Hudson Technologies (HDSN) Getting Very Positive Media Coverage, Analysis Shows

                            
                            eleganthomesinla.com
                        
7/9/2017






Hudson Technologies, Inc. (HDSN) Stock Rating Upgraded by BidaskClub

                            
                            theaviationweek.net
                        
7/9/2017






Why Is Hudson Technologies Inc. (HDSN) Moving So Hard, So Fast?

                            
                            Football Hebdo
                        
7/9/2017






First Trust Advisors LP Reduces Stake in Hudson Technologies, Inc. (HDSN)

                            
                            giftedviz.com
                        
7/9/2017






Hudson Technologies Inc. (NASDAQ:HDSN) Moves Up 10.98% For The Week

                            
                            xboxonezone.com
                        
7/9/2017























AdChoices
















AdChoices

















AdChoices




















Markets











DOW

DOW



▲

21,830.31


+33.76
+0.15%













Last updated time
7/28/2017 4:38 PM EDT







Markets





NASDAQ

NASDAQ



▼

6,374.68




-7.51
-0.12%










FTSE 100

FTSE 100



▼

7,368.37




-74.64
-1.00%










NYSE Composite

NYSE Composite



▼

11,954.69




-8.54
-0.07%



















AdChoices
















                Feedback
            







Send Feedback
Provide Feedback
Report a Problem


We appreciate your input!



Select a category:

I'm having problems with Top Destinations
I'm having issues searching
I'm having problems with Featured Apps
I see an error in the content
Other



How we can improve?





Please give an overall site rating:









Submit
Close


Privacy Statement


Help


Help & Support



 











 














 






Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.




















Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      



Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




10:22 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Hudson Technologies - Wikipedia





















 






Hudson Technologies

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The topic of this article may not meet Wikipedia's general notability guideline. Please help to establish notability by citing reliable secondary sources that are independent of the topic and provide significant coverage of it beyond its mere trivial mention. If notability cannot be established, the article is likely to be merged, redirected, or deleted.
Find sources: "Hudson Technologies" – news · newspapers · books · scholar · JSTOR (November 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Hudson Technologies [1] is a US manufacturer of deep and shallow drawn metal enclosures, also called cans or cases. Deep drawing is a sheet metal forming process.
In 1982, a century-old metal-forming pressing machine, one of the earliest manufactured by the E.W. Bliss Company, entered into the collections of the National Museum of American History, Smithsonian Institution to be the focus of a display in the Museum's Tool Hall. The press was one of two original presses purchased by company founder Charles Batka, Sr. and came to the attention of the Smithsonian through a competition held by the Bliss firm in 1975 to discover the whereabouts of the company's earliest operable press. Before its retirement in 1974 and subsequent move from the facility in New Jersey, among the last jobs of this press was the production of electrical containers for the Apollo space flight program.[1]
History[edit]
Formerly Hudson Tool & Die, Co., the company was founded in 1940 by Czech immigrant Charles Batka, Sr. in Hudson County, New Jersey. A second facility opened in 1969 in Ormond Beach, Florida. The company was purchased in 1984 by JSJ [2], a privately held US corporation based in Grand Haven, Michigan. In 1991 all operations were consolidated to the plant in Ormond Beach and the New Jersey facility was closed. In 2007, the company changed its name to Hudson Technologies.[2]
References[edit]



^ The Bliss Drawing Press, 1982 by Smithsonian Institution
^ http://hudson-technologies.com







 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Hudson_Technologies&oldid=706608412"					
Categories: Manufacturing companies of the United StatesManufacturing companies established in 1940Manufacturing companies based in FloridaManufacturing companies based in New JerseyCompanies based in Hudson County, New JerseyCompanies based in Volusia County, FloridaHidden categories: Articles with topics of unclear notability from November 2009All articles with topics of unclear notability 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 February 2016, at 07:27.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Hudson Technologies - Wikipedia





















 






Hudson Technologies

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The topic of this article may not meet Wikipedia's general notability guideline. Please help to establish notability by citing reliable secondary sources that are independent of the topic and provide significant coverage of it beyond its mere trivial mention. If notability cannot be established, the article is likely to be merged, redirected, or deleted.
Find sources: "Hudson Technologies" – news · newspapers · books · scholar · JSTOR (November 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Hudson Technologies [1] is a US manufacturer of deep and shallow drawn metal enclosures, also called cans or cases. Deep drawing is a sheet metal forming process.
In 1982, a century-old metal-forming pressing machine, one of the earliest manufactured by the E.W. Bliss Company, entered into the collections of the National Museum of American History, Smithsonian Institution to be the focus of a display in the Museum's Tool Hall. The press was one of two original presses purchased by company founder Charles Batka, Sr. and came to the attention of the Smithsonian through a competition held by the Bliss firm in 1975 to discover the whereabouts of the company's earliest operable press. Before its retirement in 1974 and subsequent move from the facility in New Jersey, among the last jobs of this press was the production of electrical containers for the Apollo space flight program.[1]
History[edit]
Formerly Hudson Tool & Die, Co., the company was founded in 1940 by Czech immigrant Charles Batka, Sr. in Hudson County, New Jersey. A second facility opened in 1969 in Ormond Beach, Florida. The company was purchased in 1984 by JSJ [2], a privately held US corporation based in Grand Haven, Michigan. In 1991 all operations were consolidated to the plant in Ormond Beach and the New Jersey facility was closed. In 2007, the company changed its name to Hudson Technologies.[2]
References[edit]



^ The Bliss Drawing Press, 1982 by Smithsonian Institution
^ http://hudson-technologies.com







 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Hudson_Technologies&oldid=706608412"					
Categories: Manufacturing companies of the United StatesManufacturing companies established in 1940Manufacturing companies based in FloridaManufacturing companies based in New JerseyCompanies based in Hudson County, New JerseyCompanies based in Volusia County, FloridaHidden categories: Articles with topics of unclear notability from November 2009All articles with topics of unclear notability 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 February 2016, at 07:27.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




10:22 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Hudson Technologies - Wikipedia





















 






Hudson Technologies

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The topic of this article may not meet Wikipedia's general notability guideline. Please help to establish notability by citing reliable secondary sources that are independent of the topic and provide significant coverage of it beyond its mere trivial mention. If notability cannot be established, the article is likely to be merged, redirected, or deleted.
Find sources: "Hudson Technologies" – news · newspapers · books · scholar · JSTOR (November 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Hudson Technologies [1] is a US manufacturer of deep and shallow drawn metal enclosures, also called cans or cases. Deep drawing is a sheet metal forming process.
In 1982, a century-old metal-forming pressing machine, one of the earliest manufactured by the E.W. Bliss Company, entered into the collections of the National Museum of American History, Smithsonian Institution to be the focus of a display in the Museum's Tool Hall. The press was one of two original presses purchased by company founder Charles Batka, Sr. and came to the attention of the Smithsonian through a competition held by the Bliss firm in 1975 to discover the whereabouts of the company's earliest operable press. Before its retirement in 1974 and subsequent move from the facility in New Jersey, among the last jobs of this press was the production of electrical containers for the Apollo space flight program.[1]
History[edit]
Formerly Hudson Tool & Die, Co., the company was founded in 1940 by Czech immigrant Charles Batka, Sr. in Hudson County, New Jersey. A second facility opened in 1969 in Ormond Beach, Florida. The company was purchased in 1984 by JSJ [2], a privately held US corporation based in Grand Haven, Michigan. In 1991 all operations were consolidated to the plant in Ormond Beach and the New Jersey facility was closed. In 2007, the company changed its name to Hudson Technologies.[2]
References[edit]



^ The Bliss Drawing Press, 1982 by Smithsonian Institution
^ http://hudson-technologies.com







 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Hudson_Technologies&oldid=706608412"					
Categories: Manufacturing companies of the United StatesManufacturing companies established in 1940Manufacturing companies based in FloridaManufacturing companies based in New JerseyCompanies based in Hudson County, New JerseyCompanies based in Volusia County, FloridaHidden categories: Articles with topics of unclear notability from November 2009All articles with topics of unclear notability 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 February 2016, at 07:27.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








HDSN Stock Price - Hudson Technologies Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: Nasdaq) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,830.31


33.76


0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.10


-3.32


-0.13%











Nasdaq

6,374.68


-7.51


-0.12%











GlobalDow

2,848.22


-2.86


-0.10%











Gold

1,275.60


9.10


0.72%











Oil

49.79


0.75


1.53%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ALGN 
10.0




MHK 
4.3




COL 
4.3




LYB 
3.9






FLS
-10.9




MO
-9.5




SBUX
-9.2




GT
-8.4














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








9:15p

Updated
Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials



7:38p

Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News



7:28p

A Wild Week in Washington 



6:32p

Updated
The dark side of cruises



6:31p

 Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'



6:31p

Updated
The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart



6:31p

Updated
O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family



6:30p

Updated
Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings



6:29p

Updated
Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 



6:28p

Updated
This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


HDSN


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
Nasdaq

 



HDSN
U.S.: Nasdaq


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Hudson Technologies Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateHDSNAlert



  


After Hours

Last Updated: Jul 28, 2017 5:38 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
7.95



-0.01
-0.13%



After Hours Volume:
3.5K





Close
Chg
Chg %




$7.96
-0.04
-0.50%





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




105.4% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    662.7K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 629K
            





Open: 7.98
Close: 7.96



7.9200
Day Low/High
8.2111





Day Range



4.7000
52 Week Low/High
9.4400


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$7.98



Day Range
7.9200 - 8.2111



52 Week Range
4.7000 - 9.4400



Market Cap
$332.31M



Shares Outstanding
41.54M



Public Float
36.22M



Beta
0.80



Rev. per Employee
$847.77K



P/E Ratio
22.11



EPS
$0.36



Yield
n/a



Dividend
n/a



Ex-Dividend Date
n/a



Short Interest
4.73M
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
13.05%



Average Volume
628.97K




 


Performance




5 Day


-4.33%







1 Month


-5.80%







3 Month


12.11%







YTD


-0.62%







1 Year


61.79%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones











4 stocks to watch

Nov. 8, 2016 at 12:51 p.m. ET
by Harry Boxer









Hudson Technologies stock soars 42% premarket after DoD contract announced late Monday


Jul. 19, 2016 at 8:06 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Hudson Technologies shares surge on $400 million DoD contract


Jul. 18, 2016 at 4:59 p.m. ET
by Wallace Witkowski









U.S. stocks to watch early Thursday


Jul. 5, 2012 at 6:38 a.m. ET









Hudson Tech rises 12% in premarket trades


Jul. 3, 2012 at 8:23 a.m. ET
by Steve Gelsi









Hudson Technologies to buy back 26% of outstanding stock


Jun. 29, 2007 at 8:49 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies down 14% at $2.99


Nov. 7, 2005 at 9:51 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Updates, advisories and surprises


Aug. 4, 2005 at 8:31 p.m. ET
by MarketWatch









Highlights of rising and falling U.S. stocks


Aug. 4, 2005 at 6:45 p.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Hudson Technologies jumps 162% after net income tripled


Aug. 4, 2005 at 2:06 p.m. ET
by Wanfeng Zhou









Hudson Technologies up 162% at $2.88


Aug. 4, 2005 at 12:39 p.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Hudson Tech to trade on Nasdaq under "HDSN" Wednesday


Jun. 1, 2004 at 1:38 p.m. ET
by Carolyn Pritchard









Hudson Technologies to maintain Nasdaq listing


Jan. 13, 2004 at 9:05 a.m. ET
by Ciara Linnane









Hudson Tech completes 3.8 mln common stock offering


Dec. 23, 2003 at 9:31 a.m. ET
by Greg Robb









Hudson Tech to extend rights offering to Nov 7


Oct. 31, 2003 at 4:13 p.m. ET
by Alexander Davis









Hudson Technologies cutting work force by 20%


May. 23, 2003 at 8:35 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies sees cost reductions of $1.6 mln/yr


May. 23, 2003 at 8:35 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies reorganizes RefrigerantSide arm


May. 23, 2003 at 8:34 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies Q1 revenue $5.68 mln vs $6.11 mln


May. 14, 2003 at 9:21 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies Q1 loss 12 cents vs loss 13 cents


May. 14, 2003 at 9:21 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard













Hudson Technology Shares Could Double


Apr. 8, 2013 at 1:10 p.m. ET
on Barron's









Stocks to Watch: OraSure Tech, Buckle, Hudson Tech


Jul. 5, 2012 at 9:05 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Who's News Briefs


Aug. 28, 2001 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









DuPont Net Rises 37%


Jan. 30, 1997 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Week 28 Breakout Forecast: Short-Term Picks To Give You An Edge
Week 28 Breakout Forecast: Short-Term Picks To Give You An Edge

Jul. 9, 2017 at 3:23 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Think First Before Trying To Find The Next Superstock Like Amazon
Think First Before Trying To Find The Next Superstock Like Amazon

Jun. 20, 2017 at 8:53 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





These 21 Retail Companies May Go Bankrupt Next


Jun. 13, 2017 at 9:22 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





10 Great Stocks to Buy Under $10
10 Great Stocks to Buy Under $10

May. 24, 2017 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY
10-Q: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY

May. 4, 2017 at 5:15 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Hudson Technologies' (HDSN) CEO Kevin Zugibe on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript
Hudson Technologies' (HDSN) CEO Kevin Zugibe on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

May. 3, 2017 at 11:47 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hudson Technologies, Inc. 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call Slides
Hudson Technologies, Inc. 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call Slides

May. 3, 2017 at 5:12 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The 5 Most Promising Stocks To Watch In 2017 (JNJ, GWPH, HDSN, PETX, GHII)
The 5 Most Promising Stocks To Watch In 2017 (JNJ, GWPH, HDSN, PETX, GHII)

May. 3, 2017 at 11:34 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





VNBTrust, National Association Buys Computer Programs and Systems, Fiat Chrysler Automobiles ...


Apr. 12, 2017 at 10:38 a.m. ET
on GuruFocus.com





10-K: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY


Mar. 10, 2017 at 3:27 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Hudson Technologies' (HDSN) CEO Kevin Zugibe on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 1, 2017 at 9:34 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hudson Technologies: An Unknown Growth Opportunity


Mar. 1, 2017 at 10:20 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PRO Weekly Digest: Profiting From Company Transformations With Chris Colvin, Breach Inlet Capital


Feb. 5, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





7 Straight-A Stocks to Build Your Portfolio Around


Jan. 20, 2017 at 2:51 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





The 10 Best Stocks in the Nasdaq in 2016


Jan. 15, 2017 at 7:42 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





Game Plan For The Week - Cramer's Mad Money (1/6/17)


Jan. 9, 2017 at 7:39 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hudson Technologies: Upside Potential


Jan. 9, 2017 at 1:45 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Grainger November Sales Fall 3% Due to Multiple Headwinds


Dec. 14, 2016 at 9:36 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Will Danaher (DHR) Gain from Restructuring Initiatives?


Dec. 8, 2016 at 7:53 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Hudson Technologies proposed $49M public offering of common stock


Dec. 5, 2016 at 6:57 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 
      2017 Results
Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 
      2017 Results

Jul. 27, 2017 at 3:45 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Daily Technical Summary Reports on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant
Daily Technical Summary Reports on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant

Jul. 6, 2017 at 6:25 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies Joins Russell 2000®and Russell 3000® 
      Indices
Hudson Technologies Joins Russell 2000®and Russell 3000® 
      Indices

Jun. 26, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies to Present at 37th 
      Annual William Blair Growth Stock Conference
Hudson Technologies to Present at 37th 
      Annual William Blair Growth Stock Conference

Jun. 1, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Research Reports Initiation on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant
Research Reports Initiation on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant

May. 24, 2017 at 7:05 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies to Present at 18th 
      Annual B. Riley Investor Conference
Hudson Technologies to Present at 18th 
      Annual B. Riley Investor Conference

May. 10, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies Reports Revenues of $38.8 Million for First 
      Quarter 2017; Diluted EPS of $0.13
Hudson Technologies Reports Revenues of $38.8 Million for First 
      Quarter 2017; Diluted EPS of $0.13

May. 3, 2017 at 4:05 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Investor Network: Hudson Technologies, Inc. to Host Earnings Call
Investor Network: Hudson Technologies, Inc. to Host Earnings Call

May. 3, 2017 at 9:26 a.m. ET
on ACCESSWIRE





Investor Network Invites You to the Hudson Technologies First Quarter 2017 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast Live on Wednesday, May 3, 2017
Investor Network Invites You to the Hudson Technologies First Quarter 2017 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast Live on Wednesday, May 3, 2017

May. 2, 2017 at 4:10 p.m. ET
on ACCESSWIRE





Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss First Quarter 
      2017 Results


Apr. 13, 2017 at 11:03 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Machinery Stocks under Scanner -- Roper, Actuant, Hudson, and Generac


Apr. 13, 2017 at 6:40 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies Comments on U.S. International Trade Commission 
      Vote on Antidumping Petition Related to R-134a from China


Mar. 23, 2017 at 7:57 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies Reports Record Revenues of $105.5 Million for 
      Full Year 2016; Diluted EPS of $0.30


Mar. 1, 2017 at 4:05 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Research Reports Coverage on Industrial Goods Stocks -- Rexnord, Hudson Technologies, Zebra Technologies, and Weyerhaeuser


Feb. 23, 2017 at 8:10 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Fourth Quarter 
      2016 Results


Feb. 22, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Research Reports Initiation on Industrial Goods Stocks -- CRH PLC, Rexnord, Zebra Technologies, and Hudson Technologies


Jan. 17, 2017 at 7:10 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies, Inc. Announces Closing of Public Offering of 
      Common Stock and Full Exercise of Underwriters' Option to Purchase 
      Additional Shares


Dec. 14, 2016 at 4:07 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies, Inc. Announces Pricing of Public Offering of 
      Common Stock


Dec. 9, 2016 at 6:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies, Inc. Announces Proposed $49 Million Public 
      Offering of Common Stock


Dec. 5, 2016 at 9:37 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies to Present at 7th Annual 
      Craig-Hallum Alpha Select Conference


Nov. 11, 2016 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX











Hudson Technologies Inc.


            
            Hudson Technologies, Inc. operates as  a refrigerant services company, which provides solutions to recurring problems within the refrigeration industry. Its products and services are used in commercial air conditioning, industrial processing and refrigeration systems, which include refrigerant sales; refrigerant management services consisting primarily of reclamation of refrigerants; and Refrigerant Side services performed at the customer's site to remove moisture, oils and other contaminants. It also offers  predictive and diagnostic services through the Chiller Chemistry and Chill Smart brands. The company was founded by Stephen P. Mandracchia and Kevin J. Zugibe on January 11, 1991 and is headquartered in Pearl River, NY.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  




Analyst Ratings



Sell
Under
Hold
Over
Buy

Number of Ratings 4
Full Ratings 



 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




United Rentals Inc.
-0.86%
$10.21B


W.W. Grainger Inc.
-1.34%
$9.66B


Watsco Inc.
-0.26%
$5.37B


Flurida Group Inc.
-14.29%
$12.09M


Integer Holdings Corp.
2.92%
$1.39B




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





DVAX

0.00%








S

0.24%








MO

-9.49%








WDC

-7.54%








SSTI

-0.08%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.














Literature | Hudson Technologies








































            Search for:          


 






 









 Literature 
Home > Literature 





Please Select

SDS / MSDS
Case Studies
Brochures




































Select the appropriate state for additional contact details in your area


Select Your Location 

Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming










One Blue Hill Plaza, Pearl River, NY10965
          © 2017 Hudson Technologies, All Rights Reserved


PRIVACY POLICY | TERMS & CONDITIONS

   




























































Refrigerants

Refrigerants
Our Products
R-22 Information
SF6 Information
Industrial & Compressed Gases – DLA
SDS / MSDS Sheets


Refrigerant Reclaim

Refrigerant Reclaim
Clean Exchange Refrigerant Buyback For Wholesalers
Refrigerant Buyback For Large Contractors & End Users
Mixed Refrigerant Separation
Hydrostatic Testing & Cylinder Maintenance
Environmental Sustainability
CFC Disposal & Carbon Credits


On-site Refrigerant Service

On-Site Refrigerant Services
Chiller Decontamination
Chillers damaged by ruptured tubes
High Pressure Chiller Conversions
Refrigerant Recovery
SF6 (Sulfur Hexafluoride) Recovery
Cross Contaminated Refrigerants
Refrigerant Oil & Analysis Programs


Global Energy Services – Optimization Solutions

SMARTenergy OPS®
ChillSMART®


Global Energy Services – Engineering and Assessments

Energy Saving Assessments
Boiler MACT Consulting Services


Global Energy Services – Training and Energy Management

Best Practices Training
ISO 50001


Global Energy Services – Overview

GES Home
GES News
Brochures & Articles
Case Studies


Investor Relations

Financial Press Releases
Earnings Calls
Events & Presentations
Corporate Governance
Executive Officers and Directors
SEC Filings
Frequently Asked Questions


 
































Refrigerants | Hudson Technologies








































            Search for:          


 






 









 Refrigerants 
Home > Refrigerants 





Largest Inventory Selection
At Hudson Technologies, we offer one of the largest refrigerant inventory selections in the country, along with a convenient nationwide network of distributors. All our refrigerant products meet or exceed ARI- 700 purity standards. For your convenience, they also are available in all standard industry sizes, including tanker and ISO containers for bulk delivery.
Over the past 25+ years, we’ve provided hundreds of thousands of pounds of emergency, after-hours refrigerant shipments to get our customers up and running as quickly as possible. We can be reached 24 hours a day, seven days a week for routine and emergency shipments. In fact, even routine orders placed before 1 p.m. EST will be shipped that same day.
In addition to supplying refrigerants, we purchase and buyback virtually any used CFC, HCFC and HFC refrigerants at a competitive price. As part of this buyback program, we provide empty recovery cylinders and make freight arrangements. Through recovery and reclamation, Hudson has ensured that millions of pounds of refrigerant have been reclaimed to AHRI standards.  Having one of only 3 ARI approved laboratories Hudson can ensure that all reclaimed refrigerant meets or exceeds ARI-700 requirements and eliminates any quality concerns with the use of reclaimed refrigerant. This enables reclaimed refrigerant to be reused and has reduced the impact of new refrigerant production on the environment.  Our buyback and reclamation of refrigerants enables Hudson to continue to supply the HVAC and Refrigeration industries with numerous refrigerants that are no longer manufactured, but are still used in equipment such as R-11, R-12, R-133 and R-114 to name just a few.
To learn more about our Refrigerant Capabilities click the Play Now button to watch our video.





 


































Select the appropriate state for additional contact details in your area


Select Your Location 

Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming










One Blue Hill Plaza, Pearl River, NY10965
          © 2017 Hudson Technologies, All Rights Reserved


PRIVACY POLICY | TERMS & CONDITIONS

   




























































Refrigerants

Refrigerants
Our Products
R-22 Information
SF6 Information
Industrial & Compressed Gases – DLA
SDS / MSDS Sheets


Refrigerant Reclaim

Refrigerant Reclaim
Clean Exchange Refrigerant Buyback For Wholesalers
Refrigerant Buyback For Large Contractors & End Users
Mixed Refrigerant Separation
Hydrostatic Testing & Cylinder Maintenance
Environmental Sustainability
CFC Disposal & Carbon Credits


On-site Refrigerant Service

On-Site Refrigerant Services
Chiller Decontamination
Chillers damaged by ruptured tubes
High Pressure Chiller Conversions
Refrigerant Recovery
SF6 (Sulfur Hexafluoride) Recovery
Cross Contaminated Refrigerants
Refrigerant Oil & Analysis Programs


Global Energy Services – Optimization Solutions

SMARTenergy OPS®
ChillSMART®


Global Energy Services – Engineering and Assessments

Energy Saving Assessments
Boiler MACT Consulting Services


Global Energy Services – Training and Energy Management

Best Practices Training
ISO 50001


Global Energy Services – Overview

GES Home
GES News
Brochures & Articles
Case Studies


Investor Relations

Financial Press Releases
Earnings Calls
Events & Presentations
Corporate Governance
Executive Officers and Directors
SEC Filings
Frequently Asked Questions


 






























Hudson Technologies, Inc.                                                                                                - Pearl River                                       , NY         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



NY



Pearl River



Refrigeration Service and Repair



Refrigeration Service And Repair



                            Hudson Technologies, Inc.
                                    



 





















H 


Hudson Technologies, Inc.                                                                                               
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



1 BLUE HILL PLZ STE 1541 PEARL RIVER, NY 10965
Get Directions



(845) 735-6000
www.hudsontech.com                                                                                      





Business Info



 Founded 1991
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $105,481,000.00
 Employee Count 136
 Industries Refrigeration Service And Repair
 Contacts Kevin J Zugibe                                                                                                          







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Hudson Technologies, Inc.                                                                                                is located at 1 Blue Hill Plz Ste 1541 in Pearl River and has been in the business of Refrigeration Service And Repair since 1991. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







H

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


















About Us | Hudson Technologies








































            Search for:          


 






 










 




 About Us 
Home > About Us 





Company Overview
At Hudson Technologies, we focus our full attention on refrigerants and how they impact chiller performance. From refrigerant sales and reclamation services to on-site problem solving and energy-saving assessments, we lead the way in ensuring that your systems operate at peak performance.
We provide complete life cycle management of refrigerants and our commitment to environmental stewardship is core to everything we do. At all stages of the refrigerant life cycle, Hudson has proven, reliable programs that meet your needs. From initial sale through recovery, reclamation and reuse, peak operating performance of equipment through energy efficiency and emergency air conditioning system repair, to final refrigerant disposal and carbon credit trading we provide environmentally sustainable solutions to your refrigerant needs.  And with 4 reclamation facilities through the US and Puerto Rico we have the infrastructure to make refrigerant reclamation as easy as possible.
If your needs are as simple as buying or selling refrigerants, we do so in whatever containers you need – from as small as 30 pounds to as large as a railcar. If your needs involve recycling (reclaiming refrigerants), we handle that too. In fact, we offer a one-stop shop reclamation service through our all-inclusive Clean Exchange Wholesaler Program. Programs like this have positioned us as the largest reclamation company in the country.
Yet these aren’t the only things that make Hudson unique. We’re one of the only companies to provide on-site refrigerant services on a nationwide basis – no matter where you are. We’re the industry leader for RefrigerantSide® services in emergency situations. We’ve developed many patented, proprietary processes that deliver unparalleled results and allow your units to be operational in a fraction of the time it takes with traditional remediation methods. In many cases, our services can be performed online, saving you costly downtime.
When it comes to oil and refrigerant testing, we’ve reinvented the process by adding specific details that provide a much better picture of your system’s health. This information can help you to stay within budget while avoiding costly emergency shutdowns.
Through the use of our patented software model, our highly skilled team of chemists and engineers optimizes your system while lowering your operating costs by reducing your system’s energy consumption – reducing your impact on the environment.



































Select the appropriate state for additional contact details in your area


Select Your Location 

Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming










One Blue Hill Plaza, Pearl River, NY10965
          © 2017 Hudson Technologies, All Rights Reserved


PRIVACY POLICY | TERMS & CONDITIONS

   




























































Refrigerants

Refrigerants
Our Products
R-22 Information
SF6 Information
Industrial & Compressed Gases – DLA
SDS / MSDS Sheets


Refrigerant Reclaim

Refrigerant Reclaim
Clean Exchange Refrigerant Buyback For Wholesalers
Refrigerant Buyback For Large Contractors & End Users
Mixed Refrigerant Separation
Hydrostatic Testing & Cylinder Maintenance
Environmental Sustainability
CFC Disposal & Carbon Credits


On-site Refrigerant Service

On-Site Refrigerant Services
Chiller Decontamination
Chillers damaged by ruptured tubes
High Pressure Chiller Conversions
Refrigerant Recovery
SF6 (Sulfur Hexafluoride) Recovery
Cross Contaminated Refrigerants
Refrigerant Oil & Analysis Programs


Global Energy Services – Optimization Solutions

SMARTenergy OPS®
ChillSMART®


Global Energy Services – Engineering and Assessments

Energy Saving Assessments
Boiler MACT Consulting Services


Global Energy Services – Training and Energy Management

Best Practices Training
ISO 50001


Global Energy Services – Overview

GES Home
GES News
Brochures & Articles
Case Studies


Investor Relations

Financial Press Releases
Earnings Calls
Events & Presentations
Corporate Governance
Executive Officers and Directors
SEC Filings
Frequently Asked Questions


 
































About Us | Hudson Technologies








































            Search for:          


 






 










 




 About Us 
Home > About Us 





Company Overview
At Hudson Technologies, we focus our full attention on refrigerants and how they impact chiller performance. From refrigerant sales and reclamation services to on-site problem solving and energy-saving assessments, we lead the way in ensuring that your systems operate at peak performance.
We provide complete life cycle management of refrigerants and our commitment to environmental stewardship is core to everything we do. At all stages of the refrigerant life cycle, Hudson has proven, reliable programs that meet your needs. From initial sale through recovery, reclamation and reuse, peak operating performance of equipment through energy efficiency and emergency air conditioning system repair, to final refrigerant disposal and carbon credit trading we provide environmentally sustainable solutions to your refrigerant needs.  And with 4 reclamation facilities through the US and Puerto Rico we have the infrastructure to make refrigerant reclamation as easy as possible.
If your needs are as simple as buying or selling refrigerants, we do so in whatever containers you need – from as small as 30 pounds to as large as a railcar. If your needs involve recycling (reclaiming refrigerants), we handle that too. In fact, we offer a one-stop shop reclamation service through our all-inclusive Clean Exchange Wholesaler Program. Programs like this have positioned us as the largest reclamation company in the country.
Yet these aren’t the only things that make Hudson unique. We’re one of the only companies to provide on-site refrigerant services on a nationwide basis – no matter where you are. We’re the industry leader for RefrigerantSide® services in emergency situations. We’ve developed many patented, proprietary processes that deliver unparalleled results and allow your units to be operational in a fraction of the time it takes with traditional remediation methods. In many cases, our services can be performed online, saving you costly downtime.
When it comes to oil and refrigerant testing, we’ve reinvented the process by adding specific details that provide a much better picture of your system’s health. This information can help you to stay within budget while avoiding costly emergency shutdowns.
Through the use of our patented software model, our highly skilled team of chemists and engineers optimizes your system while lowering your operating costs by reducing your system’s energy consumption – reducing your impact on the environment.



































Select the appropriate state for additional contact details in your area


Select Your Location 

Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming










One Blue Hill Plaza, Pearl River, NY10965
          © 2017 Hudson Technologies, All Rights Reserved


PRIVACY POLICY | TERMS & CONDITIONS

   




























































Refrigerants

Refrigerants
Our Products
R-22 Information
SF6 Information
Industrial & Compressed Gases – DLA
SDS / MSDS Sheets


Refrigerant Reclaim

Refrigerant Reclaim
Clean Exchange Refrigerant Buyback For Wholesalers
Refrigerant Buyback For Large Contractors & End Users
Mixed Refrigerant Separation
Hydrostatic Testing & Cylinder Maintenance
Environmental Sustainability
CFC Disposal & Carbon Credits


On-site Refrigerant Service

On-Site Refrigerant Services
Chiller Decontamination
Chillers damaged by ruptured tubes
High Pressure Chiller Conversions
Refrigerant Recovery
SF6 (Sulfur Hexafluoride) Recovery
Cross Contaminated Refrigerants
Refrigerant Oil & Analysis Programs


Global Energy Services – Optimization Solutions

SMARTenergy OPS®
ChillSMART®


Global Energy Services – Engineering and Assessments

Energy Saving Assessments
Boiler MACT Consulting Services


Global Energy Services – Training and Energy Management

Best Practices Training
ISO 50001


Global Energy Services – Overview

GES Home
GES News
Brochures & Articles
Case Studies


Investor Relations

Financial Press Releases
Earnings Calls
Events & Presentations
Corporate Governance
Executive Officers and Directors
SEC Filings
Frequently Asked Questions


 
































Hudson Technologies








































            Search for:          


 






 









 Home 







At Hudson Technologies, we provide complete life cycle management of refrigerants and our commitment to environmental stewardship is core to everything we do.  At all stages of the refrigerant life cycle, Hudson has proven, reliable programs that meet your needs. From initial sale through recovery, reclamation and reuse, peak operating performance of equipment through energy efficiency and emergency air conditioning and refrigeration system repair, to final refrigerant disposal and carbon credit trading we provide environmentally sustainable solutions to your refrigerant needs.
We invite you to get to know us better by browsing our website or contacting us. We’re ready to serve you – and to help you with any refrigerant need.




Refrigerants
At Hudson, we offer one of the largest inventory selections in the country, along with a convenient nationwide network of distributors. All of our products meet or exceed ARI- 700 purity standards.

 


On-site Refrigerant Services
 When you have a refrigerant issue, there’s no need to send in samples, wait for analysis, and deal with costly downtime for your equipment. Instead, we bring the solution right to your doorstep.

 


Refrigerant Reclaim
With patented and proprietary technology, Hudson Technologies is the industry leader in refrigerant reclamation services.

 




Global Energy Services
Engineering, predictive and preventative maintenance, optimization software and services, training, and utility system assessments for commercial, institutional and industrial customers.

 



Investor Relations
Hudson Technologies is committed to employing its engineering and chemistry know-how to provide our customers with economic solutions that also provide significant environmental benefits to all. 

 


Wholesaler Online Refrigerant Store
Hudson Technologies online refrigerant store for our current wholesale customers. Place your orders for refrigerant directly with Hudson here.

 









Select the appropriate state for additional contact details in your area


Select Your Location 

Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming






 






One Blue Hill Plaza, Pearl River, NY10965
          © 2017 Hudson Technologies, All Rights Reserved


PRIVACY POLICY | TERMS & CONDITIONS

   




























































Refrigerants

Refrigerants
Our Products
R-22 Information
SF6 Information
Industrial & Compressed Gases – DLA
SDS / MSDS Sheets


Refrigerant Reclaim

Refrigerant Reclaim
Clean Exchange Refrigerant Buyback For Wholesalers
Refrigerant Buyback For Large Contractors & End Users
Mixed Refrigerant Separation
Hydrostatic Testing & Cylinder Maintenance
Environmental Sustainability
CFC Disposal & Carbon Credits


On-site Refrigerant Service

On-Site Refrigerant Services
Chiller Decontamination
Chillers damaged by ruptured tubes
High Pressure Chiller Conversions
Refrigerant Recovery
SF6 (Sulfur Hexafluoride) Recovery
Cross Contaminated Refrigerants
Refrigerant Oil & Analysis Programs


Global Energy Services – Optimization Solutions

SMARTenergy OPS®
ChillSMART®


Global Energy Services – Engineering and Assessments

Energy Saving Assessments
Boiler MACT Consulting Services


Global Energy Services – Training and Energy Management

Best Practices Training
ISO 50001


Global Energy Services – Overview

GES Home
GES News
Brochures & Articles
Case Studies


Investor Relations

Financial Press Releases
Earnings Calls
Events & Presentations
Corporate Governance
Executive Officers and Directors
SEC Filings
Frequently Asked Questions


 






























HDSN Stock Price - Hudson Technologies Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: Nasdaq) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,830.31


33.76


0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.10


-3.32


-0.13%











Nasdaq

6,374.68


-7.51


-0.12%











GlobalDow

2,848.22


-2.86


-0.10%











Gold

1,275.60


9.10


0.72%











Oil

49.79


0.75


1.53%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ALGN 
10.0




MHK 
4.3




COL 
4.3




LYB 
3.9






FLS
-10.9




MO
-9.5




SBUX
-9.2




GT
-8.4














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








9:15p

Updated
Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials



7:38p

Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News



7:28p

A Wild Week in Washington 



6:32p

Updated
The dark side of cruises



6:31p

 Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'



6:31p

Updated
The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart



6:31p

Updated
O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family



6:30p

Updated
Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings



6:29p

Updated
Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 



6:28p

Updated
This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


HDSN


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
Nasdaq

 



HDSN
U.S.: Nasdaq


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Hudson Technologies Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateHDSNAlert



  


After Hours

Last Updated: Jul 28, 2017 5:38 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
7.95



-0.01
-0.13%



After Hours Volume:
3.5K





Close
Chg
Chg %




$7.96
-0.04
-0.50%





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




105.4% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    662.7K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 629K
            





Open: 7.98
Close: 7.96



7.9200
Day Low/High
8.2111





Day Range



4.7000
52 Week Low/High
9.4400


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$7.98



Day Range
7.9200 - 8.2111



52 Week Range
4.7000 - 9.4400



Market Cap
$332.31M



Shares Outstanding
41.54M



Public Float
36.22M



Beta
0.80



Rev. per Employee
$847.77K



P/E Ratio
22.11



EPS
$0.36



Yield
n/a



Dividend
n/a



Ex-Dividend Date
n/a



Short Interest
4.73M
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
13.05%



Average Volume
628.97K




 


Performance




5 Day


-4.33%







1 Month


-5.80%







3 Month


12.11%







YTD


-0.62%







1 Year


61.79%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones











4 stocks to watch

Nov. 8, 2016 at 12:51 p.m. ET
by Harry Boxer









Hudson Technologies stock soars 42% premarket after DoD contract announced late Monday


Jul. 19, 2016 at 8:06 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Hudson Technologies shares surge on $400 million DoD contract


Jul. 18, 2016 at 4:59 p.m. ET
by Wallace Witkowski









U.S. stocks to watch early Thursday


Jul. 5, 2012 at 6:38 a.m. ET









Hudson Tech rises 12% in premarket trades


Jul. 3, 2012 at 8:23 a.m. ET
by Steve Gelsi









Hudson Technologies to buy back 26% of outstanding stock


Jun. 29, 2007 at 8:49 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies down 14% at $2.99


Nov. 7, 2005 at 9:51 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Updates, advisories and surprises


Aug. 4, 2005 at 8:31 p.m. ET
by MarketWatch









Highlights of rising and falling U.S. stocks


Aug. 4, 2005 at 6:45 p.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Hudson Technologies jumps 162% after net income tripled


Aug. 4, 2005 at 2:06 p.m. ET
by Wanfeng Zhou









Hudson Technologies up 162% at $2.88


Aug. 4, 2005 at 12:39 p.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Hudson Tech to trade on Nasdaq under "HDSN" Wednesday


Jun. 1, 2004 at 1:38 p.m. ET
by Carolyn Pritchard









Hudson Technologies to maintain Nasdaq listing


Jan. 13, 2004 at 9:05 a.m. ET
by Ciara Linnane









Hudson Tech completes 3.8 mln common stock offering


Dec. 23, 2003 at 9:31 a.m. ET
by Greg Robb









Hudson Tech to extend rights offering to Nov 7


Oct. 31, 2003 at 4:13 p.m. ET
by Alexander Davis









Hudson Technologies cutting work force by 20%


May. 23, 2003 at 8:35 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies sees cost reductions of $1.6 mln/yr


May. 23, 2003 at 8:35 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies reorganizes RefrigerantSide arm


May. 23, 2003 at 8:34 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies Q1 revenue $5.68 mln vs $6.11 mln


May. 14, 2003 at 9:21 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard









Hudson Technologies Q1 loss 12 cents vs loss 13 cents


May. 14, 2003 at 9:21 a.m. ET
by Mike Maynard













Hudson Technology Shares Could Double


Apr. 8, 2013 at 1:10 p.m. ET
on Barron's









Stocks to Watch: OraSure Tech, Buckle, Hudson Tech


Jul. 5, 2012 at 9:05 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Who's News Briefs


Aug. 28, 2001 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









DuPont Net Rises 37%


Jan. 30, 1997 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Week 28 Breakout Forecast: Short-Term Picks To Give You An Edge
Week 28 Breakout Forecast: Short-Term Picks To Give You An Edge

Jul. 9, 2017 at 3:23 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Think First Before Trying To Find The Next Superstock Like Amazon
Think First Before Trying To Find The Next Superstock Like Amazon

Jun. 20, 2017 at 8:53 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





These 21 Retail Companies May Go Bankrupt Next


Jun. 13, 2017 at 9:22 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





10 Great Stocks to Buy Under $10
10 Great Stocks to Buy Under $10

May. 24, 2017 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY
10-Q: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY

May. 4, 2017 at 5:15 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Hudson Technologies' (HDSN) CEO Kevin Zugibe on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript
Hudson Technologies' (HDSN) CEO Kevin Zugibe on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

May. 3, 2017 at 11:47 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hudson Technologies, Inc. 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call Slides
Hudson Technologies, Inc. 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call Slides

May. 3, 2017 at 5:12 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The 5 Most Promising Stocks To Watch In 2017 (JNJ, GWPH, HDSN, PETX, GHII)
The 5 Most Promising Stocks To Watch In 2017 (JNJ, GWPH, HDSN, PETX, GHII)

May. 3, 2017 at 11:34 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





VNBTrust, National Association Buys Computer Programs and Systems, Fiat Chrysler Automobiles ...


Apr. 12, 2017 at 10:38 a.m. ET
on GuruFocus.com





10-K: HUDSON TECHNOLOGIES INC /NY


Mar. 10, 2017 at 3:27 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Hudson Technologies' (HDSN) CEO Kevin Zugibe on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 1, 2017 at 9:34 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hudson Technologies: An Unknown Growth Opportunity


Mar. 1, 2017 at 10:20 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PRO Weekly Digest: Profiting From Company Transformations With Chris Colvin, Breach Inlet Capital


Feb. 5, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





7 Straight-A Stocks to Build Your Portfolio Around


Jan. 20, 2017 at 2:51 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





The 10 Best Stocks in the Nasdaq in 2016


Jan. 15, 2017 at 7:42 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





Game Plan For The Week - Cramer's Mad Money (1/6/17)


Jan. 9, 2017 at 7:39 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hudson Technologies: Upside Potential


Jan. 9, 2017 at 1:45 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Grainger November Sales Fall 3% Due to Multiple Headwinds


Dec. 14, 2016 at 9:36 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Will Danaher (DHR) Gain from Restructuring Initiatives?


Dec. 8, 2016 at 7:53 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Hudson Technologies proposed $49M public offering of common stock


Dec. 5, 2016 at 6:57 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 
      2017 Results
Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 
      2017 Results

Jul. 27, 2017 at 3:45 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Daily Technical Summary Reports on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant
Daily Technical Summary Reports on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant

Jul. 6, 2017 at 6:25 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies Joins Russell 2000®and Russell 3000® 
      Indices
Hudson Technologies Joins Russell 2000®and Russell 3000® 
      Indices

Jun. 26, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies to Present at 37th 
      Annual William Blair Growth Stock Conference
Hudson Technologies to Present at 37th 
      Annual William Blair Growth Stock Conference

Jun. 1, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Research Reports Initiation on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant
Research Reports Initiation on Machinery Stocks -- Cleantech Solutions, Hudson Technologies, Ocean Power Technologies, and Actuant

May. 24, 2017 at 7:05 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies to Present at 18th 
      Annual B. Riley Investor Conference
Hudson Technologies to Present at 18th 
      Annual B. Riley Investor Conference

May. 10, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies Reports Revenues of $38.8 Million for First 
      Quarter 2017; Diluted EPS of $0.13
Hudson Technologies Reports Revenues of $38.8 Million for First 
      Quarter 2017; Diluted EPS of $0.13

May. 3, 2017 at 4:05 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Investor Network: Hudson Technologies, Inc. to Host Earnings Call
Investor Network: Hudson Technologies, Inc. to Host Earnings Call

May. 3, 2017 at 9:26 a.m. ET
on ACCESSWIRE





Investor Network Invites You to the Hudson Technologies First Quarter 2017 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast Live on Wednesday, May 3, 2017
Investor Network Invites You to the Hudson Technologies First Quarter 2017 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast Live on Wednesday, May 3, 2017

May. 2, 2017 at 4:10 p.m. ET
on ACCESSWIRE





Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss First Quarter 
      2017 Results


Apr. 13, 2017 at 11:03 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Machinery Stocks under Scanner -- Roper, Actuant, Hudson, and Generac


Apr. 13, 2017 at 6:40 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies Comments on U.S. International Trade Commission 
      Vote on Antidumping Petition Related to R-134a from China


Mar. 23, 2017 at 7:57 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies Reports Record Revenues of $105.5 Million for 
      Full Year 2016; Diluted EPS of $0.30


Mar. 1, 2017 at 4:05 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Research Reports Coverage on Industrial Goods Stocks -- Rexnord, Hudson Technologies, Zebra Technologies, and Weyerhaeuser


Feb. 23, 2017 at 8:10 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies to Host Conference Call to Discuss Fourth Quarter 
      2016 Results


Feb. 22, 2017 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Research Reports Initiation on Industrial Goods Stocks -- CRH PLC, Rexnord, Zebra Technologies, and Hudson Technologies


Jan. 17, 2017 at 7:10 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Hudson Technologies, Inc. Announces Closing of Public Offering of 
      Common Stock and Full Exercise of Underwriters' Option to Purchase 
      Additional Shares


Dec. 14, 2016 at 4:07 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies, Inc. Announces Pricing of Public Offering of 
      Common Stock


Dec. 9, 2016 at 6:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies, Inc. Announces Proposed $49 Million Public 
      Offering of Common Stock


Dec. 5, 2016 at 9:37 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Hudson Technologies to Present at 7th Annual 
      Craig-Hallum Alpha Select Conference


Nov. 11, 2016 at 8:30 a.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX











Hudson Technologies Inc.


            
            Hudson Technologies, Inc. operates as  a refrigerant services company, which provides solutions to recurring problems within the refrigeration industry. Its products and services are used in commercial air conditioning, industrial processing and refrigeration systems, which include refrigerant sales; refrigerant management services consisting primarily of reclamation of refrigerants; and Refrigerant Side services performed at the customer's site to remove moisture, oils and other contaminants. It also offers  predictive and diagnostic services through the Chiller Chemistry and Chill Smart brands. The company was founded by Stephen P. Mandracchia and Kevin J. Zugibe on January 11, 1991 and is headquartered in Pearl River, NY.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  




Analyst Ratings



Sell
Under
Hold
Over
Buy

Number of Ratings 4
Full Ratings 



 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




United Rentals Inc.
-0.86%
$10.21B


W.W. Grainger Inc.
-1.34%
$9.66B


Watsco Inc.
-0.26%
$5.37B


Flurida Group Inc.
-14.29%
$12.09M


Integer Holdings Corp.
2.92%
$1.39B




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





DVAX

0.00%








S

0.24%








MO

-9.49%








WDC

-7.54%








SSTI

-0.08%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.










 







Home | Deep Drawn Metal Manufacturing - Hudson Technologies





























 





























866.241.4448









Resources

News
Blog


Ask Farley
About Us

History
Green Manufacturer
Hudson Sales Rep Territory Map
Our Values
Who are Hudson’s Customers?


Careers

Job Openings
Technology Students
Apprenticeship Program


Contact
 


Menu








Close

 Request for Quote



 





Engineered solutions for your  enclosure needs. Hudson Technologies has leading capabilities and solutions for your custom deep drawn metal enclosures, case, header and metal diaphragms. Request for Quote 






Our Services Hudson Technologies' core capabilities include expertise with a variety of high performance metals, including stainless steel and titanium, along with aluminum, aluminized steel, cold rolled steel, brass, copper, HY-MU 80 (other shielding alloys available), nickel, cupro nickel and more. 
 

 
Custom Capabilities & Components 



 
Medical Products 



 
Metal Diaphragms 



 
Deep Drawn Stamping 




Catalog Our catalog has over 15,000 standard shapes & sizes with little to no tooling charges. 






 Round - Standard Cases 


 Squares - Standard Cases 


 Rectangles - Standard Cases 



 Round - Standard Covers 


 Squares - Standard Covers 


 Rectangles  - Standard Covers 



 Specials 


 TC 






Facilities List Hudson Technologies houses machines built to meet your specific needs. View Here 


About Us Hudson Technologies is a leading U.S. green manufacturer of deep drawn metal enclosures, or cases, and stampings, including metal diaphragms. Design engineers turn to Hudson Technologies for custom enclosures and metal diaphragms for their technology whether they need a prototype or high-volume production. Read More 
 







Industries we serve include: Aerospace, Medical, Pressure Transducters, Semi Conductor, Commercial Battery, and Capacitors

 

Contact Us











